Abdullah The Butcher
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Sporadic appearances from the late 1970s through the mid-1980s.
Position on the card: Special attraction, monster heel.
Wrestling style: Hardcore brawler with extreme brutality.
Signature moves: Fork Stabbing, Elbow Drop, Headbutt, Nerve Hold.
Brief description: One of the most feared wrestlers in history, Abdullah The Butcher made sporadic appearances in World Class, engaging in violent brawls with Bruiser Brody, The Von Erichs, and other top stars. His unpredictable and bloody style made him a terrifying presence, often managed by Gary Hart. Despite never being a full-time roster member, his impact was undeniable whenever he arrived in Texas.

Action Jackson
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Regular competitor in the late 1980s and early 1990s.
Position on the card: Mid-card, occasional main-eventer in later years.
Wrestling style: Power-based brawler with agility.
Signature moves: Powerslam, Clothesline, Military Press, Spinebuster.
Brief description: A mainstay in the later years of World Class and its successor promotions, Action Jackson built a reputation as a powerhouse competitor. His strength and energy made him a solid fan favorite, and he was often used as a reliable babyface against both local and national talent making stops in Texas.

Adnan Kassie (General Adnan)
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Sporadic appearances in the 1970s.
Position on the card: Mid-card, occasional manager.
Wrestling style: Technical grappler with Middle Eastern-inspired tactics.
Signature moves: Camel Clutch, Abdominal Stretch, Eye Rake, Chokeholds.
Brief description: Best known for his managerial work later in his career, Adnan Kassie wrestled briefly in Texas during the 1970s. His Middle Eastern gimmick made him a natural heel, but his time in the territory was limited compared to his greater impact in AWA and WWE.

Adrian Street
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Sporadic appearances in the early 1980s.
Position on the card: Mid-card, flamboyant heel.
Wrestling style: Technical grappler with psychological tactics.
Signature moves: Sleeper Hold, Double Knee Facebuster, Crucifix Pin.
Brief description: Adrian Street brought his unique, flamboyant persona to Texas for brief appearances, using his mind games and precise wrestling to frustrate opponents. Though not a long-term fixture in World Class, his rare showings left an impression, showcasing his eccentric yet skilled approach to wrestling.

Afa
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Sporadic tag team appearances in the early 1980s.
Position on the card: Tag team attraction, upper mid-card.
Wrestling style: Wild brawler with Samoan power moves.
Signature moves: Samoan Drop, Headbutt, Thrust Kick.
Brief description: One half of The Wild Samoans, Afa made appearances in Texas with his brother Sika, bringing their unpredictable, hard-hitting style to the territory. Managed by Skandor Akbar at times, they were feared tag competitors in their brief runs.

Al Costello
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Regular appearances in the 1960s as part of The Fabulous Kangaroos.
Position on the card: Tag team main eventer.
Wrestling style: Technical and tag team specialist.
Signature moves: Kangaroo Kick, Sleeper Hold, Double Team Arm Drag.
Brief description: As one-half of The Fabulous Kangaroos, Al Costello helped define tag team wrestling, bringing his heel tactics and Australian gimmick to Texas. The team was a major attraction, often drawing heat with their arrogance and effective double-team maneuvers.

Al Madril
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Regular competitor from the 1970s through the mid-1980s.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper-card, strong regional talent.
Wrestling style: Technical wrestler with a blend of lucha libre influence.
Signature moves: Flying Crossbody, Dropkick, Figure-Four Leglock.
Brief description: Al Madril was a talented and versatile wrestler in Texas, often competing as both a singles and tag team competitor. His ability to work as either a face or a heel made him a valuable player in World Class, where he feuded with The Von Erichs and teamed with wrestlers like Brian Adias.

Al Perez
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Regular competitor in the mid-to-late 1980s.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card, occasional main eventer.
Wrestling style: Technical and power-based hybrid.
Signature moves: Spinning Toe Hold, Belly-to-Belly Suplex, Sleeper Hold.
Brief description: Al Perez was a top heel in the later years of World Class, often challenging for major titles and working alongside manager Gary Hart. His technical ability and well-rounded in-ring skills made him a legitimate threat in the territory, particularly against The Von Erichs.

Alberto Torres
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Regular competitor in the 1960s through early 1970s.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event.
Wrestling style: Technical wrestler with strong fundamentals.
Signature moves: Dropkick, Arm Drag, Rolling Cradle.
Brief description: Alberto Torres was a respected competitor in Texas, known for his smooth in-ring ability and fan-friendly style. His tragic in-ring accident in 1971 led to his untimely passing, which deeply affected the wrestling community and led to tribute events in his honor.

Aldo Bogni
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Regular appearances in the 1960s.
Position on the card: Mid-card heel, occasional tag team competitor.
Wrestling style: Rugged brawler with rule-breaking tendencies.
Signature moves: Backbreaker, Stomach Claw, Foreign Object Attacks.
Brief description: A classic territorial heel, Aldo Bogni was a staple in Texas wrestling during the 1960s, often managed by Homer O'Dell. His rough, villainous tactics made him a strong foil for fan-favorite babyfaces.

Alex Porteau
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Regular competitor in the late 1980s.
Position on the card: Mid-card, rising young talent.
Wrestling style: Technical grappler with a mix of power.
Signature moves: Northern Lights Suplex, Boston Crab, Dropkick.
Brief description: Known as "The Pug" in later years, Alex Porteau was a promising competitor in the dying days of World Class. His technical skills and endurance made him a solid presence in the mid-card, often wrestling against other up-and-coming talent.

Andre The Giant
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Sporadic special attraction appearances from the mid-1970s through the 1980s.
Position on the card: Main event special attraction.
Wrestling style: Power-based giant with agility for his size.
Signature moves: Big Boot, Bodyslam, Headbutt, Sitdown Splash.
Brief description: One of the most famous wrestlers of all time, Andre The Giant made occasional appearances in Texas, including World Class events. His matches were often against top heels or in tag team settings to showcase his dominance. His sheer size and star power made his appearances major draws for the territory.

Angel Of Death
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Regular competitor in the mid-to-late 1980s.
Position on the card: Mid-to-upper card, enforcer-style heel.
Wrestling style: Power-based bruiser with a slow, methodical pace.
Signature moves: Powerslam, Big Boot, Chokeslam, Elbow Drop.
Brief description: Angel Of Death was a reliable big man who often worked as an enforcer for factions such as The Freebirds. His intimidating presence and solid in-ring ability made him a key figure in the later years of World Class, though he never reached main-event status.

Angelo Mosca
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Sporadic appearances in the 1970s.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event heel.
Wrestling style: Power-based brawler with football-style aggression.
Signature moves: Sleeper Hold, Shoulder Block, Piledriver.
Brief description: A former football player turned wrestler, Angelo Mosca made occasional stops in Texas, bringing his intimidating, hard-hitting style to the ring. While he was a bigger name in other territories, his sporadic World Class appearances saw him work against established stars, often in brutal, hard-hitting matches.

Antonio Inoki
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Sporadic special appearances in the 1970s.
Position on the card: International guest main eventer.
Wrestling style: Strong style striker with technical submissions.
Signature moves: Enzuigiri, Octopus Stretch, Bridging German Suplex.
Brief description: As a global icon in professional wrestling, Antonio Inoki made rare special appearances in Texas, bringing his signature strong style offense and martial arts influence. His matches were highly anticipated and showcased his technical ability against various local and traveling stars.

Arman Hussian
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Regular competitor in the 1970s and early 1980s.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper-card, occasional manager.
Wrestling style: Rule-breaking heel with psychological tactics.
Signature moves: Sleeper Hold, Knee Drop, Chokehold, Eye Rake.
Brief description: Arman Hussian was a notable heel in Texas wrestling, often using his promos and in-ring tactics to generate strong reactions from the crowd. He later took on a managerial role, guiding other villains in World Class and influencing the territory’s evolving heel landscape.

Art Crews
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Regular competitor in the early-to-mid 1980s.
Position on the card: Mid-card enhancement talent.
Wrestling style: Basic technical wrestler.
Signature moves: Suplex, Dropkick, Side Headlock.
Brief description: A reliable journeyman, Art Crews competed frequently in Texas, primarily as an enhancement talent against rising stars and main eventers. His solid in-ring work made him a respected opponent, though he rarely moved beyond mid-card status.

Art Nelson
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Regular competitor in the 1960s and early 1970s.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper-card heel.
Wrestling style: Hard-hitting brawler with a no-nonsense approach.
Signature moves: Piledriver, Forearm Smash, Bearhug.
Brief description: Art Nelson was a rugged, old-school wrestler who worked in Texas as both a tag team and singles competitor. His imposing style made him a strong heel presence, often battling the territory’s top fan favorites.

Art Thomas
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Sporadic appearances in the 1960s and 1970s.
Position on the card: Mid-card, traveling attraction.
Wrestling style: Power-based grappler with incredible strength.
Signature moves: Bearhug, Press Slam, Big Boot.
Brief description: Known for his impressive physique and strength, Art Thomas made occasional stops in Texas, where his size and presence made him an intriguing opponent for both local stars and traveling talent.

Austin Idol
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Sporadic appearances in the late 1970s and early 1980s.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event.
Wrestling style: Charismatic powerhouse with technical ability.
Signature moves: Las Vegas Leglock (Figure-Four Leglock), Elbow Drop, Piledriver.
Brief description: Known as "The Universal Heartthrob," Austin Idol made occasional appearances in Texas, where his blend of power, arrogance, and technical skill made him a compelling heel. Though he was a bigger name in the Southeastern territories, his World Class appearances often saw him face top babyfaces in high-profile matches.

Baron von Raschke
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Regular competitor in the mid-to-late 1970s.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event heel.
Wrestling style: Power-based grappler with submission expertise.
Signature moves: Clawhold, Shoulder Breaker, Stomach Claw.
Brief description: A menacing presence in Texas wrestling, Baron von Raschke’s German-inspired heel persona and feared Clawhold made him a top antagonist. He often battled fan-favorite babyfaces, including The Von Erichs, and remained a strong villain in various territories, including World Class.

Bearcat Wright
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Regular competitor in the 1960s.
Position on the card: Main eventer, pioneering African American star.
Wrestling style: Power wrestler with technical elements.
Signature moves: Bearhug, Forearm Smash, Big Boot.
Brief description: A trailblazer in professional wrestling, Bearcat Wright was one of the first African American stars to break through in multiple territories. His work in Texas helped pave the way for future Black wrestlers in the region. His size, strength, and charisma made him a fan favorite wherever he competed.

Big John Studd
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Regular competitor in the late 1970s and early 1980s.
Position on the card: Main event heel.
Wrestling style: Power-based giant with a methodical approach.
Signature moves: Bearhug, Backbreaker, Overhead Chop, Running Elbow Drop.
Brief description: A towering force in Texas wrestling, Big John Studd was a dominant heel in World Class, frequently feuding with The Von Erichs and other top stars. Managed by Gary Hart during his Texas run, Studd’s intimidating presence and clashes with fan-favorites made him a key figure before his national rise in WWE.

Bill Dundee
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Sporadic appearances in the early-to-mid 1980s.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event guest talent.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical hybrid.
Signature moves: Flying Crossbody, Dropkick, Elbow Drop.
Brief description: A Southern wrestling icon, Bill Dundee made sporadic stops in World Class, often bringing his speed and experience into heated rivalries. Though more closely associated with Memphis wrestling, his brief Texas appearances showcased his well-rounded skills against top-tier competition.

Bill Irwin
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Regular competitor in the late 1970s through the 1980s.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card, tag team specialist.
Wrestling style: Brawler with technical ability.
Signature moves: Big Boot, Powerslam, Shoulder Block.
Brief description: Best known in World Class as one-half of the Long Riders with his brother Scott Irwin, Bill Irwin was a reliable heel who feuded with The Von Erichs and other Texas favorites. His rough, no-nonsense style made him a staple in the promotion before later transitioning into his "Wild Bill Irwin" persona in other territories.

Bill Watts
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Regular competitor in the 1960s, occasional appearances in the 1970s.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event.
Wrestling style: Power-based brawler with technical fundamentals.
Signature moves: Oklahoma Stampede, Scoop Slam, Shoulder Tackle.
Brief description: Before becoming a legendary promoter, "Cowboy" Bill Watts was a tough competitor in Texas, regularly wrestling in NWA Big Time Wrestling. His no-nonsense style and fiery personality made him a natural fan favorite, often clashing with top heels of the era. His Texas tenure helped establish the hard-hitting reputation he carried into his later booking career.

Superstar Billy Graham
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Sporadic appearances in the 1970s and early 1980s.
Position on the card: Main event attraction.
Wrestling style: Power-based showman with strong charisma.
Signature moves: Bearhug, Running Elbow Drop, Karate Chop.
Brief description: A flamboyant powerhouse, Superstar Billy Graham made limited yet impactful appearances in Texas, showcasing his larger-than-life persona. Though his most famous runs were in WWE and the AWA, his charisma and physique made him a special attraction in World Class whenever he appeared.

Billy Jack Haynes
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Sporadic appearances in the mid-1980s.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event guest star.
Wrestling style: Power-based grappler with submission ability.
Signature moves: Full Nelson, Powerslam, Lariat.
Brief description: A muscular competitor with a rugged in-ring style, Billy Jack Haynes made occasional stops in World Class during the 1980s. Though his most notable runs were in the Pacific Northwest and WWE, his Texas appearances saw him mix it up with top names in hard-hitting bouts.

Billy Joe Travis
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Regular competitor in the mid-to-late 1980s.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card.
Wrestling style: Technical and opportunistic heel.
Signature moves: Dropkick, Russian Leg Sweep, Piledriver.
Brief description: A cocky and skilled competitor, Billy Joe Travis was a solid mid-card heel in World Class, often using underhanded tactics to secure victories. While not a main-eventer, his work in Texas built his reputation as an effective antagonist, leading to later success in USWA.

Billy Red Lyons
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Regular competitor in the 1960s and early 1970s.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card, tag team specialist.
Wrestling style: Technical grappler with a smooth in-ring style.
Signature moves: Atomic Drop, Sleeper Hold, Running Knee Lift.
Brief description: A respected Canadian technician, Billy Red Lyons frequently wrestled in Texas, both as a singles and tag team competitor. His work alongside Fritz Von Erich and other Texas stars made him a reliable and well-liked presence in the promotion.

Black Bart
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Regular competitor in the early-to-mid 1980s.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event.
Wrestling style: Brawling powerhouse with cowboy-style offense.
Signature moves: Texas Piledriver, Lariat, Shoulder Block.
Brief description: A rough and tough Texan, Black Bart was a key heel in World Class, often managed by Skandor Akbar. His rugged style and cowboy persona made him a formidable opponent, frequently feuding with The Von Erichs and other top babyfaces.

Black Gordman
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Sporadic appearances in the 1970s.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card heel.
Wrestling style: Lucha-influenced brawler.
Signature moves: Stomach Claw, Abdominal Stretch, Dropkick.
Brief description: A feared masked wrestler, Black Gordman occasionally appeared in Texas, often teaming with Goliath in tag team competition. His mix of technical skill and brawling tactics made him a solid heel attraction whenever he competed in the territory.

Blackjack Lanza
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Regular competitor in the late 1960s through the 1970s.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event heel.
Wrestling style: Power-based brawler with a methodical pace.
Signature moves: Clawhold, Piledriver, Big Boot.
Brief description: One-half of the legendary Blackjacks tag team, Blackjack Lanza was a dominant force in Texas wrestling. His intimidating presence and hard-hitting offense made him a top heel in the region, often working against local heroes and feuding with the Von Erich family.

Blackjack Mulligan
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Regular competitor in the mid-to-late 1970s.
Position on the card: Main event heel.
Wrestling style: Brawler with raw power and cowboy toughness.
Signature moves: Clawhold, Running Lariat, Big Elbow Drop.
Brief description: A towering and charismatic figure, Blackjack Mulligan made a major impact in Texas as a rule-breaking cowboy brawler. His feuds with the Von Erichs and other top names solidified his reputation as one of wrestling’s most imposing villains.

Bob Bradley
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Regular competitor in the early-to-mid 1980s.
Position on the card: Mid-card enhancement talent.
Wrestling style: Technical wrestler with agility.
Signature moves: Dropkick, Sunset Flip, Arm Drag.
Brief description: Bob Bradley was a journeyman competitor in World Class, often used to help build rising stars. His ability to work with various styles made him a reliable name in the mid-card, though he rarely advanced beyond an enhancement role.

Bob Ellis (Bulldog Bob Ellis)
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Regular competitor in the 1960s.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card babyface.
Wrestling style: Brawler with a cowboy-style offense.
Signature moves: Bulldog Headlock, Atomic Drop, Running Forearm Smash.
Brief description: A rugged competitor, Bulldog Bob Ellis was a well-known name in Texas wrestling during the 1960s. His cowboy persona and rough brawling style made him a popular fan favorite, often battling some of the top heels of the era.

Bob Geigel
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Sporadic appearances in the 1950s and 1960s.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card.
Wrestling style: Technical grappler with a ground-based offense.
Signature moves: Hammerlock, Boston Crab, Shoulder Tackle.
Brief description: Better known as an NWA promoter, Bob Geigel was also a competitive wrestler who made occasional stops in Texas. Though his in-ring career wasn’t as notable as his administrative role in wrestling, he was a respected competitor in his time.

Bob Orton Jr.
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Sporadic appearances in the late 1970s and early 1980s.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event guest star.
Wrestling style: Technical wrestler with strong striking ability.
Signature moves: Superplex, Piledriver, Forearm Smash.
Brief description: A second-generation star, Bob Orton Jr. made occasional stops in Texas, bringing his technical expertise and rugged in-ring style to World Class. Though his most prominent work came in WWE and Mid-Atlantic, his Texas appearances saw him face off against regional stars in hard-hitting contests.

Bob Orton Sr.
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Sporadic appearances in the 1960s.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card.
Wrestling style: Rough brawler with submission expertise.
Signature moves: Piledriver, Sleeper Hold, Stomach Claw.
Brief description: A respected competitor in the early territorial era, Bob Orton Sr. made occasional appearances in Texas, showcasing his aggressive and technically sound style. While not a regular fixture, his matches helped solidify his reputation as a tough veteran grappler.

Bob Roop
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Sporadic appearances in the 1970s.
Position on the card: Mid-card technical wrestler.
Wrestling style: Amateur wrestling-based technician.
Signature moves: Shoulder Breaker, Cobra Clutch, Belly-to-Belly Suplex.
Brief description: A former amateur wrestling standout, Bob Roop occasionally appeared in Texas, where his technical ability and submission-based offense made him a credible competitor. His main work came in other NWA territories, but he was a respected name whenever he competed in World Class.

Bob Sweetan
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Regular competitor in the 1970s.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card heel.
Wrestling style: Hard-hitting brawler with power-based offense.
Signature moves: Piledriver, Elbow Drop, Knee Lift.
Brief description: A vicious and feared heel, Bob Sweetan was a staple in several NWA territories, including Texas. His relentless brawling style made him a dangerous opponent, and he often found himself in heated rivalries with fan-favorite babyfaces.

Bobby Duncum
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Regular competitor in the 1970s and early 1980s.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event.
Wrestling style: Power-based brawler with a cowboy persona.
Signature moves: Bulldog, Lariat, Piledriver.
Brief description: A tough Texan with a reputation for hard-hitting matches, Bobby Duncum was a staple in the Texas wrestling scene. His cowboy gimmick and no-nonsense attitude made him a fan favorite and a natural rival for rule-breaking heels in World Class.

Bobby Eaton
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Sporadic appearances in the early 1980s.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical specialist.
Signature moves: Alabama Jam (Leg Drop from the Top Rope), Swinging Neckbreaker, Dropkick.
Brief description: Before achieving legendary status as part of The Midnight Express, Bobby Eaton made sporadic appearances in Texas. His exceptional athleticism and smooth in-ring work made him a standout performer, even in guest appearances.

Bobby Fulton
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Sporadic appearances in the early 1980s.
Position on the card: Mid-card tag team competitor.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical wrestler.
Signature moves: Dropkick, Sunset Flip, Crossbody.
Brief description: Best known as one-half of The Fantastics, Bobby Fulton had brief appearances in Texas, where his speed and agility made him an exciting performer. His work in tag team wrestling helped define the fast-paced, action-packed style of the 1980s.

Bobby Heenan
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Sporadic managerial appearances in the late 1970s.
Position on the card: Heel manager.
Wrestling style: Managerial interference, psychological tactics.
Signature moves: Distraction, Cheap Shot, Outside Interference.
Brief description: While primarily known for his work in the AWA and WWE, Bobby Heenan made occasional appearances in Texas as a manager. His sharp wit and ability to generate intense crowd reactions made him one of the greatest managers of all time, even in brief Texas stints.

Bobby Managoff
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Regular competitor in the 1950s and 1960s.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event.
Wrestling style: Technical grappler with speed.
Signature moves: Dropkick, Arm Drag, Sleeper Hold.
Brief description: A respected wrestler in the golden age of wrestling, Bobby Managoff was a major competitor in Texas, often challenging for regional and NWA titles. His well-rounded in-ring ability made him a reliable top-tier talent.

Bobby Duncum
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Regular competitor in the 1970s and early 1980s.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event.
Wrestling style: Power-based brawler with a cowboy persona.
Signature moves: Bulldog, Lariat, Piledriver.
Brief description: A tough Texan with a reputation for hard-hitting matches, Bobby Duncum was a staple in the Texas wrestling scene. His cowboy gimmick and no-nonsense attitude made him a fan favorite and a natural rival for rule-breaking heels in World Class.

Bobby Eaton
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Sporadic appearances in the early 1980s.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical specialist.
Signature moves: Alabama Jam (Leg Drop from the Top Rope), Swinging Neckbreaker, Dropkick.
Brief description: Before achieving legendary status as part of The Midnight Express, Bobby Eaton made sporadic appearances in Texas. His exceptional athleticism and smooth in-ring work made him a standout performer, even in guest appearances.

Bobby Fulton
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Sporadic appearances in the early 1980s.
Position on the card: Mid-card tag team competitor.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical wrestler.
Signature moves: Dropkick, Sunset Flip, Crossbody.
Brief description: Best known as one-half of The Fantastics, Bobby Fulton had brief appearances in Texas, where his speed and agility made him an exciting performer. His work in tag team wrestling helped define the fast-paced, action-packed style of the 1980s.

Bobby Heenan
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Sporadic managerial appearances in the late 1970s.
Position on the card: Heel manager.
Wrestling style: Managerial interference, psychological tactics.
Signature moves: Distraction, Cheap Shot, Outside Interference.
Brief description: While primarily known for his work in the AWA and WWE, Bobby Heenan made occasional appearances in Texas as a manager. His sharp wit and ability to generate intense crowd reactions made him one of the greatest managers of all time, even in brief Texas stints.

Bobby Managoff
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Regular competitor in the 1950s and 1960s.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event.
Wrestling style: Technical grappler with speed.
Signature moves: Dropkick, Arm Drag, Sleeper Hold.
Brief description: A respected wrestler in the golden age of wrestling, Bobby Managoff was a major competitor in Texas, often challenging for regional and NWA titles. His well-rounded in-ring ability made him a reliable top-tier talent.

Brad Armstrong
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Sporadic appearances in the mid-to-late 1980s.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card.
Wrestling style: Technical and high-flying hybrid.
Signature moves: Russian Leg Sweep, Dropkick, Sleeper Hold.
Brief description: A highly skilled and well-respected wrestler, Brad Armstrong made occasional appearances in Texas, where his agility and technical ability stood out. Though more associated with Mid-South and WCW, his guest appearances in World Class showcased his well-rounded in-ring skills.

Brian Adias
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Regular competitor from the late 1970s through the mid-1980s.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card, frequent tag team partner of The Von Erichs.
Wrestling style: Technical grappler with speed and agility.
Signature moves: Dropkick, Abdominal Stretch, Sunset Flip.
Brief description: A longtime friend of the Von Erich family, Brian Adias was a reliable performer in World Class, often teaming with the Von Erichs and feuding with various heels. His solid technical ability and Texas roots made him a favorite among local fans.

Brickhouse Brown
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Regular competitor in the mid-to-late 1980s.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card.
Wrestling style: Athletic high-flyer with power moves.
Signature moves: Dropkick, Flying Elbow, Powerslam.
Brief description: A dynamic competitor with charisma and in-ring ability, Brickhouse Brown wrestled in World Class during its later years. Though not a top main-eventer, his energy and skill made him a key mid-card attraction, often feuding with both heels and babyfaces.

Bronco Lubich
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Regular competitor in the 1960s, later became a referee.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card, later referee.
Wrestling style: Slow, methodical brawler with European influences.
Signature moves: Clawhold, Forearm Smash, Knee Lift.
Brief description: Bronco Lubich was a respected competitor in Texas before transitioning into a longtime referee role in World Class. His slow, calculated in-ring style complemented his later work as an authoritative official in the promotion.

Bruiser Brody
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Regular competitor from the late 1970s to 1988.
Position on the card: Main eventer, wild brawler, special attraction.
Wrestling style: Hardcore brawler with erratic offense and unmatched intensity.
Signature moves: Running Big Boot, Jumping Knee Drop, Piledriver, Brawling Strikes.
Brief description: Known for his wild, unchained style, Bruiser Brody became a major attraction in World Class, often battling the Von Erichs, Abdullah the Butcher, and The Freebirds. His larger-than-life presence made him a feared opponent, and his chaotic in-ring style blurred the lines between scripted and real fights. His unpredictable nature made him a major draw, and his tragic 1988 passing remains one of wrestling’s great losses.

Brute Bernard
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Regular competitor in the 1960s and 1970s.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card, tag team specialist.
Wrestling style: Wild brawler with an unpredictable persona.
Signature moves: Headbutt, Brawling Punches, Stomach Claw.
Brief description: Brute Bernard was a feared competitor in Texas, often working alongside fellow roughhouse wrestlers. His wild demeanor and no-frills in-ring style made him a strong heel presence in NWA Big Time Wrestling and early World Class events.

Buck Zumhofe
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Regular competitor in the late 1970s and early 1980s.
Position on the card: Mid-card babyface.
Wrestling style: High-energy brawler with showmanship.
Signature moves: Dropkick, Sunset Flip, Sleeper Hold.
Brief description: A charismatic competitor known for his "Rock & Roll" gimmick, Buck Zumhofe was a solid mid-carder in World Class, using his crowd interaction and fast-paced offense to entertain Texas audiences.

Buddy Roberts
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Regular competitor from the early 1980s to the late 1980s.
Position on the card: Main eventer, key faction member.
Wrestling style: Brawling heel with technical fundamentals.
Signature moves: Bulldog, Knee Drop, Fist Drop.
Brief description: As a core member of The Fabulous Freebirds, Buddy Roberts played a pivotal role in World Class' most heated rivalry against the Von Erichs. His scrappy, antagonistic style made him the perfect heel, often using dirty tactics to gain an advantage. His work in Texas remains one of the defining periods of his career.

Bugsy McGraw
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Regular competitor in the 1970s and early 1980s.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card, comedic wild man.
Wrestling style: Unpredictable brawler with erratic offense.
Signature moves: Elbow Drop, Big Splash, Brawling Punches.
Brief description: Known for his eccentric and unhinged persona, Bugsy McGraw entertained fans with his unpredictable antics while also proving to be a tough competitor. He was a key mid-card attraction in Texas, often engaging in both comedic and hard-hitting brawls.

Bull Curry
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Regular competitor in the 1950s through the early 1970s.
Position on the card: Main eventer, pioneering hardcore brawler.
Wrestling style: Wild, no-rules brawler.
Signature moves: Eye Gouge, Chain Attack, Headbutt, Stomach Claw.
Brief description: One of wrestling’s earliest hardcore legends, Bull Curry was known for his violent, chaotic matches. His feuds with top Texas babyfaces and his wild in-ring persona made him one of the most feared competitors in the region’s history.

Bull Ramos
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Regular competitor in the 1960s and 1970s.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event heel.
Wrestling style: Power-based brawler with a slow, punishing approach.
Signature moves: Bearhug, Big Boot, Elbow Smash.
Brief description: A dominant heel, Bull Ramos was a physically imposing competitor in Texas wrestling. His rivalries with top babyfaces helped him become one of the most recognized and feared villains in the territory.

Butch Reed
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Sporadic appearances in the early 1980s.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event guest star.
Wrestling style: Power-based brawler with agility.
Signature moves: Flying Shoulder Block, Press Slam, Powerslam.
Brief description: Butch Reed, known for his incredible combination of strength and athleticism, made limited appearances in Texas before gaining greater fame in Mid-South Wrestling and WWE. His Texas appearances showcased his raw power and charismatic presence against some of the territory's biggest names.

Buzz Sawyer
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Sporadic appearances in the early-to-mid 1980s.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event attraction.
Wrestling style: Wild brawler with technical explosiveness.
Signature moves: Powerslam, Top Rope Splash, Spinebuster.
Brief description: A volatile and unpredictable competitor, Buzz Sawyer made a handful of appearances in Texas, bringing his high-energy, erratic style to the ring. Though he wasn’t a regular fixture, his chaotic presence left an impression whenever he competed.

Cactus Jack
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Regular competitor in the late 1980s.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card rising star.
Wrestling style: Hardcore brawler with high-risk offense.
Signature moves: Double Arm DDT, Elbow Drop from Apron, Cactus Clothesline.
Brief description: Before becoming a global hardcore legend, Cactus Jack (Mick Foley) gained experience in World Class, where his fearless, unhinged style quickly set him apart. His willingness to take brutal bumps and engage in wild brawls made him a standout in the promotion’s later years.

Chavo Guerrero
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Regular competitor in the late 1970s through the early 1980s.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event.
Wrestling style: Technical high-flyer with lucha libre influences.
Signature moves: Moonsault, Dropkick, German Suplex.
Brief description: A standout from the legendary Guerrero family, Chavo Guerrero was one of the most technically skilled wrestlers in World Class. His smooth, fast-paced offense made him a fan favorite, and his rivalries against both American and lucha-style competitors helped solidify his reputation as a world-class wrestler.

Checkmate
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Regular competitor in the early 1980s.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card masked wrestler.
Wrestling style: Unorthodox technical grappler with a submission focus.
Signature moves: Crossface Chicken Wing, Armbar, Rolling Leglock.
Brief description: A masked enigma in World Class, Checkmate was managed by Percival Pringle III (later known as Paul Bearer). His technical mastery and mysterious persona made him a unique attraction in the Texas territory.

Chic Donovan
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Sporadic appearances in the late 1970s and early 1980s.
Position on the card: Mid-card enhancement talent.
Wrestling style: Power-based showman with a flashy persona.
Signature moves: Powerslam, Elbow Drop, Shoulder Block.
Brief description: A journeyman wrestler with a bodybuilder’s physique, Chic Donovan competed in Texas on occasion, primarily as enhancement talent. His flamboyant look and solid in-ring work made him a recognizable name, though he never ascended to main-event status in World Class.

Chris Adams
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Regular competitor from 1983 to the late 1980s.
Position on the card: Main eventer, major tag team and singles competitor.
Wrestling style: Technical wrestler with judo influences and crisp strikes.
Signature moves: Superkick, Sunset Flip, Enzuigiri, Judo Throws.
Brief description: Known as "Gentleman" Chris Adams, he played a pivotal role in World Class, both as a fan-favorite and a despised heel. His partnership and later rivalry with Gino Hernandez resulted in some of the territory’s most memorable matches. His mentorship of a young Steve Austin in the early 1990s solidified his legacy in wrestling history.

Chris Markoff
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Regular competitor in the 1960s and 1970s.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card heel, tag team specialist.
Wrestling style: Technical and brawling hybrid.
Signature moves: Clawhold, Knee Drop, Bearhug.
Brief description: A well-traveled heel, Chris Markoff often wrestled in Texas as part of villainous factions, including teams with Nikolai Volkoff. His calculated, rule-breaking style made him a strong antagonist in the territory.

Chris Youngblood
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Regular competitor in the late 1980s.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card tag team specialist.
Wrestling style: Agile brawler with a Native American-inspired offense.
Signature moves: Tomahawk Chop, Dropkick, Running Powerslam.
Brief description: As part of the famous Youngblood wrestling family, Chris Youngblood made an impact in the later years of World Class, often teaming with Mark Youngblood. His energetic style and family legacy made him a respected competitor.

Ciclon Negro
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Sporadic appearances in the 1970s.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card heel.
Wrestling style: Brawling powerhouse with technical ability.
Signature moves: Elbow Smash, Bearhug, Clawhold.
Brief description: A tough and rugged competitor, Ciclon Negro wrestled across various NWA territories, including Texas, where his aggressive style and international presence made him a strong mid-card attraction.

Corsica Jean
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Regular competitor in the 1950s and 1960s.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card tag team wrestler.
Wrestling style: Rugged brawler with European influences.
Signature moves: Forearm Smash, Bearhug, Double Team Maneuvers (with Corsica Joe).
Brief description: One-half of the Corsicans, Corsica Jean was a well-traveled tag team specialist who competed in Texas during the territorial era. His roughhouse style and teamwork with Corsica Joe made them a credible heel duo in various NWA territories, including Southwest Sports.

Corsica Joe
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Regular competitor in the 1950s and 1960s.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card tag team wrestler.
Wrestling style: Classic brawler with solid technical fundamentals.
Signature moves: Armbar, Bearhug, Double Team Tactics (with Corsica Jean).
Brief description: A skilled tag team competitor, Corsica Joe, alongside Corsica Jean, formed The Corsicans, a well-respected and feared team in Texas wrestling. Their teamwork and aggressive heel tactics made them a memorable duo in the territory.

Cyclone Anaya
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Regular competitor in the 1950s and 1960s.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card.
Wrestling style: Lucha-influenced technical wrestler.
Signature moves: Flying Headscissors, Dropkick, Arm Drag.
Brief description: A pioneer in bringing lucha libre elements to Texas wrestling, Cyclone Anaya was a respected competitor who thrilled crowds with his high-flying maneuvers. His contributions helped bridge the gap between Mexican and American wrestling styles in the region.

Cyclone Negro
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Regular competitor in the 1960s and 1970s.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card heel.
Wrestling style: Hard-hitting brawler with technical skills.
Signature moves: Elbow Smash, Knee Drop, Bearhug.
Brief description: A feared competitor, Cyclone Negro was known for his no-nonsense, bruising style. He competed in Texas as both a singles wrestler and a tag team competitor, often working as a tough heel against fan-favorite babyfaces.

Dale Lewis
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Regular competitor in the 1960s and early 1970s.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card technical wrestler.
Wrestling style: Amateur-based grappler with submission expertise.
Signature moves: Sleeper Hold, Leglock, Bearhug.
Brief description: A skilled mat wrestler, Dale Lewis was known for his legitimate amateur background and methodical in-ring style. He competed in Texas as a tough, no-nonsense grappler, often testing himself against top babyfaces and rising stars.

Dale Valentine
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Regular competitor in the late 1970s.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card.
Wrestling style: Technical grappler with an aggressive edge.
Signature moves: Figure-Four Leglock, Elbow Drop, Knee Lift.
Brief description: Competing under the Valentine name, Dale Valentine (real name Buddy Roberts) was briefly positioned as part of the famed wrestling lineage. Though he later found greater success as Buddy Roberts in The Fabulous Freebirds, his early Texas career helped him develop his hard-hitting style.

Danny Hodge
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Sporadic appearances in the 1960s.
Position on the card: Main event-level guest star.
Wrestling style: Elite amateur grappler with incredible grip strength.
Signature moves: Oklahoma Roll, Sleeper Hold, Headlock.
Brief description: One of the most dominant amateur wrestlers ever to transition to professional wrestling, Danny Hodge occasionally competed in Texas, where his technical mastery and legitimate toughness made him an awe-inspiring figure. Though not a regular fixture, his rare appearances were highly regarded.

Danny McShain
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Regular competitor from the 1940s through the 1960s.
Position on the card: Main eventer, major regional champion.
Wrestling style: Hard-hitting brawler with technical ability.
Signature moves: Piledriver, Forearm Smash, Clawhold.
Brief description: One of the most infamous heels of his era, Danny McShain was a tough, rugged competitor who held multiple regional titles throughout Texas. His ability to generate heat and his brutal in-ring style made him a major draw during the early days of Southwest Sports.

David Manning
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Regular referee and authority figure from the 1970s through the late 1980s.
Position on the card: Senior referee, match official.
Wrestling style: Not applicable (referee).
Signature moves: Authority enforcement, rule enforcement.
Brief description: One of the most well-known referees in World Class history, David Manning played a crucial role in officiating some of the promotion’s biggest matches. His involvement in key Von Erich storylines and major title bouts made him one of the most respected officials of the territory era.

David Von Erich
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Regular competitor from the mid-1970s until his passing in 1984.
Position on the card: Main eventer, rising NWA World Title contender.
Wrestling style: Gritty brawler with technical fundamentals.
Signature moves: Iron Claw, Belly-to-Belly Suplex, Running Knee Lift.
Brief description: Often seen as the future of the Von Erich family, David was the most well-rounded and considered by many as a future NWA World Champion before his tragic passing in 1984. His feuds with Ric Flair, Jimmy Garvin, and Harley Race showcased his toughness and ability to connect with the crowd.

Dennis Condrey
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Sporadic appearances in the early 1980s.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card tag team competitor.
Wrestling style: Brawling heel with technical ability.
Signature moves: Brainbuster, Elbow Drop, Suplex.
Brief description: Best known for his work in The Midnight Express, Dennis Condrey made brief appearances in Texas, where his tag team expertise and villainous tactics helped him gain national attention. His greatest success came in other territories, but his time in World Class contributed to his rise.

Devastation Inc.
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Regular faction from the early 1980s through the late 1980s.
Position on the card: Top heel stable, dominant faction.
Wrestling style: Power-based, brutal enforcers.
Signature moves: Various (team-dependent).
Brief description: Led by the sinister Skandor Akbar, Devastation Inc. was one of the most feared factions in World Class, featuring a rotating cast of massive, destructive wrestlers. Their goal was simple: annihilate opponents and control the promotion. With members such as Kamala, The Missing Link, and One Man Gang, they were a dominant force throughout the 1980s.

Dick Murdoch
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Regular competitor in the 1970s and sporadic appearances in the 1980s.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event.
Wrestling style: Brawler with technical fundamentals.
Signature moves: Brainbuster, Elbow Drop, Texas Lariat.
Brief description: A rough and tough Texan, Dick Murdoch was a major player in multiple NWA territories, including Texas. His combination of brawling and surprising technical ability made him a formidable opponent. While he was more closely associated with Mid-South and the NWA at large, he made key appearances in World Class, often battling the Von Erichs and other top stars.

Dick Hutton
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Sporadic appearances in the 1950s and 1960s.
Position on the card: Main event-level guest star.
Wrestling style: Amateur wrestling-based grappler.
Signature moves: Side Suplex, Hammerlock, Sleeper Hold.
Brief description: A former NWA World Heavyweight Champion, Dick Hutton was one of the best legitimate wrestlers of his era. His appearances in Texas often saw him face top competition, demonstrating his technical skills in the ring.

Dick Steinborn
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Sporadic appearances in the 1960s and 1970s.
Position on the card: Mid-card technical wrestler.
Wrestling style: Speed-based grappler with scientific holds.
Signature moves: Dropkick, Arm Drag, Rolling Cradle.
Brief description: A second-generation wrestler, Dick Steinborn was a talented journeyman who made occasional appearances in Texas. His technical skills and ability to work with a variety of opponents made him a respected competitor in multiple NWA territories.

Dick The Bruiser
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Sporadic appearances in the 1950s and 1960s.
Position on the card: Main event-level special attraction.
Wrestling style: Power brawler with stiff strikes.
Signature moves: Atomic Drop, Stomach Claw, Piledriver.
Brief description: One of the toughest wrestlers of his time, Dick The Bruiser made select appearances in Texas, bringing his hard-hitting, no-nonsense style to the territory. Though his primary success was in the Midwest, his reputation as a wild brawler followed him wherever he competed.

Dingo Warrior
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Regular competitor in the mid-to-late 1980s.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse with explosive intensity.
Signature moves: Gorilla Press Slam, Running Clothesline, Splash.
Brief description: Before becoming The Ultimate Warrior in WWE, Dingo Warrior built his early career in World Class, developing his intense persona and impressive physique. His Texas run saw him feuding with major stars and quickly rising as a fan favorite.

Dino Bravo
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Sporadic appearances in the 1970s.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card guest star.
Wrestling style: Power-based technical wrestler.
Signature moves: Airplane Spin, Side Suplex, Bearhug.
Brief description: Though best known for his later career in Canada and WWE, Dino Bravo made occasional stops in Texas, where his strength and technical prowess made him a solid competitor against regional stars.

Don Jardine
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Regular competitor in the 1960s and early 1970s.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event.
Wrestling style: Agile big man with high-flying ability.
Signature moves: Top Rope Kneedrop, Flying Elbow, Clawhold.
Brief description: Best known as The Spoiler, Don Jardine was an athletic big man who regularly competed in Texas. His ability to walk the ropes and his mysterious persona made him a top heel in multiple territories, including World Class.

Don Leo Jonathan
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Sporadic appearances in the 1950s and 1960s.
Position on the card: Main event guest star.
Wrestling style: Technical powerhouse with surprising agility.
Signature moves: Bearhug, Airplane Spin, Boston Crab.
Brief description: One of the most well-rounded big men in wrestling history, Don Leo Jonathan made occasional stops in Texas, where his strength and speed amazed audiences. Though he was more closely associated with other NWA territories, his Texas appearances further cemented his legendary reputation.

Don Slatton
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Regular competitor in the 1960s and 1970s.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card, occasional promoter.
Wrestling style: Rugged brawler with power-based offense.
Signature moves: Bearhug, Piledriver, Stomach Claw.
Brief description: Known as "Dirty" Don Slatton, he was a Texas wrestling veteran who competed in and promoted events throughout the region. His no-nonsense style and experience made him a tough competitor against both local and traveling stars.

Dory Dixon
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Regular competitor in the 1950s and 1960s.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event.
Wrestling style: Athletic, high-energy powerhouse.
Signature moves: Dropkick, Bearhug, Flying Headscissors.
Brief description: One of the first major Black wrestling stars in Texas, Dory Dixon thrilled fans with his agility and strength. His impressive physique and exciting in-ring style made him a top babyface in the territory.

Dory Funk Jr.
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Sporadic appearances from the 1960s through the 1980s.
Position on the card: Main event guest star.
Wrestling style: Technical and methodical grappler.
Signature moves: Spinning Toe Hold, Belly-to-Back Suplex, European Uppercut.
Brief description: A former NWA World Heavyweight Champion, Dory Funk Jr. made various appearances in Texas, defending his title and engaging in technical wrestling clinics. Though primarily associated with the Amarillo territory, his matches in World Class were highly regarded.

Doug Gilbert
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Regular competitor in the 1960s and early 1970s.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card heel.
Wrestling style: Technical grappler with brawling elements.
Signature moves: Piledriver, Sleeper Hold, Elbow Drop.
Brief description: Not to be confused with the later Doug Gilbert of USWA, this Doug Gilbert was a skilled heel wrestler who competed regularly in Texas. His technical ability and ability to draw heat made him a solid antagonist in the territory.

Doug Somers
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Sporadic appearances in the early 1980s.
Position on the card: Mid-card heel.
Wrestling style: Rugged brawler with tag team experience.
Signature moves: Elbow Drop, Knee Lift, Piledriver.
Brief description: Best known for his work in the AWA, Doug Somers made brief stops in Texas, where he worked as a reliable mid-card heel. Though not a major player in World Class, his in-ring toughness made him a solid opponent for rising stars.

Duke Keomuka
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Regular competitor in the 1950s and 1960s.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event heel.
Wrestling style: Technical grappler with Japanese martial arts influence.
Signature moves: Nerve Hold, Judo Chops, Sleeper Hold.
Brief description: A respected and feared heel, Duke Keomuka brought a hard-hitting and technical style to Texas wrestling. His rivalries with top babyfaces helped establish him as one of the premier villains in the territory.

Dusek Brothers
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Regular tag team competitors in the 1950s and 1960s.
Position on the card: Main event tag team.
Wrestling style: Rule-breaking brawlers with technical expertise.
Signature moves: Double Team Stomach Claw, Forearm Smash, Illegal Tactics.
Brief description: Known as "The Nebraska Terrorists," the Dusek Brothers were one of the most hated teams in early Texas wrestling. Their roughhouse style and willingness to bend the rules made them a dominant force in tag team competition.

Dustin Rhodes
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Sporadic appearances in the late 1980s.
Position on the card: Mid-card rising star.
Wrestling style: Technical and brawler hybrid.
Signature moves: Bulldog, Lariat, Atomic Drop.
Brief description: Before becoming "The Natural" in WCW and later "Goldust" in WWE, Dustin Rhodes made early career appearances in Texas, following in his father Dusty Rhodes’ footsteps. His natural athleticism and technical ability made him a promising young competitor in World Class.

Dusty Rhodes
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Sporadic appearances in the 1970s and 1980s.
Position on the card: Main event guest star.
Wrestling style: Power-based brawler with incredible charisma.
Signature moves: Bionic Elbow, Figure-Four Leglock, Running Elbow Smash.
Brief description: "The American Dream" Dusty Rhodes was a massive star in wrestling, and although his primary territories were Florida and Jim Crockett Promotions, he made guest appearances in Texas. His larger-than-life promos and crowd connection made him a beloved figure wherever he wrestled.

Dusty Wolfe
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Regular competitor in the early-to-mid 1980s.
Position on the card: Lower mid-card enhancement talent.
Wrestling style: Basic technical grappler.
Signature moves: Arm Drag, Dropkick, Sleeper Hold.
Brief description: A well-traveled journeyman, Dusty Wolfe competed frequently in Texas as an enhancement talent, helping build up rising stars. Though never a main-event player, his reliability in the ring made him a valuable figure in the territory.

Dutch Mantell
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Sporadic appearances in the early 1980s.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card brawler.
Wrestling style: Technical grappler with roughhouse tactics.
Signature moves: Double Axe Handle, Gutwrench Suplex, Clawhold.
Brief description: A tough and skilled competitor, Dutch Mantell occasionally wrestled in Texas, bringing his experience from various NWA territories. His old-school, gritty style made him a respected opponent in any promotion he worked.

Dynamic Duo
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Regular tag team in the mid-1980s.
Position on the card: Main event heel tag team.
Wrestling style: Technical and brawling mix.
Signature moves: Double Team Superkick, Stalling Suplex, Illegal Tactics.
Brief description: The Dynamic Duo, consisting of Gino Hernandez and Chris Adams, was one of the most hated tag teams in World Class history. Their feuds with The Von Erichs produced some of the most memorable angles, including the infamous hair vs. hair match that cemented their villainous legacy.

Ed Francis
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Regular competitor in the 1950s and 1960s.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card.
Wrestling style: Technical grappler with strong fundamentals.
Signature moves: Arm Drag, Headlock, Sleeper Hold.
Brief description: Ed Francis was a respected wrestler who competed in Texas before transitioning into promoting in Hawaii. His technical skills and classic wrestling approach made him a solid fixture in the early years of Southwest Sports.

Ed Lewis
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Sporadic appearances in the 1940s and early 1950s.
Position on the card: Main event-level guest star.
Wrestling style: Catch wrestling specialist.
Signature moves: Headlock, Grapevine Pin, Hammerlock.
Brief description: Known as "Strangler" Ed Lewis, he was one of the most dominant wrestlers of the early 20th century. While his prime years were before the territory system fully formed, he made occasional stops in Texas, demonstrating his elite grappling ability.

Eddie Graham
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Regular competitor in the 1950s.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card.
Wrestling style: Technical grappler with a focus on submissions.
Signature moves: Sleeper Hold, Boston Crab, Elbow Smash.
Brief description: Before becoming one of wrestling’s most influential promoters in Florida, Eddie Graham was a successful in-ring competitor, including a strong run in Texas. His technical prowess and ability to connect with audiences made him a respected figure.

Eddie Mansfield
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Regular competitor in the late 1970s and early 1980s.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card heel.
Wrestling style: Cocky showman with technical ability.
Signature moves: Figure-Four Leglock, Elbow Drop, Suplex.
Brief description: A controversial figure in wrestling history, Eddie Mansfield had a solid run in Texas as an arrogant heel. Later, he became infamous for exposing wrestling’s secrets on national television, which made him a polarizing figure in the industry.

El Bracero
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Regular competitor in the late 1970s and early 1980s.
Position on the card: Mid-card babyface.
Wrestling style: Lucha libre-inspired technical wrestling.
Signature moves: Flying Crossbody, Arm Drag, Dropkick.
Brief description: A popular masked luchador in Texas, El Bracero brought the excitement of lucha libre to World Class, thrilling fans with his high-flying offense. Though never a main-event star, he was a solid mid-card attraction, often battling both American and Mexican competitors.

El Diablo
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Sporadic appearances in the 1960s and 1970s.
Position on the card: Mid-card masked heel.
Wrestling style: Brawler with a mix of lucha elements.
Signature moves: Clawhold, Stomach Claw, Knee Drop.
Brief description: A masked villain who competed in Texas, El Diablo was often used as a mysterious antagonist in various promotions. His intimidating presence and underhanded tactics made him a solid heel attraction.

El Halcon
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Regular competitor in the 1970s.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card babyface.
Wrestling style: Lucha libre high-flyer with technical skills.
Signature moves: Flying Crossbody, Sunset Flip, Dropkick.
Brief description: A talented luchador, El Halcon competed regularly in Texas, bringing his high-flying lucha libre style to American audiences. His matches were fast-paced and exciting, making him a popular figure in the territory.

El Mongol
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Regular competitor in the 1960s and early 1970s.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event heel.
Wrestling style: Hard-hitting brawler with martial arts influences.
Signature moves: Clawhold, Nerve Hold, Chops.
Brief description: A dominant heel in multiple NWA territories, El Mongol brought an aura of mystery and intimidation to Texas wrestling. His brutal style and unorthodox offense made him a feared competitor.

El Sicodelico
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Sporadic appearances in the 1970s.
Position on the card: Mid-card masked luchador.
Wrestling style: Lucha libre with technical precision.
Signature moves: Monkey Flip, Rolling Cradle, Arm Drag.
Brief description: The brother of Mil Mascaras and Dos Caras, El Sicodelico wrestled in Texas on occasion, showcasing the family’s signature high-flying style. Though not a mainstay, his unique persona and wrestling ability left an impression on fans.

Eli The Eliminator
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Regular competitor in the mid-to-late 1980s.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card enforcer.
Wrestling style: Power-based brawler with intense aggression.
Signature moves: Powerslam, Shoulder Block, Clothesline.
Brief description: A physically imposing competitor, Eli The Eliminator was often used as a menacing heel in World Class. His brute strength and intimidating presence made him a solid threat in both singles and tag team competition.

Enrique Torres
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Regular competitor in the 1950s and 1960s.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event babyface.
Wrestling style: Technical grappler with strong fundamentals.
Signature moves: Arm Drag, Sleeper Hold, Rolling Cradle.
Brief description: A highly respected technical wrestler, Enrique Torres was a major star in the 1950s, known for his smooth mat wrestling and ability to put on high-quality matches. He frequently competed in Texas, where his scientific style was admired by fans.

Eric Embry
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Regular competitor in the late 1980s.
Position on the card: Mid-card to main event babyface and booker.
Wrestling style: Technical and brawling hybrid.
Signature moves: Piledriver, Superkick, DDT.
Brief description: Eric Embry played a key role in World Class during its final years, both as an in-ring performer and booker. His feuds with Devastation Inc. and General Skandor Akbar helped shape the promotion’s last major storylines before its transition into the USWA.

Ernie Ladd
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Sporadic appearances in the 1970s.
Position on the card: Main event guest star.
Wrestling style: Power-based heel with technical ability.
Signature moves: Big Boot, Elbow Drop, Thumb to the Throat.
Brief description: "The Big Cat" Ernie Ladd was a dominant heel in multiple NWA territories, including Texas, where his towering presence and incredible promo skills made him a feared competitor. Though his appearances in World Class were limited, he always made an impact whenever he stepped into the ring.

Fabulous Freebirds
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Regular faction from the early 1980s to the late 1980s.
Position on the card: Main event faction.
Wrestling style: Brawling and psychological warfare.
Signature moves: Double DDT, Superkick, Piledriver.
Brief description: One of the greatest factions in wrestling history, The Fabulous Freebirds (Michael Hayes, Terry Gordy, and Buddy Roberts) were the arch-rivals of the Von Erich family. Their intense feuds, innovative use of entrance music, and ability to generate heat made them one of the most important acts in World Class history.

Fabulous Kangaroos
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Regular tag team in the 1960s.
Position on the card: Main event tag team.
Wrestling style: Technical and brawling tag team specialists.
Signature moves: Boomerang Double Team Move, Sleeper Hold, Forearm Smash.
Brief description: One of the most influential tag teams in wrestling history, The Fabulous Kangaroos (Al Costello and Roy Heffernan) were major attractions in Texas. Their arrogant, Australian-themed persona and strong in-ring work made them a top heel team in the territory.

Fabulous Moolah
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Sporadic appearances from the 1950s through the 1980s.
Position on the card: Women’s division main eventer.
Wrestling style: Rule-breaking heel grappler.
Signature moves: Hair Mare, Backbreaker, Sleeper Hold.
Brief description: The most dominant female wrestler of her era, Fabulous Moolah made occasional stops in Texas, often defending her NWA Women’s Championship. Her ability to generate heat and control women’s wrestling for decades made her a controversial but significant figure.

Fantastics
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Regular tag team in the mid-to-late 1980s.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event babyface tag team.
Wrestling style: Fast-paced, high-flying tag team wrestling.
Signature moves: Double Dropkick, Sunset Flip, Crossbody.
Brief description: The Fantastics (Bobby Fulton & Tommy Rogers) were one of the most exciting tag teams of the 1980s, competing in World Class as top rivals to The Midnight Express and other heel duos. Their athleticism and underdog appeal made them fan favorites in Texas.

Frank Dusek
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Regular competitor in the 1970s and early 1980s.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card heel.
Wrestling style: Technical grappler with classic heel tactics.
Signature moves: Figure-Four Leglock, Suplex, Knee Drop.
Brief description: A member of the famous Dusek wrestling family, Frank Dusek was a reliable heel in Texas wrestling. He later became a commentator and behind-the-scenes figure in World Class, contributing to the business in multiple ways.

Frank Goodish (Bruiser Brody)
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Regular competitor from the late 1970s to 1988.
Position on the card: Main eventer, wild brawler, special attraction.
Wrestling style: Hardcore brawler with erratic offense and unmatched intensity.
Signature moves: Running Big Boot, Jumping Knee Drop, Piledriver, Brawling Strikes.
Brief description: Under his real name, Frank Goodish wrestled in Texas before becoming world-famous as Bruiser Brody. His unchained, unpredictable style made him one of the most respected and feared wrestlers of his generation.

Fred Blassie
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Sporadic appearances in the 1950s and 1960s.
Position on the card: Main event heel.
Wrestling style: Rule-breaking brawler with technical ability.
Signature moves: Stomach Claw, Bite to Forehead, Loaded Boot Stomp.
Brief description: Known as "Classy" Freddie Blassie, he was one of the most hated heels in wrestling history. Though he primarily worked in California and the WWWF, he made sporadic stops in Texas, where his vicious tactics and arrogant persona made him a feared competitor.

Fritz Von Erich
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1953–1982 (Regular competitor, promoter from 1966 onward).
Position on the card: Main eventer (as a wrestler), top promoter (post-wrestling career).
Wrestling style: Power-based brawler with strong mat wrestling fundamentals.
Signature moves: Iron Claw, Body Slam, Knee Lift, Stomach Claw.
Brief description: A dominant force in Texas wrestling, Fritz Von Erich began as a top heel using the feared "Iron Claw." His career transitioned into promoting, where he turned World Class Championship Wrestling into a globally recognized brand. As a wrestler, he regularly headlined in Dallas' Sportatorium and feuded with top stars like Johnny Valentine and The Sheik before shifting focus to building a legacy for his sons and World Class.

Funk Brothers
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Sporadic appearances from the 1960s through the 1980s.
Position on the card: Main event tag team.
Wrestling style: Technical wrestling with a brawling mix.
Signature moves: Spinning Toe Hold, Double Suplex, Forearm Smash.
Brief description: Consisting of Dory Funk Jr. and Terry Funk, the Funk Brothers were a legendary tag team that occasionally appeared in Texas, engaging in high-profile feuds and showcasing their world-class technical wrestling skills.

Gary Hart
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Regular manager from the 1970s through the late 1980s.
Position on the card: Lead heel manager.
Wrestling style: Psychological warfare, interference tactics.
Signature moves: Managerial distractions, foreign object use, promo expertise.
Brief description: One of the most influential managers in wrestling history, Gary Hart led numerous top heels in World Class, including The Great Kabuki, The Spoiler, and The Dynamic Duo (Gino Hernandez & Chris Adams). His promo skills, ability to generate heat, and strategic mind made him a key figure in Texas wrestling.

Gary Young
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Regular competitor in the late 1980s.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card.
Wrestling style: Technical and brawling hybrid.
Signature moves: DDT, Suplex, Clothesline.
Brief description: A talented worker who competed in World Class during its later years, Gary Young was known for his solid in-ring ability and ability to adapt to different opponents. He was often featured in storylines as a tough competitor against rising stars.

Gene Kiniski
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Sporadic appearances in the 1960s and 1970s.
Position on the card: Main event guest star.
Wrestling style: Power-based technical grappler.
Signature moves: Bearhug, Canadian Backbreaker, Shoulder Block.
Brief description: A former NWA World Heavyweight Champion, Gene Kiniski occasionally wrestled in Texas, defending his title and taking on the region’s top stars. His hard-hitting style and brash attitude made him a natural heel wherever he competed.

Genichiro Tenryu
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Sporadic appearances in the early 1980s.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event guest star.
Wrestling style: Strong style striker with technical ability.
Signature moves: Powerbomb, Enzuigiri, Folding Powerbomb.
Brief description: A Japanese wrestling legend, Genichiro Tenryu made brief stops in Texas as part of his early international experience before becoming one of Japan’s most respected wrestlers. His hard-hitting offense and disciplined approach made him a standout whenever he competed in World Class.

George Harris
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Regular manager and occasional wrestler in the 1960s and 1970s.
Position on the card: Heel manager and occasional in-ring competitor.
Wrestling style: Rule-breaking brawler (limited in-ring action).
Signature moves: Managerial interference, foreign object use, distraction tactics.
Brief description: A longtime manager and heel personality, George Harris was known for leading various rule-breaking wrestlers in Texas. His ability to generate crowd heat made him an effective manager in the territory system.

George Scott
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Regular competitor in the 1950s and 1960s.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card, later booker.
Wrestling style: Technical grappler with strong fundamentals.
Signature moves: Arm Drag, Sleeper Hold, Suplex.
Brief description: A respected wrestler in Texas, George Scott competed regularly before transitioning into a major backstage role as a booker. Though he later became best known for his work behind the scenes in Mid-Atlantic and WWE, his Texas wrestling tenure helped shape his knowledge of the business.

Giant Baba
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Sporadic appearances in the 1970s.
Position on the card: Main event guest star.
Wrestling style: Power-based strong style.
Signature moves: Big Boot, Chops, Neckbreaker Drop.
Brief description: A Japanese wrestling icon, Giant Baba made occasional appearances in Texas as part of his international tours. His size and technical ability made him a unique attraction, and his matches were highly anticipated whenever he competed in the region.

Gino Hernandez
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Regular competitor from the late 1970s to 1986.
Position on the card: Main event heel.
Wrestling style: Technical and charismatic heel with aerial ability.
Signature moves: Superkick, Flying Crossbody, Piledriver.
Brief description: One of the greatest heels in World Class history, Gino Hernandez was a major force in the promotion. His partnership with Chris Adams as the "Dynamic Duo" led to one of the most memorable feuds with the Von Erichs. His tragic passing in 1986 cut short a career that many believed had world championship potential.

Gorgeous George
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Sporadic appearances in the 1940s and 1950s.
Position on the card: Main event attraction.
Wrestling style: Theatrical showman with technical wrestling ability.
Signature moves: Spinning Toe Hold, Sleeper Hold, Rolling Arm Drag.
Brief description: One of the most influential wrestlers of all time, Gorgeous George revolutionized professional wrestling with his flamboyant persona. Though primarily known for his national appeal, he made special appearances in Texas, where his arrogance and unique presentation drew massive heat from audiences.

Gory Guerrero
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Regular competitor in the 1950s and 1960s.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card technical wrestler.
Wrestling style: Lucha libre pioneer with mat wrestling expertise.
Signature moves: Gory Special, Camel Clutch, Backbreaker.
Brief description: A patriarch of the legendary Guerrero family, Gory Guerrero was one of the most skilled and respected luchadores of his era. His technical skills and innovative maneuvers influenced generations of wrestlers, and he was a key figure in introducing lucha libre elements to Texas wrestling.

Great Goliath
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Sporadic appearances in the 1970s.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card tag team specialist.
Wrestling style: Power-based brawler with technical skills.
Signature moves: Bearhug, Big Boot, Double Team Maneuvers (with Black Gordman).
Brief description: One-half of the feared tag team with Black Gordman, Great Goliath made occasional appearances in Texas, bringing his rough, physical style to the ring. His chemistry with Gordman made them one of the most successful Latino tag teams of their era.

Great Kabuki
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Regular competitor in the early-to-mid 1980s.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event heel.
Wrestling style: Martial arts-based mysterious striker.
Signature moves: Green Mist, Thrust Kick, Clawhold.
Brief description: Managed by Gary Hart, The Great Kabuki was one of World Class’ most unique and feared competitors. His use of mist, unorthodox offense, and aura of mystery made him a top heel in the territory, feuding with The Von Erichs and other fan favorites.

Grizzly Smith
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Regular competitor in the 1960s and 1970s.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card, later road agent.
Wrestling style: Power-based brawler.
Signature moves: Bearhug, Big Boot, Forearm Smash.
Brief description: A towering presence in Texas wrestling, Grizzly Smith was a respected veteran who later transitioned into a behind-the-scenes role as a road agent. Best known as the father of Jake "The Snake" Roberts, he played a key part in the Texas wrestling scene both in and out of the ring.

Harley Race
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Sporadic appearances in the 1970s and early 1980s.
Position on the card: Main event guest star, NWA World Champion.
Wrestling style: Hard-hitting technical brawler.
Signature moves: Piledriver, Diving Headbutt, Vertical Suplex.
Brief description: One of the greatest NWA World Champions of all time, Harley Race defended the title multiple times in Texas, battling top stars like Fritz Von Erich and later Kerry Von Erich. His gritty in-ring style and ability to work with any opponent made his appearances in World Class highly significant.

Hector Guerrero
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Sporadic appearances in the early 1980s.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card.
Wrestling style: Lucha libre-influenced technical wrestling.
Signature moves: Dropkick, Flying Crossbody, Arm Drag.
Brief description: Part of the legendary Guerrero wrestling family, Hector Guerrero made occasional stops in Texas, showcasing his athletic and high-flying offense. Though his biggest successes came later in other territories, his early Texas work helped establish his name.

Hercules Hernandez
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Regular competitor in the early-to-mid 1980s.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event heel.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse with technical ability.
Signature moves: Torture Rack, Power Slam, Clothesline.
Brief description: A physically imposing competitor, Hercules Hernandez was a dominant force in World Class before moving on to national success. Often managed by Skandor Akbar, he was a key player in feuds against top Texas babyfaces, using his incredible strength to overpower opponents.

Hiro Matsuda
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Sporadic appearances in the 1960s and 1970s.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card technical wrestler.
Wrestling style: Japanese strong style with submission expertise.
Signature moves: Japanese Armbar, Sleeper Hold, Dropkick.
Brief description: A legendary trainer and technical master, Hiro Matsuda wrestled occasionally in Texas, where his precise technique and submission-based offense made him a respected competitor. Though more famous for training stars like Hulk Hogan, his in-ring ability made him a tough opponent in any territory.

Iceman King Parsons
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Regular competitor in the early-to-late 1980s.
Position on the card: Mid-card to main event babyface and heel.
Wrestling style: Agile brawler with charisma.
Signature moves: Butt Butt (Jumping Headbutt), Dropkick, Powerslam.
Brief description: One of the most charismatic stars in World Class history, Iceman King Parsons was a beloved babyface before turning heel and aligning with The Freebirds. His energy, promo skills, and in-ring ability made him a key figure in the Von Erich-Freebird war and later rivalries.

Iron Sheik
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Sporadic appearances in the late 1970s and early 1980s.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event heel.
Wrestling style: Technical and power-based grappling.
Signature moves: Camel Clutch, Gutwrench Suplex, Belly-to-Belly Suplex.
Brief description: Before achieving global fame in WWE, The Iron Sheik competed in Texas, where his legitimate amateur wrestling background and anti-American persona made him a strong heel. His technical ability and toughness made him a credible challenger against top Texas stars.

Ivan Putski
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Regular competitor in the 1970s.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card powerhouse babyface.
Wrestling style: Strength-based brawler with power moves.
Signature moves: Polish Hammer, Bearhug, Press Slam.
Brief description: A beloved strongman wrestler, Ivan Putski was a major babyface in Texas, thrilling fans with his incredible strength and crowd-friendly personality. His matches often featured hard-hitting power moves, and his Polish heritage made him a fan favorite.

Jack Adkisson (Fritz Von Erich)
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1953–1982 (Regular competitor, promoter from 1966 onward).
Position on the card: Main eventer (as a wrestler), top promoter (post-wrestling career).
Wrestling style: Power-based brawler with strong mat wrestling fundamentals.
Signature moves: Iron Claw, Body Slam, Knee Lift, Stomach Claw.
Brief description: As the legendary Fritz Von Erich, Jack Adkisson was one of the most dominant stars in Texas wrestling. His feared Iron Claw hold and powerful persona made him a major attraction before transitioning into promoting, where he turned World Class Championship Wrestling into a global brand.

Jack Brisco
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Sporadic appearances in the 1970s.
Position on the card: Main event guest star, NWA World Champion.
Wrestling style: Elite technical grappler.
Signature moves: Figure-Four Leglock, Belly-to-Belly Suplex, Oklahoma Roll.
Brief description: One of the greatest technical wrestlers of all time, Jack Brisco defended the NWA World Heavyweight Championship in Texas, bringing his smooth, amateur-based wrestling skills to the ring. His battles against top Texas stars helped elevate the prestige of the championship in the region.

Jack Victory
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Regular competitor in the late 1980s.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card heel.
Wrestling style: Power-based brawler with technical ability.
Signature moves: Spinebuster, Powerbomb, Clothesline.
Brief description: A reliable heel, Jack Victory wrestled in World Class during its later years, often working in tag team competition and as an enforcer-style villain. Though he found greater fame in Jim Crockett Promotions and ECW, his Texas tenure helped build his reputation as a solid in-ring competitor.

Jake Roberts
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Regular competitor in the early 1980s.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card.
Wrestling style: Psychological tactician with technical fundamentals.
Signature moves: DDT, Short-Arm Clothesline, Knee Lift.
Brief description: Before achieving stardom in WWE, Jake "The Snake" Roberts honed his craft in Texas, where his methodical pace and cerebral approach made him stand out. His early work in World Class helped develop the in-ring psychology that later made him one of the most compelling characters in wrestling history.

Jay Youngblood
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Sporadic appearances in the early 1980s.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card babyface.
Wrestling style: Agile, technical wrestler with a Native American-inspired persona.
Signature moves: Tomahawk Chop, Flying Crossbody, Sunset Flip.
Brief description: Best known for his work in the NWA Mid-Atlantic region, Jay Youngblood made occasional stops in Texas, where his speed and technical ability made him a fan favorite. His work in tag team wrestling, particularly with Ricky Steamboat, earned him recognition as one of the most exciting performers of his era.

Jeep Swenson
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Regular competitor in the mid-to-late 1980s.
Position on the card: Mid-card powerhouse.
Wrestling style: Monster heel with brute strength.
Signature moves: Bearhug, Powerbomb, Running Splash.
Brief description: A massive powerhouse, Jeep Swenson was billed as one of the strongest men in wrestling during his time in World Class. His size and strength made him an imposing force, though he was often used as an attraction rather than a top competitor.

Jeff Gaylord
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Regular competitor in the late 1980s.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card.
Wrestling style: Power-based brawler with some technical skills.
Signature moves: Powerslam, Shoulder Block, Dropkick.
Brief description: A physically impressive competitor, Jeff Gaylord worked in World Class during its later years, often competing against rising stars. Though he never reached main-event status, his look and athletic ability made him a notable figure in the promotion.

Jerry Brown
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Regular competitor in the 1970s.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card tag team wrestler.
Wrestling style: Technical and brawling mix.
Signature moves: Double Suplex, Dropkick, Arm Drag.
Brief description: Best known as one-half of The Hollywood Blonds with Buddy Roberts, Jerry Brown was a solid tag team competitor in Texas. Their flashy persona and in-ring ability made them an effective heel duo in multiple territories, including World Class.

Jerry Kozak
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Regular competitor in the 1960s and 1970s.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card.
Wrestling style: Technical grappler with power-based offense.
Signature moves: Bearhug, Elbow Smash, Body Slam.
Brief description: A respected competitor, Jerry Kozak was a steady presence in Texas wrestling, often working with or against some of the best talent of his era. His versatility allowed him to compete in both singles and tag team matches.

Jerry Lawler
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Sporadic appearances in the 1980s.
Position on the card: Main event guest star.
Wrestling style: Brawling and technical mix with psychology-driven matches.
Signature moves: Fist Drop, Piledriver, Sleeper Hold.
Brief description: Though primarily associated with Memphis wrestling, Jerry "The King" Lawler made occasional stops in Texas, where his legendary promo skills and in-ring intelligence made him a compelling attraction. His appearances often involved cross-territory rivalries and championship defenses.

Jerry Oates
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Sporadic appearances in the 1970s and early 1980s.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card.
Wrestling style: Classic technical wrestler with solid fundamentals.
Signature moves: Sleeper Hold, Suplex, Dropkick.
Brief description: A well-rounded competitor, Jerry Oates had brief runs in Texas where his technical prowess and work ethic made him a solid addition to the roster. His biggest success came in the tag team division in other NWA territories.

Jesse Barr
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Sporadic appearances in the early 1980s.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card technical wrestler.
Wrestling style: Amateur-based technical grappler.
Signature moves: Belly-to-Belly Suplex, Figure-Four Leglock, Dropkick.
Brief description: A highly skilled technician, Jesse Barr made brief appearances in Texas before gaining national fame in Florida and WWE as Jimmy Jack Funk. His strong amateur background and crisp execution made him a respected competitor.

Jim Cornette
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Sporadic managerial appearances in the mid-to-late 1980s.
Position on the card: Heel manager.
Wrestling style: Psychological manipulation and interference tactics.
Signature moves: Tennis Racket Attack, Distraction, Verbal Taunts.
Brief description: One of the most infamous managers in wrestling history, Jim Cornette made occasional appearances in Texas, usually accompanying The Midnight Express. His sharp wit, loudmouth persona, and constant interference made him one of the most hated figures in any territory he worked in.

Jim Dillon (J.J. Dillon)
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Sporadic appearances in the 1970s.
Position on the card: Mid-card heel, later manager.
Wrestling style: Technical wrestler with a focus on psychology.
Signature moves: Figure-Four Leglock, Knee Drop, Distraction Tactics.
Brief description: Before becoming the legendary manager of the Four Horsemen, J.J. Dillon wrestled in various NWA territories, including Texas. Though his in-ring career was not as notable as his managerial work, his appearances in World Class helped establish him as a credible heel personality.

Jim Duggan
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Sporadic appearances in the early 1980s.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card babyface.
Wrestling style: Power-based brawler.
Signature moves: Three-Point Stance Clothesline, Powerslam, Running Knee Drop.
Brief description: Before achieving stardom in Mid-South and WWE, "Hacksaw" Jim Duggan made occasional appearances in Texas, showcasing his toughness and hard-hitting style. Though his time in World Class was brief, his charisma and intensity were evident.

Jim Garvin (Jimmy Garvin)
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Regular competitor in the early-to-mid 1980s.
Position on the card: Mid-card to main event heel.
Wrestling style: Technical and flamboyant showman.
Signature moves: Brainbuster, Sleeper Hold, Flying Crossbody.
Brief description: As "Gorgeous" Jimmy Garvin, he was one of the most charismatic heels in World Class. Managed by Precious, Garvin feuded with the Von Erichs and other top babyfaces, using his arrogance and in-ring ability to generate major heat from Texas crowds.

Jim Neidhart
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Sporadic appearances in the early 1980s.
Position on the card: Mid-card powerhouse.
Wrestling style: Strength-based brawler with amateur wrestling experience.
Signature moves: Powerslam, Shoulder Block, Bearhug.
Brief description: Before gaining fame as one-half of The Hart Foundation in WWE, Jim "The Anvil" Neidhart made appearances in Texas, showcasing his raw power and intensity. Though not a major player in World Class, his Texas tenure helped him gain experience before his national breakout.

Jimmy Garvin (Gorgeous Jimmy Garvin)
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Regular competitor in the early-to-mid 1980s.
Position on the card: Mid-card to main event heel.
Wrestling style: Technical and flamboyant showman.
Signature moves: Brainbuster, Sleeper Hold, Flying Crossbody.
Brief description: As "Gorgeous" Jimmy Garvin, he was one of the most charismatic heels in World Class. Managed by Precious, Garvin feuded with the Von Erichs and other top babyfaces, using his arrogance and in-ring ability to generate major heat from Texas crowds.

Jimmy Golden
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Sporadic appearances in the 1970s.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card.
Wrestling style: Classic Southern-style grappler.
Signature moves: Bulldog, Knee Drop, Sleeper Hold.
Brief description: A member of the Fuller wrestling family, Jimmy Golden made occasional stops in Texas, bringing his solid technical and brawling skills to the ring. Though better known for his work in Southeastern wrestling, his Texas appearances helped round out his experience.

Jimmy Snuka
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Sporadic appearances in the late 1970s.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card.
Wrestling style: High-flying powerhouse.
Signature moves: Superfly Splash, Headbutt, Flying Crossbody.
Brief description: Before his rise to stardom in WWE, Jimmy "Superfly" Snuka competed in various NWA territories, including Texas. His blend of aerial offense and raw power made him a unique attraction whenever he wrestled in World Class.

Jimmy Valiant
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Sporadic appearances in the late 1970s and early 1980s.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card.
Wrestling style: Wild brawler with showmanship.
Signature moves: Elbow Drop, Sleeper Hold, Piledriver.
Brief description: "The Boogie Woogie Man" Jimmy Valiant was a popular, eccentric wrestler who occasionally appeared in Texas, bringing his wild charisma and fan-friendly antics to the territory.

J.J. Dillon
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Sporadic appearances in the 1970s.
Position on the card: Mid-card heel, later manager.
Wrestling style: Technical wrestler with a focus on psychology.
Signature moves: Figure-Four Leglock, Knee Drop, Distraction Tactics.
Brief description: Before becoming the legendary manager of the Four Horsemen, J.J. Dillon wrestled in various NWA territories, including Texas. Though his in-ring career was not as notable as his managerial work, his appearances in World Class helped establish him as a credible heel personality.

Joe Blanchard
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Regular competitor in the 1950s and 1960s.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card babyface.
Wrestling style: Technical grappler with a power-based offense.
Signature moves: Bearhug, Suplex, Boston Crab.
Brief description: A respected wrestler and later a promoter, Joe Blanchard competed in Texas as a skilled technician before focusing on promoting Southwest Championship Wrestling. His contributions to wrestling extended beyond the ring, as he helped develop future stars, including his son, Tully Blanchard.

Joe LeDuc
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Sporadic appearances in the 1970s.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event powerhouse.
Wrestling style: Power brawler with a fearsome persona.
Signature moves: Bearhug, Running Powerslam, Forearm Smash.
Brief description: A Canadian strongman with a wild, unpredictable style, Joe LeDuc occasionally competed in Texas, bringing his intense, hard-hitting approach to the ring. Though his primary success was in other NWA territories, his Texas appearances left a lasting impact.

Joe Scarpa
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Sporadic appearances in the 1960s.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card babyface.
Wrestling style: Technical and power-based grappling.
Signature moves: Tomahawk Chop, Sleeper Hold, Bearhug.
Brief description: Before becoming "Chief Jay Strongbow" in WWE, Joe Scarpa was a well-respected wrestler who made occasional stops in Texas. His strong technical foundation and in-ring storytelling made him a solid competitor wherever he performed.

Joe Parelli
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Not verified.
Position on the card: Not applicable.
Wrestling style: Not applicable.
Signature moves: Not applicable.
Brief description: No verified information is available regarding Joe Parelli's involvement with the specified promotions.

Joe Pazandak
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Not verified.
Position on the card: Not applicable.
Wrestling style: Technical.
Signature moves: Not specified.
Brief description: Joe Pazandak, born in 1914 in Minneapolis, Minnesota, was an accomplished amateur wrestler before turning professional in 1937. He gained prominence in Los Angeles in the early 1950s, notably holding the NWA "Beat the Champ" Television Championship for nine months. Pazandak also contributed to the wrestling world as a trainer, coaching notable wrestlers such as Verne Gagne.

Joe Pizza
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Not verified.
Position on the card: Not applicable.
Wrestling style: Not applicable.
Signature moves: Not applicable.
Brief description: No verified information is available regarding Joe Pizza's involvement with the specified promotions.

Joe Pizzatola
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Not verified.
Position on the card: Not applicable.
Wrestling style: Not applicable.
Signature moves: Not applicable.
Brief description: No verified information is available regarding Joe Pizzatola's involvement with the specified promotions.

Joe Scarpa
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Not verified.
Position on the card: Not applicable.
Wrestling style: Not applicable.
Signature moves: Not applicable.
Brief description: Joe Scarpa, better known as Chief Jay Strongbow, was a prominent wrestler known for his time in the World Wide Wrestling Federation (WWWF). However, there is no verified information regarding his involvement with the specified promotions.

Joe Tangaro
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Not verified.
Position on the card: Not applicable.
Wrestling style: Not applicable.
Signature moves: Not applicable.
Brief description: No verified information is available regarding Joe Tangaro's involvement with the specified promotions.

Joe Turco
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Not verified.
Position on the card: Not applicable.
Wrestling style: Not applicable.
Signature moves: Not applicable.
Brief description: Joe Turco was known for his work as a heel in various wrestling promotions during the 1960s and 1970s, particularly in WWWF. However, no verified records confirm his involvement in the specified promotions.

Joe Walcott
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Not verified.
Position on the card: Not applicable.
Wrestling style: Not applicable.
Signature moves: Not applicable.
Brief description: No verified information is available regarding Joe Walcott's involvement with the specified promotions.

Joey Aitken
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Not verified.
Position on the card: Not applicable.
Wrestling style: Not applicable.
Signature moves: Not applicable.
Brief description: No verified information is available regarding Joey Aitken's involvement with the specified promotions.

Joey Jackson
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Not verified.
Position on the card: Not applicable.
Wrestling style: Not applicable.
Signature moves: Not applicable.
Brief description: No verified information is available regarding Joey Jackson's involvement with the specified promotions.

John Chapman
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Not verified.
Position on the card: Not applicable.
Wrestling style: Not applicable.
Signature moves: Not applicable.
Brief description: No verified information is available regarding John Chapman's involvement with the specified promotions.

John Foley
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Not verified.
Position on the card: Not applicable.
Wrestling style: Not applicable.
Signature moves: Not applicable.
Brief description: No verified information is available regarding John Foley's involvement with the specified promotions.

John Grandovich
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Not verified.
Position on the card: Not applicable.
Wrestling style: Not applicable.
Signature moves: Not applicable.
Brief description: No verified information is available regarding John Grandovich's involvement with the specified promotions.

John King
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Not verified.
Position on the card: Not applicable.
Wrestling style: Not applicable.
Signature moves: Not applicable.
Brief description: No verified information is available regarding John King's involvement with the specified promotions.

John Lee
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Not verified.
Position on the card: Not applicable.
Wrestling style: Not applicable.
Signature moves: Not applicable.
Brief description: No verified information is available regarding John Lee's involvement with the specified promotions.

John Tatum
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1983–1986, 1987–1990
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card; prominent in tag team and singles competition
Wrestling style: Traditional heel with emphasis on showmanship
Signature moves: California Kick (superkick), various cheating tactics
Brief description: "Hollywood" John Tatum debuted in 1983 and gained prominence in World Class Championship Wrestling (WCCW) alongside valet Missy Hyatt. He engaged in notable feuds with Chris Adams and Scott Casey, often involving valet confrontations. Tatum formed successful tag teams, notably with Jack Victory, capturing the WCWA Texas Tag Team Championship multiple times. His persona as a brash, Hollywood-inspired heel made him a memorable figure in the Texas wrestling scene.

John Tolos
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1950s–1960s
Position on the card: Main event; top heel
Wrestling style: Technical with brawling elements
Signature moves: Cobra Clutch, knee drop
Brief description: John Tolos, known as "The Golden Greek," was a dominant heel in various NWA territories, including Texas. He held the NWA Texas Heavyweight Championship three times and the NWA Texas Tag Team Championship once with Duke Keomuka. Tolos was renowned for his intense feuds and charismatic promos, solidifying his legacy as a top performer in the region.

Johnny Barend
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1960s
Position on the card: Main event; top heel
Wrestling style: Charismatic showman with psychological tactics
Signature moves: Sleeper hold, piledriver
Brief description: "Handsome" Johnny Barend was a flamboyant and charismatic wrestler known for his entertaining promos and in-ring psychology. He achieved significant success in various territories, including Texas, where he held the NWA World Tag Team Championship (San Francisco version) with Enrique Torres. Barend's larger-than-life persona and memorable feuds made him a standout performer of his era.

Johnny Mantell
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Late 1970s to early 1990s
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card; featured in both singles and tag team competition
Wrestling style: Technical with a focus on traditional wrestling techniques
Signature moves: Russian Leg Sweep, Forward Piledriver
Brief description: Johnny Mantell, born John Lusk, began his professional wrestling career in 1977. He gained prominence in World Class Championship Wrestling (WCCW) during the 1980s, competing against notable opponents such as Kerry Von Erich and Killer Khan. Mantell was known for his technical prowess and versatility in the ring. Beyond his in-ring career, he became the president of the Professional Wrestling Hall of Fame and Museum in Wichita Falls, Texas. 

Johnny Eagles
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1970s
Position on the card: Mid-card; known for his technical wrestling abilities
Wrestling style: Technical, emphasizing submission holds and mat wrestling
Signature moves: Sleeper Hold, various escape maneuvers
Brief description: Johnny Eagles, also known as "The Houdini of Wrestling" and "Man of 1000 Holds," hailed from Manchester, England. He was recognized for his technical wrestling skills and performed in various NWA territories during the 1970s. Notably, he competed in NWA Tri-State events, including a match against The Masked Avenger that ended in a draw. 

Johnny Valentine
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1960s–1970s
Position on the card: Main event; top heel
Wrestling style: Hard-hitting, methodical brawler
Signature moves: Atomic Skullcrusher (elbow drop), Figure-four leglock
Brief description: Johnny Valentine was a dominant force in the Texas wrestling scene, particularly in NWA Big Time Wrestling. He held the NWA Texas Heavyweight Championship nine times and the NWA American Heavyweight Championship once. Valentine's intense, physical style and memorable feuds with wrestlers like Wahoo McDaniel cemented his legacy as a top heel in the territory. 
WIKIPEDIA, THE FREE ENCYCLOPEDIA

Johnny Valiant
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Not verified
Position on the card: Not applicable
Wrestling style: Not applicable
Signature moves: Not applicable
Brief description: Johnny Valiant, one half of the Valiant Brothers, achieved significant success in the World Wide Wrestling Federation (WWWF) during the 1970s. However, there is no verified information regarding his involvement with the specified promotions. 
WIKIPEDIA, THE FREE ENCYCLOPEDIA

Johnny Weaver
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Not verified
Position on the card: Not applicable
Wrestling style: Not applicable
Signature moves: Not applicable
Brief description: Johnny Weaver was a prominent figure in the Mid-Atlantic and Florida wrestling territories during the 1960s and 1970s. He is best known for his tag team success with George Becker and his use of the sleeper hold. There is no verified information regarding his involvement with the specified promotions.

Jonathan Boyd
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1983
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card; featured in tag team competition
Wrestling style: Brawler with a focus on hardcore tactics
Signature moves: Headbutt, foreign object usage
Brief description: Jonathan Boyd, known for his role in the tag team "The Sheepherders" alongside Luke Williams, competed in Southwest Championship Wrestling (SWCW) in 1983. The Sheepherders were recognized for their violent and hard-hitting style, engaging in notable feuds during their tenure. 
WIKIPEDIA, THE FREE ENCYCLOPEDIA

Jose Lothario
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1960s–1970s
Position on the card: Main event; top face
Wrestling style: Technical and high-flying
Signature moves: El Paso de la Muerte (flying punch), dropkick
Brief description: Jose Lothario was a prominent figure in Texas wrestling, particularly in NWA Big Time Wrestling. He held multiple championships, including the NWA Texas Heavyweight Championship and the NWA Brass Knuckles Championship. Lothario was celebrated for his technical prowess and charisma, making him a fan favorite during his career.

Joyce Grable
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1970s–1980s
Position on the card: Featured women's competitor
Wrestling style: Technical
Signature moves: Dropkick, flying headscissors
Brief description: Joyce Grable was a renowned female wrestler who competed in various territories, including Texas. She held the NWA Women's World Tag Team Championship with partner Wendi Richter and was known for her technical skills and athleticism. Grable contributed significantly to women's wrestling during her tenure.

Judy Martin
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1980s
Position on the card: Featured women's competitor
Wrestling style: Power-based with technical elements
Signature moves: Powerbomb, diving elbow drop
Brief description: Judy Martin was a prominent female wrestler in the 1980s, known for her tenure in various NWA territories, including Texas. She competed in World Class Championship Wrestling (WCCW), engaging in matches that showcased her strength and technical skills. Martin also formed a notable tag team with Leilani Kai, known as The Glamour Girls.

Jumbo Tsuruta
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1980s
Position on the card: Main event; international talent
Wrestling style: Technical and powerhouse
Signature moves: Backdrop suplex, jumping knee drop
Brief description: Jumbo Tsuruta was a renowned Japanese wrestler who made appearances in various U.S. promotions, including World Class Championship Wrestling (WCCW) in the 1980s. He competed against top talents, showcasing his exceptional technical ability and strength. Tsuruta's international presence added prestige to the events he participated in.

June Byers
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1950s–1960s
Position on the card: Main event; women's champion
Wrestling style: Technical
Signature moves: Boston crab, wristlock
Brief description: June Byers was a dominant figure in women's wrestling during the 1950s and 1960s. She held the NWA World Women's Championship and competed in various territories, including Texas. Byers was known for her technical prowess and was a trailblazer for female wrestlers in a male-dominated industry.

Junkyard Dog
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1980s
Position on the card: Main event; top face
Wrestling style: Powerhouse
Signature moves: Thump (powerslam), headbutt
Brief description: Junkyard Dog, born Sylvester Ritter, was a charismatic and popular wrestler known for his time in Mid-South Wrestling and later in World Class Championship Wrestling (WCCW) during the 1980s. He was celebrated for his powerful physique, energetic persona, and connection with the audience.

Kabuki
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1981–1983
Position on the card: Main event; top heel
Wrestling style: Martial arts-based with mysterious persona
Signature moves: Asian mist, thrust kick
Brief description: The Great Kabuki, portrayed by Akihisa Mera, was introduced to American audiences in World Class Championship Wrestling (WCCW) in the early 1980s. Managed by Gary Hart, Kabuki was known for his enigmatic presence, use of Asian mist, and martial arts-inspired offense, making him a formidable heel in the promotion.

Kamala
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1983–1984
Position on the card: Main event; monster heel
Wrestling style: Powerhouse with unorthodox tactics
Signature moves: Air Africa (splash), big splash
Brief description: Kamala, born James Harris, was introduced to World Class Championship Wrestling (WCCW) audiences in the early 1980s as a Ugandan giant. Managed by Skandor Akbar, Kamala engaged in high-profile feuds with top stars, including the Von Erich family, utilizing his imposing presence and unorthodox style to captivate audiences.

Karate Kid
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1980s
Position on the card: Mid-card; masked competitor
Wrestling style: Martial arts-based
Signature moves: Karate thrusts, martial arts kicks
Brief description: The Karate Kid was a masked wrestler who competed in various promotions during the 1980s, including appearances in Texas-based organizations. He was known for incorporating martial arts techniques into his wrestling style, adding a unique element to his matches.

Judy Martin
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1980s
Position on the card: Featured women's competitor
Wrestling style: Power-based with technical elements
Signature moves: Powerbomb, diving elbow drop
Brief description: Judy Martin was a prominent female wrestler in the 1980s, known for her tenure in various NWA territories, including Texas. She competed in World Class Championship Wrestling (WCCW), engaging in matches that showcased her strength and technical skills. Martin also formed a notable tag team with Leilani Kai, known as The Glamour Girls.

Jumbo Tsuruta
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1980s
Position on the card: Main event; international talent
Wrestling style: Technical and powerhouse
Signature moves: Backdrop suplex, jumping knee drop
Brief description: Jumbo Tsuruta was a renowned Japanese wrestler who made appearances in various U.S. promotions, including World Class Championship Wrestling (WCCW) in the 1980s. He competed against top talents, showcasing his exceptional technical ability and strength. Tsuruta's international presence added prestige to the events he participated in.

June Byers
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1950s–1960s
Position on the card: Main event; women's champion
Wrestling style: Technical
Signature moves: Boston crab, wristlock
Brief description: June Byers was a dominant figure in women's wrestling during the 1950s and 1960s. She held the NWA World Women's Championship and competed in various territories, including Texas. Byers was known for her technical prowess and was a trailblazer for female wrestlers in a male-dominated industry.

Junkyard Dog
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1980s
Position on the card: Main event; top face
Wrestling style: Powerhouse with charismatic showmanship
Signature moves: Thump (powerslam), headbutt
Brief description: Junkyard Dog was a beloved fan favorite who brought his powerhouse style and charismatic personality to World Class Championship Wrestling in the 1980s. His ability to connect with the crowd and his intense rivalries helped solidify his place as one of the most popular wrestlers of his era.

Killer Karl Kox
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1960s–1970s
Position on the card: Main event; top heel
Wrestling style: Brawler with technical elements
Signature moves: Brainbuster, piledriver
Brief description: Killer Karl Kox was a prominent heel in the Texas wrestling scene, particularly in NWA Big Time Wrestling. He held the NWA Brass Knuckles Championship (Texas version) three times and the NWA World Tag Team Championship (Texas version) once with Fritz Von Erich. Kox was known for his intense feuds and his use of the brainbuster finisher, making him a memorable figure in the territory. 
WIKIPEDIA, THE FREE ENCYCLOPEDIA

Killer Karl Krupp
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1970s–1980s
Position on the card: Main event; top heel
Wrestling style: Brawler with a focus on power moves
Signature moves: Iron Claw, eye rake
Brief description: Killer Karl Krupp was a dominant heel in various NWA territories, including Texas. He held the NWA Brass Knuckles Championship (Texas version) four times, showcasing his brutal in-ring style. Krupp's menacing persona and intense rivalries made him a significant figure in the promotion during his tenure. 
WIKIPEDIA, THE FREE ENCYCLOPEDIA

Karl Von Brauner
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1960s
Position on the card: Main event; top heel in tag team division
Wrestling style: Technical with rule-breaking tactics
Signature moves: Knee drop, German suplex
Brief description: Karl Von Brauner, portrayed by Doug Donovan, was part of the villainous tag team "The Von Brauners." The team held the NWA World Tag Team Championship (Texas version) and was known for their ruthless tactics and strong heel personas, making them a formidable force in the tag team division. 
WIKIPEDIA, THE FREE ENCYCLOPEDIA

Karol Krauser
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1950s
Position on the card: Main event; top heel in tag team division
Wrestling style: Power-based with technical elements
Signature moves: Bear hug, body slam
Brief description: Karol Krauser, also known as Karol Kalmikoff, was part of the tag team "The Kalmikoffs." The team held the NWA Texas Tag Team Championship and was recognized for their dominance in the tag team scene during the 1950s. Krauser's strength and in-ring prowess contributed significantly to their success. 
WIKIPEDIA, THE FREE ENCYCLOPEDIA

Kay Noble
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1960s–1970s
Position on the card: Featured women's competitor
Wrestling style: Technical with high-flying maneuvers
Signature moves: Dropkick, flying headscissors
Brief description: Kay Noble was a prominent female wrestler who competed in various NWA territories, including Texas. She was known for her technical skills and athleticism, making her a standout performer in the women's division during her career.

Kazuo Sakurada (The Great Kabuki)
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1980s
Position on the card: Main event; top heel
Wrestling style: Martial arts-based with mysterious persona
Signature moves: Thrust kick, Asian mist
Brief description: Kazuo Sakurada, known as The Great Kabuki, brought a unique and mysterious presence to World Class Championship Wrestling in the 1980s. His use of the Asian mist and martial arts-inspired offense made him a formidable and memorable heel in the promotion.

Kelly Kiniski
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1980s
Position on the card: Mid-card; tag team and singles competitor
Wrestling style: Technical
Signature moves: Suplex variations, sleeper hold
Brief description: Kelly Kiniski, the son of legendary wrestler Gene Kiniski, competed in World Class Championship Wrestling during the 1980s. He participated in both singles and tag team matches, showcasing his technical wrestling abilities and continuing his family's wrestling legacy.

Ken Mantell
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1970s–1980s
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card; also served as a booker and promoter
Wrestling style: Technical
Signature moves: Sleeper hold, abdominal stretch
Brief description: Ken Mantell, born Ken Lusk, began his wrestling career in the 1970s and gained prominence in the National Wrestling Alliance territories. He achieved significant success by defeating Danny Hodge for the NWA World Junior Heavyweight Championship in 1975. Beyond his in-ring career, Mantell played a crucial role behind the scenes as a booker and promoter for World Class Championship Wrestling, contributing to the promotion's creative direction and talent development. 
WIKIPEDIA, THE FREE ENCYCLOPEDIA

Kerry Von Erich
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1979–1990
Position on the card: Main event; top face
Wrestling style: Powerhouse with agility
Signature moves: Discus punch, iron claw
Brief description: Kerry Von Erich, known as "The Modern Day Warrior," was a central figure in World Class Championship Wrestling. As a member of the famed Von Erich family, he became one of the promotion's most popular stars. Kerry's notable achievements include winning the NWA World Heavyweight Championship in 1984 by defeating Ric Flair. His combination of strength, athleticism, and charisma endeared him to fans, solidifying his legacy in professional wrestling.

Kevin Sullivan
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1980s
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card; featured in singles and tag team competition
Wrestling style: Brawler with psychological tactics
Signature moves: Double foot stomp, tree of woe
Brief description: Kevin Sullivan, known for his dark and enigmatic persona, competed in World Class Championship Wrestling during the 1980s. He engaged in notable feuds and brought a unique psychological element to his matches, contributing to the promotion's diverse storytelling. 
WIKIPEDIA, THE FREE ENCYCLOPEDIA

Kevin Von Erich
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1976–1990
Position on the card: Main event; top face
Wrestling style: Technical with aerial maneuvers
Signature moves: Iron claw, flying body press
Brief description: Kevin Von Erich, a member of the legendary Von Erich family, was a cornerstone of World Class Championship Wrestling. Known for his barefoot wrestling style and high-flying moves, he captured multiple championships, including the NWA American Heavyweight and Tag Team titles. His intense rivalries, particularly with the Fabulous Freebirds, are etched in wrestling history. 
WIKIPEDIA, THE FREE ENCYCLOPEDIA

Killer Khan
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Early 1980s
Position on the card: Main event; monster heel
Wrestling style: Powerhouse with martial arts influences
Signature moves: Knee drop from the top rope, Mongolian chop
Brief description: Killer Khan, hailing from Mongolia, was portrayed as a fearsome adversary in World Class Championship Wrestling. Standing at 6'4" and known for his intimidating presence, he engaged in high-profile matches, including a notable feud with Andre the Giant. His portrayal as a monstrous heel left a lasting impact on the promotion. 
WIKIPEDIA, THE FREE ENCYCLOPEDIA

Killer Tim Brooks
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1970s–1980s
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card; heel
Wrestling style: Brawler
Signature moves: Elbow drop, piledriver
Brief description: Killer Tim Brooks was a rugged brawler who made a significant impact in the Texas wrestling scene. He held the NWA Texas Heavyweight Championship and was known for his roughneck style and willingness to engage in brutal matches. His contributions to the promotion were marked by intense rivalries and a reputation as a tough competitor. 

Iceman King Parsons
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1983–1988
Position on the card: Main event; top face
Wrestling style: Charismatic brawler
Signature moves: Butt Bump (hip attack), jumping clothesline
Brief description: Iceman King Parsons was a prominent figure in World Class Championship Wrestling during the mid-1980s. Known for his charismatic persona and catchphrases like "rooty poot" and "Hubba Bubba, not a spec of trubba!", he became a fan favorite. Parsons held multiple championships, including the WCCW World Heavyweight Championship, making him one of the first African American world champions in wrestling history. 

Klondike Bill
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1960s–1970s
Position on the card: Mid-card; featured in singles and tag team competition
Wrestling style: Powerhouse
Signature moves: Bearhug, big splash
Brief description: Klondike Bill, born William Soloweyko, was a Canadian professional wrestler who competed in various NWA territories, including Texas. Known for his massive build and strength, he held several championships, such as the NWA International Tag Team Championship with Whipper Billy Watson. After retiring from active competition, he worked behind the scenes for Jim Crockett Promotions and later World Championship Wrestling. 

Koko B. Ware
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: August 1984 – November 1984
Position on the card: Mid-card; tag team competitor
Wrestling style: High-flying and energetic
Signature moves: Ghostbuster (brainbuster), missile dropkick
Brief description: Koko B. Ware, teaming with Norvell Austin as The Pretty Young Things, competed in World Class Championship Wrestling during the latter part of 1984. The duo was known for their charismatic performances and high-energy matches, contributing to the tag team division during their tenure. 

Krusher Khruschev
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Not verified
Position on the card: Not applicable
Wrestling style: Not applicable
Signature moves: Not applicable
Brief description: Krusher Khruschev, portrayed by Barry Darsow, was known for his time in Jim Crockett Promotions as part of The Russian Team alongside Ivan and Nikita Koloff. There is no verified information regarding his involvement with the specified promotions. 

Lance Von Erich
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1985–1987
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event; portrayed as a member of the Von Erich family
Wrestling style: Technical and high-flying
Signature moves: Dropkick, flying crossbody
Brief description: Lance Von Erich, born Kevin Vaughan, was introduced to World Class Championship Wrestling in 1985 as the kayfabe cousin of the Von Erich brothers to fill in for the ailing Mike Von Erich. Although not a blood relative, he was billed as the son of Waldo Von Erich. Lance held the WCWA World Tag Team Championship with Dingo Warrior and was part of the WCWA World Six-Man Tag Team Championship team alongside Kevin and Mike Von Erich. His tenure ended in 1987 after a public falling out with the promotion. 

Larry Sharpe
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1986
Position on the card: Manager and trainer
Wrestling style: Not applicable
Signature moves: Not applicable
Brief description: "Pretty Boy" Larry Sharpe, renowned for co-founding The Monster Factory training center, managed Bam Bam Bigelow (wrestling as Crusher Yurkov) in World Class Championship Wrestling in 1986. Sharpe's expertise as a trainer contributed to the development of several prominent wrestlers, and his managerial role in WCCW added to the promotion's dynamic. 

Len Denton
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1980s
Position on the card: Mid-card; tag team competitor
Wrestling style: Technical with rule-breaking tactics
Signature moves: Loaded boot kick, swinging neckbreaker
Brief description: Len Denton, known by his ring name "The Grappler," competed in World Class Championship Wrestling during the 1980s. He was recognized for his technical skills and notorious for using a loaded boot as part of his in-ring persona. Denton's contributions to the tag team division and his memorable character work left a lasting impression on the promotion. 

Leroy McGuirk
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1940s–1950s
Position on the card: Main event; top face
Wrestling style: Technical
Signature moves: Leg lock, arm drag
Brief description: Leroy McGuirk was a prominent wrestler in the 1940s and 1950s, known for his technical prowess. He held the NWA World Junior Heavyweight Championship and was a significant figure in the NWA's early years. After retiring due to an eye injury, McGuirk became a successful promoter in the Mid-South region, contributing to the development of professional wrestling in the area.

Les Thornton
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1980s
Position on the card: Mid-card; featured in singles competition
Wrestling style: Technical
Signature moves: Suplex variations, submission holds
Brief description: Les Thornton was a British-born wrestler renowned for his technical skills. He held the NWA World Junior Heavyweight Championship multiple times and competed in various NWA territories, including Texas. Thornton's matches were characterized by their technical depth and grappling proficiency, earning him respect among peers and fans alike.

Lillian Ellison (The Fabulous Moolah)
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1950s–1980s
Position on the card: Main event; women's champion
Wrestling style: Technical and brawler
Signature moves: Schoolgirl roll-up, hair-pull snapmare
Brief description: Lillian Ellison, known professionally as The Fabulous Moolah, was a dominant figure in women's wrestling for several decades. She held the NWA World Women's Championship for a combined 28 years and competed in various NWA territories, including Texas. Moolah was instrumental in training female wrestlers and promoting women's wrestling, leaving a lasting legacy in the industry.

Linda Dallas
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1980s
Position on the card: Mid-card; women's division
Wrestling style: Brawler
Signature moves: Clothesline, body slam
Brief description: Linda Dallas was a female wrestler active during the 1980s, known for her rough wrestling style. She competed in various promotions, including those in Texas, contributing to the women's wrestling scene during her tenure.

Little Beaver
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1950s–1970s
Position on the card: Featured attraction; midget wrestler
Wrestling style: High-flying and comedic
Signature moves: Diving headbutt, dropkick
Brief description: Little Beaver, born Lionel Giroux, was a prominent midget wrestler who gained fame in the 1950s through the 1970s. He competed in various territories, including Texas, and was known for his entertaining matches and high-flying maneuvers. Little Beaver's performances were a staple of wrestling events during his career.

Little Bruiser
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1960s–1980s
Position on the card: Featured attraction; midget wrestler
Wrestling style: Brawler
Signature moves: Headbutt, body slam
Brief description: Little Bruiser, born Murray Downs, was a well-known midget wrestler who competed from the 1960s through the 1980s. He appeared in various promotions, including those in Texas, and was recognized for his brawling style and energetic performances.

Lord Alfred Hayes
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Early 1980s
Position on the card: Mid-card; wrestler and manager
Wrestling style: Technical with a British aristocratic persona
Signature moves: European uppercut, knee drop
Brief description: Lord Alfred Hayes, born Alfred George James Hayes, was an English professional wrestler and manager known for his aristocratic persona. In the early 1980s, he competed in World Class Championship Wrestling, engaging in matches such as a judo bout against Chris Adams on June 3, 1983. Hayes later gained prominence as a commentator and interviewer in the World Wrestling Federation during the 1980s and 1990s. 

Lord Littlebrook
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1980s
Position on the card: Featured attraction; midget wrestler and manager
Wrestling style: Technical and high-flying
Signature moves: Diving headbutt, dropkick
Brief description: Lord Littlebrook, born Eric Henry Edward Tovey, was an English midget wrestler renowned for his technical skill and showmanship. In the 1980s, he competed in various promotions, including an appearance at WrestleMania III in 1987. He also managed tag teams, bringing his expertise to a managerial role later in his career. 

Lou Thesz
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1950s–1960s
Position on the card: Main event; NWA World Heavyweight Champion
Wrestling style: Technical and mat-based
Signature moves: Thesz Press, STF (Stepover Toehold Facelock)
Brief description: Lou Thesz was a legendary professional wrestler renowned for his technical prowess and significant contributions to the sport. Holding the NWA World Heavyweight Championship three times, he unified various world titles, solidifying his status as an undisputed champion. Thesz's influence extended to multiple territories, including Texas, where he defended the NWA title, contributing to the prestige of the championship and the promotion. 

Louie Tillet
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1960s–1970s
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card; wrestler and booker
Wrestling style: Technical
Signature moves: Dropkick, sleeper hold
Brief description: Louie Tillet, born Maurice Joseph Michaud, was a French professional wrestler who competed primarily in the 1960s and 1970s. He worked mainly for Championship Wrestling from Florida, World Class Championship Wrestling, and other NWA territories. Tillet held titles such as the NWA Texas Junior Heavyweight Championship and the NWA Americas Heavyweight Championship. Beyond his in-ring career, he contributed as a booker, influencing the creative direction of the promotions he was involved with. 

Luis Martínez
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Not verified
Position on the card: Not applicable
Wrestling style: Not applicable
Signature moves: Not applicable
Brief description: Luis Martínez, also known as "Apache" and "Chief War Cloud," was a Mexican-born American professional wrestler who debuted in 1952. He competed in various promotions across the Midwest, Southwest, and Canada. Martínez was known for his finishing move, the Mexican Stump Puller. There is no verified information regarding his involvement with the specified promotions. 

Luther Lindsay
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Not verified
Position on the card: Not applicable
Wrestling style: Not applicable
Signature moves: Not applicable
Brief description: Luther Lindsay, born Luther Jacob Goodall, was an American professional wrestler and football player who competed throughout the United States and internationally. He was known for his technical wrestling skills and was a pioneer among African-American wrestlers. Lindsay trained under Stu Hart and was highly respected in the wrestling community. There is no verified information regarding his involvement with the specified promotions. 

Mae Young
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1950s–1960s
Position on the card: Main event; women's division
Wrestling style: Technical and brawler
Signature moves: Airplane spin, kneeling piledriver
Brief description: Mae Young, born Johnnie Mae Young, was a pioneering female wrestler who began her career in 1939. She competed extensively across various NWA territories, including Texas, during the 1950s and 1960s. Young was known for her toughness and longevity in the sport, wrestling in nine different decades. She held the NWA United States Women's Championship and was instrumental in popularizing women's wrestling. 
WIKIPEDIA, THE FREE ENCYCLOPEDIA

Mad Dog Vachon
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1975
Position on the card: Main event; NWA Texas Brass Knuckles Champion
Wrestling style: Brawler
Signature moves: Piledriver, stomps
Brief description: Maurice "Mad Dog" Vachon was a Canadian professional wrestler known for his ferocious persona and brawling style. In 1975, he competed in the Texas territory, capturing the NWA Texas Brass Knuckles Championship. Vachon was a prominent figure in the American Wrestling Association (AWA), where he held the AWA World Heavyweight Championship five times. 
WIKIPEDIA, THE FREE ENCYCLOPEDIA

Magnum T.A.
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1984–1985
Position on the card: Upper mid-card; singles competitor
Wrestling style: Technical and power-based
Signature moves: Belly-to-belly suplex
Brief description: Terry Allen, known as Magnum T.A., was a rising star in professional wrestling during the mid-1980s. He competed in World Class Championship Wrestling from 1984 to 1985, engaging in notable feuds and showcasing his charisma and in-ring ability. Magnum T.A. later achieved greater fame in Jim Crockett Promotions before a car accident in 1986 ended his in-ring career.

Magic Dragon
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1982–1983
Position on the card: Mid-card; tag team competitor
Wrestling style: High-flying and martial arts
Signature moves: Diving headbutt, martial arts kicks
Brief description: Kazuharu Sonoda, wrestling as Magic Dragon, was a Japanese wrestler who competed in World Class Championship Wrestling in the early 1980s. He often teamed with The Great Kabuki, and the duo was known for their aerial maneuvers and martial arts-inspired offense. Magic Dragon added an international flair to the promotion's tag team division.

Man Mountain Mike
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1970s
Position on the card: Mid-card; featured attraction
Wrestling style: Super heavyweight brawler
Signature moves: Big splash
Brief description: Man Mountain Mike, born Gary Michael Fletcher, was an American professional wrestler known for his immense size, standing 6 feet 4 inches tall and weighing over 600 pounds. In the 1970s, he competed in NWA Big Time Wrestling, often teaming with Haystacks Calhoun to form a colossal tag team duo. Their combined weight exceeded 1,200 pounds, making them a significant draw in the tag team division. 

Mando Guerrero
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1980s
Position on the card: Mid-card; singles and tag team competitor
Wrestling style: Lucha libre; high-flying and technical
Signature moves: Moonsault, arm drag
Brief description: Mando Guerrero, a member of the renowned Guerrero wrestling family, competed in various promotions during the 1980s, including appearances in World Class Championship Wrestling. Known for his high-flying lucha libre style, Mando showcased his technical prowess in both singles and tag team matches, contributing to the popularity of Mexican wrestling techniques in the United States.

Magic Dragon
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1981–1982
Position on the card: Mid-card; tag team competitor
Wrestling style: Technical and high-flying
Signature moves: Rolling sleeper, sliding kick
Brief description: Magic Dragon, portrayed by Japanese wrestler Kazuharu Sonoda, competed in World Class Championship Wrestling (WCCW) during the early 1980s. Managed by Gary Hart, he frequently teamed with The Great Kabuki, forming a notable tag team. At the Fritz Von Erich Retirement Show in 1982, Magic Dragon and The Great Kabuki defeated David and Kevin Von Erich to win the All Asia Tag Team Championship. Sonoda tragically passed away in a plane crash on November 28, 1987. 

Magic Dragon
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1981–1982
Position on the card: Mid-card; tag team competitor
Wrestling style: Technical and high-flying
Signature moves: Rolling sleeper, sliding kick
Brief description: Magic Dragon, portrayed by Japanese wrestler Kazuharu Sonoda, competed in World Class Championship Wrestling (WCCW) during the early 1980s. Managed by Gary Hart, he frequently teamed with The Great Kabuki, forming a notable tag team. At the Fritz Von Erich Retirement Show in 1982, Magic Dragon and The Great Kabuki defeated David and Kevin Von Erich to win the All Asia Tag Team Championship. Sonoda tragically passed away in a plane crash on November 28, 1987. 

Magic Dragon
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1981–1982
Position on the card: Mid-card; tag team competitor
Wrestling style: Technical and high-flying
Signature moves: Rolling sleeper, sliding kick
Brief description: Magic Dragon, portrayed by Japanese wrestler Kazuharu Sonoda, competed in World Class Championship Wrestling (WCCW) during the early 1980s. Managed by Gary Hart, he frequently teamed with The Great Kabuki, forming a notable tag team. At the Fritz Von Erich Retirement Show in 1982, Magic Dragon and The Great Kabuki defeated David and Kevin Von Erich to win the All Asia Tag Team Championship. Sonoda tragically passed away in a plane crash on November 28, 1987. 

Mario Galento
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Not verified
Position on the card: Not applicable
Wrestling style: Not applicable
Signature moves: Not applicable
Brief description: Mario Galento, born Bonnie Lee Boyette, was an American professional wrestler who competed primarily in Tennessee, Georgia, and the Gulf Coast during the 1950s and 1960s. He was known for his rugged persona and had notable feuds in the southeastern wrestling territories. 

Mario Milano
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Not verified
Position on the card: Not applicable
Wrestling style: Not applicable
Signature moves: Not applicable
Brief description: Mario Milano, born Mario Bulfone, was an Italian-Australian professional wrestler who gained fame in Australia during the 1960s and 1970s. He held multiple championships, including the IWA World Heavyweight Championship, and was a major star in the Australian wrestling scene. 

Marva Scott
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1960s
Position on the card: Mid-card; women's division
Wrestling style: Technical
Signature moves: Body slam, headlock
Brief description: Marva Scott, born Marva Wingo, was one of the first African American female professional wrestlers, debuting in the 1950s. She competed in various NWA territories, including Big Time Wrestling, where she participated in matches throughout the 1960s. Scott was known for her technical prowess and was a trailblazer for African American women in wrestling. 

Masked Marvel
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1960s
Position on the card: Mid-card; masked wrestler
Wrestling style: Technical
Signature moves: Sleeper hold, arm drag
Brief description: The Masked Marvel was a persona adopted by various wrestlers over the years. In the 1960s, Buddy Knox donned the Masked Marvel identity, competing in promotions including Big Time Wrestling. The masked gimmick added an element of mystery and intrigue, making the character a notable attraction during that era. 

Master Gee
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1986
Position on the card: Mid-card; singles competitor
Wrestling style: Powerhouse
Signature moves: Football tackle, avalanche
Brief description: George Wells, known in WCCW as Master Gee, was a former Canadian Football League player who transitioned into professional wrestling. In 1986, he joined WCCW, managed by Percy Pringle III, and engaged in a notable feud with the Dingo Warrior (later known as The Ultimate Warrior), culminating in a chain match at Thanksgiving Star Wars '86. 

Matt Borne
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1986–1989
Position on the card: Upper mid-card; singles and tag team competitor
Wrestling style: Technical and brawler
Signature moves: Whoopee Cushion (seated senton), belly-to-belly suplex
Brief description: Matthew Wade Osborne, known professionally as Matt Borne, was an American professional wrestler and the son of Tony Borne. He joined WCCW in 1986, where he reformed his tag team with Buzz Sawyer, winning the WCWA World Tag Team Championship. Borne also captured the WCWA Texas Heavyweight Championship during his tenure. He is perhaps best known for later portraying the original Doink the Clown in the WWF. 

Michael Hayes
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1982–1986, 1988
Position on the card: Main event; singles and tag team competitor
Wrestling style: Brawler with charismatic showmanship
Signature moves: DDT, bulldog
Brief description: Michael "P.S." Hayes was a founding member of The Fabulous Freebirds, a revolutionary faction in professional wrestling. In WCCW, Hayes, along with Terry Gordy and Buddy Roberts, engaged in a legendary feud with the Von Erich family, which became a cornerstone of the promotion's success. Hayes' flamboyant persona and charismatic promos made him a standout performer during his tenure. 
WIKIPEDIA, THE FREE ENCYCLOPEDIA

The Midnight Express
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1984–1985
Position on the card: Upper mid-card; tag team competitors
Wrestling style: Technical and strategic
Signature moves: Rocket Launcher (assisted splash), Veg-O-Matic (assisted neckbreaker)
Brief description: Managed by Jim Cornette, The Midnight Express, primarily consisting of Bobby Eaton and Dennis Condrey during this period, brought a blend of technical prowess and in-ring psychology to WCCW. They had notable feuds with The Fantastics (Bobby Fulton and Tommy Rogers), delivering matches that are still celebrated for their storytelling and athleticism.

Mighty Zulu
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Not verified
Position on the card: Not applicable
Wrestling style: Not applicable
Signature moves: Not applicable
Brief description: Mighty Zulu, also known as Magnificent Zulu and born Ron Pope, was an American professional wrestler known for his impressive physique. He competed in various promotions during the 1970s and 1980s, including appearances in Japan. However, there is no verified information regarding his involvement with the specified promotions. 
ONLINE WORLD OF WRESTLING

Miguel Guzmán
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1940s–1950s
Position on the card: Main event; singles and tag team competitor
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical
Signature moves: Headscissors takedown
Brief description: Miguel Wenceslao Guzmán Huerta, known as Black Guzmán, was a Mexican professional wrestler who competed in Texas for Southwest Sports, Inc. during the 1940s and 1950s. He was a pioneer of the high-flying, fast-paced wrestling style and held the NWA Texas Heavyweight Championship eight times. Guzmán also teamed with Rito Romero to capture the NWA Texas Tag Team Championship on multiple occasions. 
WIKIPEDIA, THE FREE ENCYCLOPEDIA

Mike Clancy
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1950s–1960s
Position on the card: Mid-card; singles competitor
Wrestling style: Technical
Signature moves: Boston crab
Brief description: Mike Clancy was an American professional wrestler who competed in various NWA territories, including Texas, during the 1950s and 1960s. Known for his technical wrestling skills, Clancy held several regional championships throughout his career.

Mike DiBiase
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1950s–1960s
Position on the card: Main event; singles competitor
Wrestling style: Technical and brawler
Signature moves: Airplane spin
Brief description: "Iron" Mike DiBiase was an American professional wrestler who competed in various NWA territories, including Texas, during the 1950s and 1960s. He was known for his toughness and held numerous regional championships. DiBiase is also recognized as the adoptive father of WWE Hall of Famer Ted DiBiase.

Mike George
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1970s–1980s
Position on the card: Mid-card; singles and tag team competitor
Wrestling style: Powerhouse
Signature moves: Bearhug
Brief description: Mike George was an American professional wrestler who competed in various NWA territories, including appearances in Texas, during the 1970s and 1980s. Known for his strength and solid in-ring abilities, George held several regional championships throughout his career.

Mike Von Erich
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1983–1987
Position on the card: Mid-card; singles and tag team competitor
Wrestling style: Technical
Signature moves: Dropkick, sleeper hold
Brief description: Mike Von Erich, born Michael Brett Adkisson, was a member of the famed Von Erich wrestling family. He debuted in WCCW on November 24, 1983, winning a match against Skandor Akbar during "WCCW Wrestling Star Wars" at the Reunion Arena. Mike was involved in several encounters with The Fabulous Freebirds and teamed with his brothers in various matches. He held the WCWA World Six-Man Tag Team Championship multiple times alongside his brothers. 
WIKIPEDIA, THE FREE ENCYCLOPEDIA

Mike DiBiase
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1950s–1960s
Position on the card: Main event; singles competitor
Wrestling style: Technical and brawler
Signature moves: Airplane spin, knee drop
Brief description: "Iron" Mike DiBiase was an American professional wrestler known for his toughness and technical skills. He held numerous titles during his career, including the NWA World Junior Heavyweight Championship. DiBiase was the adoptive father of "The Million Dollar Man" Ted DiBiase. He tragically passed away due to a heart attack in the ring on July 2, 1969, in Texas. 

Mil Máscaras
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1970s–1980s
Position on the card: Main event; singles competitor
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical
Signature moves: Flying crossbody, plancha
Brief description: Mil Máscaras, born Aarón Rodríguez Arellano, is a Mexican luchador renowned for popularizing lucha libre internationally. His name translates to "Thousand Masks," reflecting his use of various colorful masks throughout his career. He was among the first masked wrestlers to compete in the United States, breaking cultural barriers and introducing the high-flying lucha style to a broader audience. In the 1970s and 1980s, Mil Máscaras made appearances in WCCW, captivating fans with his dynamic in-ring performances. 
WIKIPEDIA, THE FREE ENCYCLOPEDIA

Mildred Burke
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1930s–1950s
Position on the card: Main event; women's division
Wrestling style: Technical and powerhouse
Signature moves: Body slam, headlock
Brief description: Mildred Burke, born Mildred Bliss, was a trailblazer in women's professional wrestling. She held the World Women's Championship for nearly two decades, establishing herself as a dominant force in a male-dominated industry. Burke was known for wrestling both women and men, often defeating male competitors, which was unprecedented at the time. Her contributions laid the foundation for future generations of female wrestlers. 
WIKIPEDIA, THE FREE ENCYCLOPEDIA

The Missing Link
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1984–1985
Position on the card: Mid-card; singles competitor
Wrestling style: Brawler
Signature moves: Diving headbutt, headbutt
Brief description: The Missing Link, born Byron James John Robertson, was a Canadian professional wrestler known for his wild appearance and unorthodox behavior in the ring. He painted his face, sported a distinctive hairstyle, and often used his head as a weapon. In WCCW, he was managed by Skandor Akbar and engaged in feuds with popular wrestlers, contributing to the promotion's colorful and diverse roster.

Missy Hyatt
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1985–1986
Position on the card: Manager and valet
Wrestling style: Not applicable
Signature moves: Not applicable
Brief description: Missy Hyatt, born Melissa Ann Hiatt, is an American professional wrestling valet, commentator, and occasional wrestler. In WCCW, she managed John Tatum and later formed an alliance with Hot Stuff Eddie Gilbert, leading to the formation of "Hot Stuff International." Hyatt's charisma and on-screen presence made her one of the most recognizable female personalities in wrestling during the 1980s.

Moondog Mayne
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1970s
Position on the card: Mid-card; singles competitor
Wrestling style: Brawler
Signature moves: Biting, clubbing forearm blows
Brief description: Moondog Mayne, born Wayne Coleman, was an American professional wrestler known for his wildman persona. He often carried a bone to the ring and exhibited unpredictable behavior, which endeared him to fans. Mayne competed in various territories, including appearances in Texas, where he brought his unique character to the audience.

Mr. Ebony (Tom Jones)
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1985
Position on the card: Mid-card; singles and tag team competitor
Wrestling style: Technical and brawler
Signature moves: Headbutt, body slam
Brief description: Tom Jones, known as "Mr. Ebony," was an American professional wrestler who competed in various promotions, including WCCW. In 1985, he wrestled under a mask as Mr. Ebony and was a member of Skandor Akbar's Devastation, Inc. After unmasking, he continued to use the "Mr. Ebony" moniker. Jones was known for breaking racial barriers in the South, becoming one of the first Black wrestlers to compete against white opponents. 
OKLAFAN
FACEBOOK

Mr. Texas (Jose Lothario)
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1960s–1970s
Position on the card: Main event; singles competitor
Wrestling style: Technical and brawler
Signature moves: Elbow drop, sleeper hold
Brief description: Jose Lothario, a Mexican-American professional wrestler, was known for his charisma and in-ring prowess. He competed in various promotions, including WCCW, where he occasionally donned a mask and wrestled under the name "Mr. Texas." Lothario was instrumental in training future wrestling stars, most notably Shawn Michaels. 

Nell Stewart
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1950s
Position on the card: Main event; women's division
Wrestling style: Technical
Signature moves: Body slam, headlock
Brief description: Nell Stewart was a prominent female wrestler in the 1950s, known for her technical prowess and charisma. She competed in various territories, including Texas, where she was recognized as the Texas Women's Champion. Stewart was a significant figure in women's wrestling during her era, contributing to the sport's popularity and acceptance. 
WRESTLING CLASSICS

Nelson Royal
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1960s–1970s
Position on the card: Mid-card; singles and tag team competitor
Wrestling style: Technical
Signature moves: Sleeper hold, abdominal stretch
Brief description: Nelson Royal was an American professional wrestler renowned for his technical skills and cowboy persona. He held the NWA World Junior Heavyweight Championship multiple times and competed in various NWA territories, including Texas. Royal was respected for his in-ring abilities and his contributions to the wrestling industry, both as a performer and later as a promoter.

Nick Bockwinkel
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1961
Position on the card: Main event; singles competitor
Wrestling style: Technical and strategic
Signature moves: Sleeper hold, figure-four leglock
Brief description: Nick Bockwinkel was an American professional wrestler best known for his time in the American Wrestling Association (AWA), where he was a four-time AWA World Heavyweight Champion. In 1961, Bockwinkel competed in Texas for Southwest Sports, engaging in matches against notable opponents such as Buddy Rogers. He was celebrated for his articulate promos and sophisticated heel persona, which set him apart in the wrestling world. 

Nick Kiniski
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1987–1990
Position on the card: Mid-card; singles and tag team competitor
Wrestling style: Technical
Signature moves: Dropkick, suplex
Brief description: Nick Kiniski, the son of legendary wrestler Gene Kiniski, competed in various promotions during the 1980s, including WCCW. He formed a tag team with Paul Diamond called "American Breed" and later wrestled in singles competition. Kiniski was known for his athleticism and technical skills, contributing to the dynamic roster of WCCW during his tenure. 

Nick Kozak
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1960s
Position on the card: Mid-card; tag team competitor
Wrestling style: Technical
Signature moves: Arm drag, dropkick
Brief description: Nick Kozak was a Canadian professional wrestler who found success in various NWA territories, including Texas. He often competed in tag team matches and held the NWA Pacific Northwest Tag Team Championship with partner Nick Bockwinkel. Kozak was recognized for his solid in-ring abilities and contributions to the tag team division during his career.

Nickla Roberts (Baby Doll)
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1984
Position on the card: Manager/Valet
Wrestling style: Not applicable
Signature moves: Not applicable
Brief description: Nickla Ann Roberts, known by her ring name "Baby Doll," debuted in WCCW in 1984 as the valet for Gino Hernandez, performing under the ring name Andrea, the Lady Giant. She was involved in notable feuds, including one against Mike Von Erich and his manager, Sunshine. 
WIKIPEDIA, THE FREE ENCYCLOPEDIA

Nikita Kalmikoff
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1960s
Position on the card: Tag team competitor
Wrestling style: Powerhouse
Signature moves: Bear hug, Russian sickle (clothesline)
Brief description: Nikita Kalmikoff, also known as Nikita Mulkovitch, was part of the Kalmikoffs, a professional wrestling group portraying fictitious Soviet brothers. He teamed with Ivan Kalmikoff in various promotions, including NWA Big Time Wrestling. 
WIKIPEDIA, THE FREE ENCYCLOPEDIA

Nikolai Volkoff
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1980s
Position on the card: Mid-card; singles and tag team competitor
Wrestling style: Powerhouse
Signature moves: Backbreaker drop, bear hug
Brief description: Nikolai Volkoff, born Josip Peruzović, was a Yugoslav-born professional wrestler best known for his portrayal of a Soviet villain during the Cold War era. He competed in various promotions, including appearances in WCCW, where he continued his Soviet heel persona, often singing the Soviet national anthem before matches to incite crowds.

Norvell Austin
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1980s
Position on the card: Tag team competitor
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical
Signature moves: Dropkick, flying headbutt
Brief description: Norvell Austin was an American professional wrestler known for his work in various tag teams. In the 1980s, he competed in WCCW, where he was part of the original Midnight Express alongside Dennis Condrey and Randy Rose. Austin was known for his agility and technical skills, contributing to the success of his tag teams.

One Man Gang
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1985–1987
Position on the card: Main event; singles competitor
Wrestling style: Brawler
Signature moves: 747 Splash (diving splash), body avalanche
Brief description: One Man Gang, born George Gray, was an American professional wrestler known for his massive size and wild persona. He competed in WCCW during the mid-1980s, engaging in feuds with top stars and being a formidable opponent in the promotion's heavyweight division.

Ox Baker
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1980
Position on the card: Mid-card; singles competitor
Wrestling style: Brawler
Signature move: Heart Punch
Brief description: Ox Baker, born Douglas Baker, was an American professional wrestler renowned for his menacing persona, distinctive bushy eyebrows, and his finishing move, the Heart Punch. In 1980, he competed in NWA Big Time Wrestling, engaging in matches against opponents such as Pak Song. Baker's intimidating presence and in-ring style made him a memorable figure in professional wrestling. 

Pak Song
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1980
Position on the card: Mid-card; singles competitor
Wrestling style: Powerhouse
Signature move: Chop
Brief description: Pak Song Nam, known simply as Pak Song, was a Korean professional wrestler who gained prominence in the United States during the 1970s and early 1980s. In 1980, he competed in NWA Big Time Wrestling, participating in matches against wrestlers like Ox Baker and Mr. Hito. Pak Song was known for his imposing stature and powerful in-ring style. 

Pat O'Connor
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1950s–1960s
Position on the card: Main event; singles competitor
Wrestling style: Technical
Signature moves: O'Connor Roll
Brief description: Patrick John "Pat" O'Connor was a New Zealand-born professional wrestler renowned for his technical prowess. He held the NWA World Heavyweight Championship from 1959 to 1961 and was the inaugural AWA World Heavyweight Champion. O'Connor competed in various NWA territories, including Texas, where he defended his title against top contenders. 
WIKIPEDIA, THE FREE ENCYCLOPEDIA

Paul Boesch
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1940s–1980s
Position on the card: Promoter, announcer, and occasional wrestler
Wrestling style: Not applicable
Signature moves: Not applicable
Brief description: Paul Max Boesch was an American professional wrestler, announcer, and promoter best known for his work with Houston Wrestling. He collaborated with various promotions, including WCCW, to bring major wrestling events to the Houston area. Boesch was instrumental in popularizing professional wrestling in Texas and is remembered as a pioneering promoter.

Paul DeMarco
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1960s–1970s
Position on the card: Mid-card; singles competitor
Wrestling style: Technical and brawler
Signature moves: Body slam, knee drop
Brief description: Paul DeMarco was an American professional wrestler who competed in various territories during the 1960s and 1970s. He was known for his rugged in-ring style and had notable matches in promotions like the American Wrestling Association (AWA). 
MID ATLANTIC WRESTLING

Paul Perschmann (Buddy Rose)
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1970s
Position on the card: Mid-card; singles and tag team competitor
Wrestling style: Technical and charismatic
Signature moves: Bombs Away (top rope knee drop), Figure-four leglock
Brief description: Paul Perschmann, better known by his ring name "Playboy" Buddy Rose, was an American professional wrestler renowned for his charismatic persona and in-ring abilities. He competed in various promotions, including the AWA, where he had notable matches against opponents like Greg Gagne and Jim Brunzell. 
CRAZYMAX

Paul Vachon
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1960s–1970s
Position on the card: Mid-card; singles and tag team competitor
Wrestling style: Brawler
Signature moves: Stomach claw, body slam
Brief description: Paul Vachon, known as "Butcher" Vachon, is a Canadian retired professional wrestler and a member of the famed Vachon wrestling family. He competed in various promotions, including the World Wide Wrestling Federation (WWWF), and was known for his rough and aggressive wrestling style.

Pedro Morales
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1975–1976
Position on the card: Main event; singles and tag team competitor
Wrestling style: Technical
Signature moves: Boston Crab, Sunset Flip
Brief description: Pedro Morales was a Puerto Rican professional wrestler renowned for his technical prowess and charisma. In 1975, he competed in Big Time Wrestling in San Francisco, engaging in notable matches and forming a successful tag team with Pat Patterson. The duo won the NWA San Francisco World Tag Team Championship on October 29, 1975. Morales continued to be a prominent figure in the wrestling world, later becoming the first WWE Triple Crown Champion. 
WIKIPEDIA, THE FREE ENCYCLOPEDIA

Penny Banner
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1950s–1970s
Position on the card: Main event; singles competitor
Wrestling style: Technical
Signature moves: Dropkick, Arm Drag
Brief description: Penny Banner, born Mary Ann Kostecki, was an American professional wrestler celebrated for her technical skills and athleticism. She held multiple titles during her career, including the NWA Women's World Tag Team Championship and the AWA World Women's Championship. Banner was a prominent figure in women's wrestling and was inducted into the National Wrestling Hall of Fame. 

Percy Pringle III (Paul Bearer)
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1985–1988
Position on the card: Manager
Wrestling style: Not applicable
Signature moves: Not applicable
Brief description: William Moody, known professionally as Percy Pringle III, was an American professional wrestling manager renowned for his work in WCCW. He managed several wrestlers, including Rick Rude, Eric Embry, and Steve Austin. Moody later gained international fame in the WWF as Paul Bearer, the manager of The Undertaker. 
DUKE COMPUTER SCIENCE

Pepper Gomez
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1960s
Position on the card: Main event; singles competitor
Wrestling style: Technical and brawler
Signature moves: Stomach claw, body slam
Brief description: Gilbert "Pepper" Gomez was an American professional wrestler known for his exceptional abdominal strength, often inviting opponents to jump onto his stomach to demonstrate his resilience. He competed in various territories, including Texas, where he was a popular figure in the 1960s. 
DUKE COMPUTER SCIENCE

Pepper Martin
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1950s–1960s
Position on the card: Mid-card; singles and tag team competitor
Wrestling style: Brawler
Signature moves: Forearm smash, knee drop
Brief description: Howard "Pepper" Martin was a Canadian professional wrestler who competed in various NWA territories, including Texas. He was known for his rugged in-ring style and later transitioned into acting, appearing in films and television series. 
DUKE COMPUTER SCIENCE

Pat Rose
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1980s
Position on the card: Mid-card; tag team competitor
Wrestling style: Technical
Signature moves: Suplex, elbow drop
Brief description: Pat Rose was an American professional wrestler who competed in various promotions during the 1980s, including appearances in WCCW. He was known for his technical wrestling skills and often competed in tag team matches. 
DUKE COMPUTER SCIENCE

Penny Mitchell
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1980s
Position on the card: Mid-card; women's division
Wrestling style: Technical
Signature moves: Dropkick, arm drag
Brief description: Penny Mitchell was an American professional wrestler who competed in various promotions during the 1980s, including appearances in WCCW. She was known for her technical wrestling abilities and participated in numerous matches in the women's division. 

Perro Aguayo
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1980s
Position on the card: Main event; singles and tag team competitor
Wrestling style: Brawler
Signature moves: Double foot stomp, suicide dive
Brief description: Perro Aguayo, born Pedro Aguayo Damián, was a legendary Mexican professional wrestler known for his intense brawling style and charisma. He made appearances in WCCW during the 1980s, participating in cross-promotional events that featured talent exchanges between Mexican promotions and WCCW. Aguayo was a significant figure in lucha libre, contributing to its popularity both in Mexico and internationally.

Peter Maivia
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1970s
Position on the card: Main event; singles competitor
Wrestling style: Technical and brawler Signature moves: Headbutt, Samoan drop Brief description: Peter Maivia, born Fanene Leifi Pita Maivia, was a Samoan professional wrestler who gained fame in various promotions worldwide. In the 1970s, he competed in NWA Big Time Wrestling, engaging in high-profile matches and feuds. Maivia was known for his traditional Samoan tattoos and warrior persona. He is also the grandfather of Dwayne "The Rock" Johnson, continuing his family's legacy in professional wrestling.

Precious
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1983–1984
Position on the card: Manager/Valet
Wrestling style: Not applicable
Signature moves: Not applicable
Brief description: Patricia Williams, known by her ring name Precious, is a Canadian retired professional wrestling valet. She is the real-life wife of wrestler Jimmy Garvin and managed him during her career. In WCCW, Precious was involved in notable storylines, including feuds with Sunshine and mixed tag team matches alongside Garvin.

Pretty Young Things
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1984–1985
Position on the card: Tag team competitors
Wrestling style: High-flying and brawling
Signature moves: Double dropkick, brainbuster
Brief description: The Pretty Young Things, also known as the PYT Express, was a professional wrestling tag team composed of Koko Ware and Norvell Austin. They competed in various promotions, including WCCW, and were known for their charismatic personas and in-ring abilities. The team held the NWA Florida United States Tag Team Championship during their tenure. 

Prince Tonga
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1980s (sporadic appearances)
Position on the card: Mid-card
Wrestling style: Powerhouse
Signature moves: Samoan Drop, Headbutt, Diving Splash
Brief description: Prince Tonga, later known as Haku, made sporadic appearances in World Class Championship Wrestling during the 1980s. He showcased his strength and agility, engaging in matches that highlighted his Samoan heritage and wrestling prowess. While not a regular competitor in these promotions, his appearances left a lasting impression on fans.

Princess Victoria
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1980s (sporadic appearances)
Position on the card: Women's Division
Wrestling style: Technical
Signature moves: Flying Crossbody, Arm Drag, Sunset Flip
Brief description: Princess Victoria was an active competitor in the women's wrestling scene during the 1980s. She made sporadic appearances in various promotions, including those in the Texas area, showcasing her technical skills and athleticism. Her contributions helped pave the way for future generations of female wrestlers.

Professor Toru Tanaka
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1970s (sporadic appearances)
Position on the card: Mid to Upper Card
Wrestling style: Martial Arts
Signature moves: Nerve Hold, Thrust Kick, Karate Chop
Brief description: Professor Toru Tanaka was a prominent heel character known for his martial arts-inspired wrestling style. During the 1970s, he made sporadic appearances in various wrestling promotions, including those in Texas. His intimidating presence and unique style made him a memorable figure in professional wrestling.

The Punisher
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Late 1980s (regular appearances)
Position on the card: Mid-card
Wrestling style: Powerhouse
Signature moves: Big Boot, Powerslam, Spinebuster
Brief description: The Punisher, portrayed by Mark Callaway (who later gained fame as The Undertaker), had a stint in World Class Championship Wrestling during the late 1980s. Competing primarily in the mid-card, he demonstrated a powerful wrestling style that would later become his trademark. His time in WCCW was a formative period in his illustrious career.

P.Y. Chu-Hi
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Late 1980s (regular appearances)
Position on the card: Mid to Upper Card
Wrestling style: Brawler
Signature moves: Lariat, Powerbomb, DDT
Brief description: P.Y. Chu-Hi was a character portrayed by Phil Hickerson in World Class Championship Wrestling during the late 1980s. Adopting a Japanese persona, he competed regularly, engaging in notable feuds and showcasing a brawling wrestling style. His tenure in WCCW added depth to the promotion's roster during that era.

Ramon Torres
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1950s–1960s (regular appearances)
Position on the card: Main Event
Wrestling style: Technical
Signature moves: Dropkick, Arm Drag, Sleeper Hold
Brief description: Ramon Torres was a prominent figure in the 1950s and 1960s, known for his technical prowess and as part of the famous Torres wrestling family. He regularly competed in various NWA territories, including Texas, where he held multiple championships and was a mainstay in the main event scene. 
WIKIPEDIA, THE FREE ENCYCLOPEDIA

Randy Colley
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1980s (sporadic appearances)
Position on the card: Mid-card
Wrestling style: Brawler
Signature moves: Powerslam, Elbow Drop, Clothesline
Brief description: Randy Colley, also known for his role as Moondog Rex, made sporadic appearances in the Texas wrestling scene during the 1980s. He was recognized for his rugged brawling style and was part of the Moondogs tag team, which gained notoriety in various wrestling promotions.

Randy Brewer
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1980s (sporadic appearances)
Position on the card: Mid-card
Wrestling style: Powerhouse
Signature moves: Bearhug, Powerslam, Shoulder Block
Brief description: Randy Brewer was an imposing figure in the 1980s wrestling circuit, known for his strength and power moves. He made sporadic appearances in the Texas-based promotions, contributing to the mid-card with his formidable presence.

Randy Alls
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1980s (sporadic appearances)
Position on the card: Mid-card
Wrestling style: Technical
Signature moves: Suplex, Armbar, Dropkick
Brief description: Randy Alls competed in the 1980s, making sporadic appearances in Texas wrestling promotions. He was known for his technical abilities and contributed to various matches in the mid-card during his tenure.

Ralph Garibaldi
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1970s (sporadic appearances)
Position on the card: Mid-card
Wrestling style: Brawler
Signature moves: Body Slam, Headlock, Knee Drop
Brief description: Ralph Garibaldi was active during the 1970s, making sporadic appearances in the Texas wrestling scene. He was recognized for his brawling style and participated in various mid-card matches during his career.

Ramon Lopez
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1970s–1980s (sporadic appearances)
Position on the card: Mid-card
Wrestling style: Luchador
Signature moves: Hurricanrana, Plancha, Arm Drag
Brief description: Ramon Lopez brought a luchador style to the Texas wrestling promotions during the late 1970s and early 1980s. His high-flying maneuvers and agility made him a unique addition to the mid-card matches in which he participated.

Ramona Isbell
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1970s (sporadic appearances)
Position on the card: Women's Division
Wrestling style: Technical
Signature moves: Body Slam, Snapmare, Leg Drop
Brief description: Ramona Isbell was a female wrestler active in the 1970s, making sporadic appearances in Texas-based promotions. She was known for her technical wrestling skills and contributed to the women's division during her tenure.

Raúl Mata
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Late 1960s to 1970s (regular appearances)
Position on the card: Main Event
Wrestling style: Technical
Signature moves: Mata Rola (modified huracánrana), Dropkick
Brief description: Raúl Mata, known as the "Hawk of Mexico," was a prominent figure in professional wrestling during the late 1960s and 1970s. He held multiple championships, including the Mexican National Light Heavyweight Championship and the NWA Americas Tag Team Championship with various partners. Mata was renowned for his technical wrestling skills and was a mainstay in the main event scene across various promotions. 
WIKIPEDIA, THE FREE ENCYCLOPEDIA

Ray Duran
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1950s (regular appearances)
Position on the card: Mid-card
Wrestling style: Technical
Signature moves: Arm Drag, Headlock, Dropkick
Brief description: Ray Duran was an active competitor in the Texas wrestling scene during the 1950s. He regularly appeared in matches, showcasing his technical wrestling abilities and contributing to the vibrant wrestling culture of the era.

Ray Eckert
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1950s–1960s (regular appearances)
Position on the card: Mid-card
Wrestling style: Brawler
Signature moves: Body Slam, Elbow Drop, Bear Hug
Brief description: Ray Eckert was known for his brawling style and physical presence in the ring. He competed regularly in the Texas wrestling circuit during the 1950s and 1960s, engaging in numerous matches that entertained fans of the period.

Ray Evans
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1960s (sporadic appearances)
Position on the card: Mid-card
Wrestling style: Technical
Signature moves: Suplex, Armbar, Knee Drop
Brief description: Ray Evans made sporadic appearances in the Texas wrestling scene during the 1960s. He was recognized for his technical wrestling skills and participated in various matches across the region.

Ray Gordon
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1960s–1970s (regular appearances)
Position on the card: Mid-card
Wrestling style: Brawler
Signature moves: Clothesline, Power Slam, Headbutt
Brief description: Ray Gordon was a regular competitor in the Texas wrestling promotions during the 1960s and 1970s. Known for his brawling style, he engaged in numerous matches that contributed to the dynamic wrestling scene of the time.

Ray Gunkel
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1950s–1960s (regular appearances)
Position on the card: Main Event
Wrestling style: Technical
Signature moves: Body Slam, Dropkick, Sleeper Hold
Brief description: Ray Gunkel was a prominent figure in professional wrestling during the 1950s and 1960s. He held multiple championships, including the NWA Texas Heavyweight Championship and the NWA Texas Tag Team Championship. Gunkel was known for his technical wrestling skills and was a mainstay in the main event scene across various promotions. 
WIKIPEDIA, THE FREE ENCYCLOPEDIA

Ray Mendoza
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1960s–1970s (sporadic appearances)
Position on the card: Main Event
Wrestling style: Technical
Signature moves: Suplex, Armbar, Dropkick
Brief description: Ray Mendoza was a renowned Mexican wrestler who made sporadic appearances in various promotions, including those in Texas, during the 1960s and 1970s. He was a multiple-time NWA World Light Heavyweight Champion and was instrumental in the development of lucha libre. Mendoza was also the patriarch of the Villano wrestling family. 
WIKIPEDIA, THE FREE ENCYCLOPEDIA

Ray Stevens
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1960s–1970s (sporadic appearances)
Position on the card: Main Event
Wrestling style: High-flying
Signature moves: Bombs Away Knee Drop, Piledriver, Turnbuckle Flip
Brief description: Ray Stevens was a prominent figure in professional wrestling during the 1960s and 1970s. He held multiple championships, including the AWA World Tag Team Championship and the NWA United States Heavyweight Championship. Stevens was known for his high-flying wrestling style and was a mainstay in the main event scene across various promotions. 

Red Bastien
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1970s (regular appearances)
Position on the card: Mid-card
Wrestling style: Technical
Signature moves: Dropkick, Flying Headscissors, Arm Drag
Brief description: Red Bastien was an active competitor in the Texas wrestling scene during the 1970s. He regularly appeared in matches, showcasing his technical wrestling abilities and contributing to the vibrant wrestling culture of the era. 
SPORTS AND WRESTLING

Red Berry
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1950s–1960s (regular appearances)
Position on the card: Mid-card
Wrestling style: Brawler
Signature moves: Body Slam, Elbow Drop, Bear Hug
Brief description: Red Berry was known for his brawling style and physical presence in the ring. He competed regularly in the Texas wrestling circuit during the 1950s and 1960s, engaging in numerous matches that entertained fans of the period.

Red River Jack
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1987 (regular appearances)
Position on the card: Main Event
Wrestling style: Brawler
Signature moves: Jumping Knee Drop, Big Boot, Piledriver
Brief description: Red River Jack was one of the ring personas of Bruiser Brody, adopted during a storyline in World Class Championship Wrestling (WCCW) in 1987. As Red River Jack, Brody wore a mask to conceal his identity while feuding with managers Gary Hart and Skandor Akbar's factions. This persona allowed Brody to circumvent storyline suspensions and continue his intense rivalries within the promotion. 
WIKIPEDIA, THE FREE ENCYCLOPEDIA

Reggie Lisowski
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1950s (sporadic appearances)
Position on the card: Main Event
Wrestling style: Brawler
Signature moves: Bolo Punch, Stomach Claw, Bear Hug
Brief description: Reggie Lisowski, better known as "The Crusher," was a prominent figure in professional wrestling during the 1950s and beyond. While he made sporadic appearances in the Texas wrestling scene, he was best known for his time in the American Wrestling Association (AWA), where he became a three-time World Heavyweight Champion. Lisowski's brawling style and charismatic persona made him a fan favorite and a significant draw in various wrestling territories. 
WIKIPEDIA, THE FREE ENCYCLOPEDIA

Rene Goulet
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1970s (sporadic appearances)
Position on the card: Mid-card
Wrestling style: Technical
Signature moves: Clawhold, Dropkick, European Uppercut
Brief description: Rene Goulet, born Robert Bedard, was a French-Canadian professional wrestler known for his technical prowess and distinctive blond hair. Throughout the 1970s, Goulet made sporadic appearances in various wrestling promotions, including those in Texas. He competed against a range of opponents, showcasing his versatility and skill in the ring. Beyond his in-ring career, Goulet later became a road agent for the World Wrestling Federation (WWF), contributing to the industry behind the scenes.

Rene Guajardo
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1960s–1970s (sporadic appearances)
Position on the card: Main Event
Wrestling style: Technical
Signature moves: Suplex, Armbar, Dropkick
Brief description: Rene Guajardo was a renowned Mexican professional wrestler and promoter, considered one of the greatest figures in lucha libre history. During the 1960s and 1970s, he made sporadic appearances in various wrestling promotions, including those in Texas. Guajardo was known for his technical wrestling abilities and was a multiple-time NWA World Middleweight Champion. He also played a significant role in promoting wrestling events in Mexico, contributing to the growth and popularity of the sport.

Renegade Warriors
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Late 1980s (sporadic appearances)
Position on the card: Tag Team Division
Wrestling style: High-Flying and Technical
Signature moves: Double Dropkick, Flying Crossbody, Sunset Flip
Brief description: The Renegade Warriors, consisting of brothers Chris and Mark Youngblood, were a Native American tag team known for their energetic and high-flying wrestling style. They made sporadic appearances in World Class Championship Wrestling during the late 1980s, engaging in matches that showcased their agility and teamwork. Their presence added diversity to the tag team division during their tenure.

Ric McCord
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1980s (regular appearances)
Position on the card: Mid-card
Wrestling style: Technical
Signature moves: Dropkick, Arm Drag, Sleeper Hold
Brief description: Ric McCord was a skilled technical wrestler who competed regularly in World Class Championship Wrestling during the 1980s. He was known for his clean wrestling techniques and had several notable matches, contributing to the mid-card talent of the promotion. McCord's in-ring abilities made him a respected competitor among his peers.

Rick Harris
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1980s (sporadic appearances)
Position on the card: Mid-card
Wrestling style: Brawler
Signature moves: Clothesline, Powerslam, Elbow Drop
Brief description: Rick Harris, who later gained fame as Black Bart, made sporadic appearances in the Texas wrestling scene during the 1980s. Known for his rugged brawling style, Harris engaged in various feuds and matches that highlighted his toughness and persona. His contributions added depth to the roster during his tenure.

Rick Rude
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1985–1986 (regular appearances)
Position on the card: Main Event
Wrestling style: Technical and Power
Signature moves: Rude Awakening (neckbreaker), Piledriver, Diving Fist Drop
Brief description: "Ravishing" Rick Rude debuted in World Class Championship Wrestling (WCCW) in October 1985, managed by Percy Pringle. He quickly rose to prominence, capturing the NWA American Heavyweight Championship in November 1985. Following WCCW's withdrawal from the NWA in February 1986, the title was renamed the WCWA World Heavyweight Championship, making Rude the promotion's inaugural world champion. He held the title until July 1986, engaging in notable feuds with Kevin Von Erich and Chris Adams. Rude's tenure in WCCW solidified his reputation as a top heel in professional wrestling. 

Rick Rood
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1985–1986 (regular appearances)
Position on the card: Main Event
Wrestling style: Technical and Power
Signature moves: Rude Awakening (neckbreaker), Piledriver, Diving Fist Drop
Brief description: Rick Rood, better known as "Ravishing" Rick Rude, had a significant run in World Class Championship Wrestling (WCCW) from 1985 to 1986. Managed by Percy Pringle, he secured the NWA American Heavyweight Championship, which was later recognized as the WCWA World Heavyweight Championship. Rood's charismatic persona and in-ring prowess made him a standout performer during his tenure. 

Ricky Morton
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1988 (sporadic appearances)
Position on the card: Main Event
Wrestling style: High-Flying and Technical
Signature moves: Dropkick, Crossbody, Sunset Flip
Brief description: Ricky Morton, as part of the Rock 'n' Roll Express with Robert Gibson, made notable appearances in World Class Championship Wrestling (WCCW) in 1988. They participated in high-profile matches, including a bout at SuperClash III against The Stud Stable. Morton's high-energy style and ability to garner audience sympathy made him a standout performer during his tenure in WCCW. 
WIKIPEDIA, THE FREE ENCYCLOPEDIA
WIKIPEDIA, THE FREE ENCYCLOPEDIA

Ricky Hunter
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1973 (regular appearances)
Position on the card: Mid-card
Wrestling style: Technical
Signature moves: Body Slam, Arm Drag, Sleeper Hold
Brief description: Ricky Hunter competed in World Class Championship Wrestling in 1973, showcasing his technical wrestling skills. He was known for his in-ring versatility and contributed to the promotion's mid-card talent during his tenure. 
WIKIPEDIA, THE FREE ENCYCLOPEDIA

Ricky Romero
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1960s–1970s (regular appearances)
Position on the card: Main Event
Wrestling style: Technical and Brawler
Signature moves: Indian Deathlock, Dropkick, Armbar
Brief description: Ricky Romero was a prominent figure in the Texas wrestling scene during the 1960s and 1970s. He regularly competed in NWA Big Time Wrestling, engaging in high-profile matches and feuds. Romero's blend of technical prowess and brawling tactics made him a fan favorite and a mainstay in the main event scene.

Ricky Gibson
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1980s (sporadic appearances)
Position on the card: Mid-card
Wrestling style: Technical
Signature moves: Dropkick, Suplex, Arm Drag
Brief description: Ricky Gibson, the older brother of Robert Gibson, made sporadic appearances in the Texas wrestling scene during the 1980s. He was known for his technical wrestling abilities and contributed to the mid-card talent pool during his tenure.

Ricky Hunter
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1973 (regular appearances)
Position on the card: Mid-card
Wrestling style: Technical
Signature moves: Body Slam, Arm Drag, Sleeper Hold
Brief description: Ricky Hunter competed in World Class Championship Wrestling in 1973, showcasing his technical wrestling skills. He was known for his in-ring versatility and contributed to the promotion's mid-card talent during his tenure. 
WIKIPEDIA, THE FREE ENCYCLOPEDIA

Ricky Morton
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1988 (sporadic appearances)
Position on the card: Main Event
Wrestling style: High-Flying and Technical
Signature moves: Dropkick, Crossbody, Sunset Flip
Brief description: Ricky Morton, as part of the Rock 'n Roll Express competed against top stars of the era. Known for his resilience and technical ability, Romero was a major draw in Texas wrestling and had a lasting impact on the promotion. He also played a key role in training and mentoring future wrestlers, including his son, Jay Youngblood.

Ricky Gibson
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1970s (sporadic appearances)
Position on the card: Mid-card
Wrestling style: Technical
Signature moves: Dropkick, Sunset Flip, Headlock Takedown
Brief description: Ricky Gibson, the older brother of Robert Gibson from the Rock 'n' Roll Express, made sporadic appearances in the Texas wrestling scene during the 1970s. He was known for his solid in-ring skills and ability to work with a variety of opponents. Though not a top star in the region, his contributions helped enhance the overall roster depth.

Rip Hawk
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1960s–1970s (sporadic appearances)
Position on the card: Mid to Upper Card
Wrestling style: Brawler
Signature moves: Knee Drop, Piledriver, Neckbreaker
Brief description: Rip Hawk, known as "The Profile," was a prominent heel wrestler during the 1960s and 1970s. He made sporadic appearances in the Texas wrestling scene, including NWA Big Time Wrestling. Hawk was known for his rough wrestling style and charismatic persona, often engaging in feuds with top babyfaces of the era. He also formed a successful tag team with Swede Hanson, capturing multiple regional championships.

Rip Oliver
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1985–1986 (regular appearances)
Position on the card: Mid to Upper Card
Wrestling style: Brawler
Signature moves: DDT, Piledriver, Sleeper Hold
Brief description: "Crippler" Rip Oliver was a notable figure in World Class Championship Wrestling during the mid-1980s. Managed by Jim Cornette, he was involved in significant storylines, including a feud with Mike Von Erich, where he infamously broke Von Erich's arm, leading to a high-profile match at Texas Stadium. Oliver also captured the WCCW Television Championship during his tenure, solidifying his status as a formidable heel in the promotion. 
WIKIPEDIA, THE FREE ENCYCLOPEDIA

Rip Rogers
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1980s (sporadic appearances)
Position on the card: Mid-card
Wrestling style: Technical and High-Flying
Signature moves: Diving Elbow Drop, Figure-Four Leglock, Moonsault
Brief description: Rip Rogers, born Mark Sciarra, was an American professional wrestler known for his flamboyant persona and in-ring versatility. During the 1980s, he made sporadic appearances in various NWA territories, including stints in Texas. Rogers was recognized for his technical prowess and high-flying maneuvers, often competing in both singles and tag team divisions. Beyond his in-ring career, he became a respected trainer, contributing significantly to the development of future wrestling talents. 
WIKIPEDIA, THE FREE ENCYCLOPEDIA

Rito Romero
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1950s–1960s (regular appearances)
Position on the card: Main Event
Wrestling style: Technical
Signature moves: Romero Special (Surfboard), Arm Drag, Dropkick
Brief description: Rito Romero was a celebrated Mexican luchador who achieved significant success in both Mexico and the United States during the 1950s and 1960s. He was a regular competitor in NWA Big Time Wrestling, where he held multiple championships, including the NWA Texas Heavyweight and Tag Team titles. Romero was renowned for innovating the "Romero Special" submission hold and had memorable matches against top talents of his era. 
WIKIPEDIA, THE FREE ENCYCLOPEDIA

Robert Fuller
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1988–1989 (regular appearances)
Position on the card: Manager and Wrestler
Wrestling style: Brawler
Signature moves: Spinebuster, Sleeper Hold, Knee Drop
Brief description: Robert Fuller, also known as Col. Robert Parker, was a prominent figure in World Class Championship Wrestling during the late 1980s. He served both as a wrestler and manager, leading the Stud Stable faction. Fuller's managerial prowess and in-ring abilities made him a central character in various storylines, contributing to the promotion's entertainment value during his tenure.

Rock 'n' Roll Express
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1980s (sporadic appearances)
Position on the card: Main Event
Wrestling style: High-Flying and Technical
Signature moves: Double Dropkick, Double Hip Toss, Double Back Elbow
Brief description: The Rock 'n' Roll Express, consisting of Ricky Morton and Robert Gibson, were a groundbreaking tag team known for their high-energy performances and significant influence on tag team wrestling. In the 1980s, they made sporadic appearances in World Class Championship Wrestling, engaging in notable matches that showcased their agility and teamwork. Their presence added star power to the promotion's tag team division. 
WIKIPEDIA, THE FREE ENCYCLOPEDIA

Rock 'n' Roll RPMs
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Mid-1980s (regular appearances)
Position on the card: Mid to Upper Card
Wrestling style: Heel Tag Team
Signature moves: Spandex Splits (outlawed due to injuries), Double Team Maneuvers
Brief description: The Rock 'n' Roll RPMs, composed of Tommy Lane and Mike Davis, were a heel tag team known for their bright-colored tights and bandanas. They regularly competed in World Class Championship Wrestling during the mid-1980s, engaging in feuds with teams like The Fantastics and The Rock 'n' Roll Express. Their in-ring tactics and persona made them a notable presence in the tag team division. 
WIKIPEDIA, THE FREE ENCYCLOPEDIA

Robert Fuller
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1980s (sporadic appearances)
Position on the card: Mid to Upper Card
Wrestling style: Technical and Brawler
Signature moves: Sleeper Hold, Piledriver, Knee Drop
Brief description: Robert Fuller, also known as Col. Robert Parker, made sporadic appearances in the Texas wrestling scene during the 1980s. He was known for his technical skills and charismatic presence, often engaging in both wrestling and managerial roles. Fuller's versatility contributed to various storylines and feuds within the promotion.

Robert Gibson
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1980s (sporadic appearances)
Position on the card: Main Event
Wrestling style: High-Flying and Technical
Signature moves: Dropkick, Arm Drag, Double Dropkick (with Ricky Morton)
Brief description: As one half of the Rock 'n' Roll Express, Robert Gibson brought high-flying and technical prowess to the tag team division. His chemistry with Ricky Morton led to memorable matches and feuds, enhancing the promotion's appeal during their appearances. 

Rocky Johnson
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1970s (sporadic appearances)
Position on the card: Main Event
Wrestling style: Technical and Power
Signature moves: Dropkick, Boston Crab, Running Shoulder Block
Brief description: Rocky Johnson, known for his athleticism and charisma, made sporadic appearances in the Texas wrestling scene during the 1970s. He achieved significant success in various NWA territories, including winning the NWA Texas Heavyweight Championship. Johnson's dynamic in-ring style and trailblazing achievements, such as being one half of the first African-American WWF Tag Team Champions, cemented his legacy in professional wrestling. 
WIKIPEDIA, THE FREE ENCYCLOPEDIA

Roddy Piper
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1970s (sporadic appearances)
Position on the card: Mid to Upper Card
Wrestling style: Brawler
Signature moves: Sleeper Hold, Eye Poke, Running Knee Lift
Brief description: "Rowdy" Roddy Piper, renowned for his sharp wit and fiery persona, made sporadic appearances in the Texas wrestling circuit during the 1970s. He engaged in memorable feuds and showcased his brawling style, contributing to his reputation as one of wrestling's most compelling villains. Piper's influence extended beyond the ring, with a successful career in entertainment and a lasting legacy in professional wrestling. 
WIKIPEDIA, THE FREE ENCYCLOPEDIA

Roger Kirby
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1970s (regular appearances)
Position on the card: Mid-card
Wrestling style: Technical
Signature moves: Abdominal Stretch, Piledriver, Knee Drop
Brief description: Roger Kirby was a skilled technical wrestler who competed regularly in the Texas wrestling scene during the 1970s. He held the NWA World Junior Heavyweight Championship and was known for his solid in-ring performances and versatility, contributing significantly to the mid-card talent of the promotion.

Rolando Vera
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1950s–1960s (sporadic appearances)
Position on the card: Main Event
Wrestling style: Technical
Signature moves: La Casita (Small Package), Arm Drag, Dropkick
Brief description: Rolando Vera, a legendary Mexican wrestler, made sporadic appearances in the Texas wrestling territories during the 1950s and 1960s. Known for his technical mastery and innovation, Vera influenced many wrestlers and contributed to the popularity of lucha libre. His matches in Texas showcased his unique style and left a lasting impact on the region's wrestling scene.

Ron Cheatham
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1980s (sporadic appearances)
Position on the card: Mid-card
Wrestling style: Brawler
Signature moves: Body Slam, Elbow Drop, Clothesline
Brief description: Ron Cheatham competed in the Texas wrestling scene during the 1980s, making sporadic appearances in World Class Championship Wrestling. Known for his brawling style, Cheatham participated in various matches that added depth to the promotion's mid-card roster during his tenure.

Ron Garvin
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1980s (sporadic appearances)
Position on the card: Main Event
Wrestling style: Technical and Brawler
Signature moves: Knockout Punch ("Hands of Stone"), Sunset Flip, Sleeper Hold
Brief description: Ron Garvin, known as "The Man with the Hands of Stone," made sporadic appearances in the Texas wrestling scene during the 1980s. He gained prominence in various NWA territories and is best remembered for his tenure in Jim Crockett Promotions, where he captured the NWA World Heavyweight Championship in 1987 by defeating Ric Flair. Garvin's hard-hitting style and resilience made him a formidable competitor. 
WIKIPEDIA, THE FREE ENCYCLOPEDIA

Ron Starr
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1989 (sporadic appearances)
Position on the card: Mid to Upper Card
Wrestling style: Technical and Brawler
Signature moves: Diving Headbutt, Piledriver, Suplex Variations
Brief description: Ron Starr was a seasoned wrestler known for his versatility and toughness. In 1989, he competed in the World Class Wrestling Association (WCWA), where he and Sheik Braddock won the USWA World Tag Team Championship by defeating Matt Borne and Jeff Jarrett. Starr's extensive career included multiple championships across various territories, highlighting his adaptability and skill in the ring. 
WIKIPEDIA, THE FREE ENCYCLOPEDIA

Ronnie Etchison
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1950s–1960s (regular appearances)
Position on the card: Mid-card
Wrestling style: Technical
Signature moves: Arm Drag, Headlock, Dropkick
Brief description: Ronnie Etchison was a respected technical wrestler who regularly competed in the Texas wrestling circuit during the 1950s and 1960s. Known for his scientific approach to wrestling, Etchison engaged in numerous matches that showcased his grappling skills and sportsmanship.

Ronnie P. Gossett
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1980s (sporadic appearances)
Position on the card: Manager
Wrestling style: Managerial
Signature moves: N/A
Brief description: Ronnie P. Gossett was a wrestling manager known for his work in various Southern wrestling promotions during the 1980s. He made sporadic appearances in the Texas wrestling scene, where he managed several heel wrestlers, contributing to their storylines and character development with his charismatic presence.

Roy Dunn
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1950s (regular appearances)
Position on the card: Main Event
Wrestling style: Technical
Signature moves: Body Slam, Headlock, Suplex
Brief description: Roy Dunn was an accomplished amateur wrestler who transitioned into professional wrestling after competing in the 1936 Berlin Olympics. In the 1950s, he became a prominent figure in the Texas wrestling scene, holding the World Heavyweight Title from 1940 until his retirement in 1957. Dunn's technical prowess and legitimate wrestling background made him a respected and formidable competitor in the ring. 
NORTHWESTERN OKLAHOMA STATE ATHLETICS

Ruben Juarez
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1970s (sporadic appearances)
Position on the card: Mid-card
Wrestling style: Technical
Signature moves: Dropkick, Arm Drag, Crossbody
Brief description: Ruben Juarez was a notable figure in the Light Heavyweight division in Mexico, holding the Mexican National Light Heavyweight Championship in the early 1970s. He made sporadic appearances in NWA Big Time Wrestling, showcasing his technical skills and contributing to the promotion's diverse roster during his tenure. 
LUCHA WORLD

Roy Heffernan
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1950s–1960s (sporadic appearances)
Position on the card: Tag Team Division
Wrestling style: Technical
Signature moves: Atomic Drop, Abdominal Stretch, Double Team Maneuvers
Brief description: Roy Heffernan was best known as one half of the tag team "The Fabulous Kangaroos" alongside Al Costello. The team made sporadic appearances in the Texas wrestling scene during the 1950s and 1960s, bringing their unique style and showmanship to the audience. Heffernan's contributions to tag team wrestling left a lasting impact on the sport.

Roy McClarity
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1950s (sporadic appearances)
Position on the card: Mid-card
Wrestling style: Technical
Signature moves: Dropkick, Armbar, Hip Toss
Brief description: Roy McClarity was a skilled technical wrestler who competed in various territories during the 1950s, including sporadic appearances in the Texas wrestling circuit. He was known for his solid in-ring abilities and sportsmanship, contributing to the wrestling scene during his active years.

Rudy LaDitzi
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1950s (sporadic appearances)
Position on the card: Mid-card
Wrestling style: Brawler
Signature moves: Body Slam, Elbow Drop, Headlock
Brief description: Rudy LaDitzi was a professional wrestler active during the 1950s, making sporadic appearances in the Texas wrestling scene. He was known for his brawling style and rugged persona, engaging in various matches that entertained the audience of that era.

Ruffy Silverstein
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1950s–1960s (sporadic appearances)
Position on the card: Mid to Upper Card
Wrestling style: Technical and Brawler
Signature moves: Bear Hug, Backbreaker, Suplex
Brief description: Ruffy Silverstein was a prominent wrestler during the 1950s and 1960s, known for his strength and versatility in the ring. He made sporadic appearances in the Texas wrestling territory, showcasing his skills against various opponents. Silverstein's contributions to professional wrestling were significant during his active years.

Salvador Lothario
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1960s–1970s (regular appearances)
Position on the card: Mid to Upper Card
Wrestling style: Technical and High-Flying
Signature moves: Dropkick, Flying Crossbody, Arm Drag
Brief description: Salvador "Chavo" Lothario was a prominent figure in the Texas wrestling scene during the 1960s and 1970s. He was known for his technical prowess and high-flying maneuvers, captivating audiences with his athleticism. Lothario held multiple regional championships and was instrumental in training future wrestling stars, most notably Shawn Michaels. His contributions to wrestling in Texas left a lasting legacy.

Sam Steamboat
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1960s (sporadic appearances)
Position on the card: Mid-card
Wrestling style: Technical
Signature moves: Arm Drag, Headlock, Dropkick
Brief description: Sam Steamboat was a Hawaiian wrestler known for his technical skills and charisma. In the 1960s, he made sporadic appearances in various NWA territories, including Texas. Steamboat was known for his in-ring versatility and contributed to the promotion's mid-card talent during his tenure.

Sammy Baldwin
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1950s–1960s (regular appearances)
Position on the card: Mid-card
Wrestling style: Technical
Signature moves: Body Slam, Arm Drag, Sleeper Hold
Brief description: Sammy Baldwin was an active competitor in the Texas wrestling scene during the 1950s and 1960s. He regularly appeared in matches, showcasing his technical wrestling abilities and contributing to the vibrant wrestling culture of the era.

Samoan Swat Team
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1988–1989 (regular appearances)
Position on the card: Main Event
Wrestling style: Brawling and High-Impact
Signature moves: Samoan Drop, Diving Headbutt, Double Team Maneuvers
Brief description: The Samoan Swat Team, originally comprising Fatu and Samu, debuted in WCCW in 1988 under the management of Buddy Roberts. They quickly established themselves as a dominant force, capturing the WCWA World Tag Team Championship by defeating Kerry and Kevin Von Erich on August 12, 1988. They also won the WCWA Texas Tag Team Championship on September 12, 1988, becoming double champions. The team was known for their aggressive style and feuds with top teams, including bouts against Michael Hayes and Steve Cox at AWA SuperClash III. They left WCCW in early 1989, vacating both titles upon their departure. 
WIKIPEDIA, THE FREE ENCYCLOPEDIA
PRO WRESTLING

Samu
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1988–1989 (regular appearances)
Position on the card: Main Event
Wrestling style: Brawling and High-Impact
Signature moves: Samoan Drop, Diving Headbutt
Brief description: Samu, born Samuel Fred Anoa'i, was one half of the Samoan Swat Team alongside his cousin Fatu. In WCCW, Samu showcased his power and agility, contributing to the team's success in capturing both the WCWA World Tag Team and Texas Tag Team Championships. His tenure in WCCW was marked by intense matches and a significant impact on the tag team division. 
WIKIPEDIA, THE FREE ENCYCLOPEDIA

Skandor Akbar
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1977–1990s (regular appearances)
Position on the card: Manager
Wrestling style: Managerial (Heel)
Signature moves: Fireball Throw
Brief description: Born Jimmy Saied Wehba, Skandor Akbar transitioned from wrestling to managing in 1977, becoming a prominent heel manager in WCCW. He led the notorious stable "Devastation, Inc.," managing numerous wrestlers and often interfering in matches to secure victories for his protégés. Akbar was known for his cigar-smoking persona and occasional use of fireballs against opponents. His managerial career significantly influenced the heel dynamics in WCCW during his tenure. 


Sammy Berg
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1950s–1960s (sporadic appearances)
Position on the card: Mid-card
Wrestling style: Powerhouse
Signature moves: Body Slam, Bear Hug, Suplex
Brief description: Sammy Berg, also known as "Mr. Canada," was a Canadian professional wrestler who competed in various territories during the 1950s and 1960s. He made sporadic appearances in the Texas wrestling scene, showcasing his strength and power-based wrestling style. Berg was known for his imposing physique and was a notable mid-card attraction during his tenure.

Sandor Kovacs
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1960s (sporadic appearances)
Position on the card: Mid-card
Wrestling style: Technical
Signature moves: Headlock, Arm Drag, Dropkick
Brief description: Sandor Kovacs was a Hungarian-born professional wrestler who competed in various NWA territories during the 1960s. He made sporadic appearances in the Texas wrestling circuit, known for his technical wrestling skills and European style. Kovacs later became a prominent wrestling promoter, co-founding the Pacific Northwest Wrestling promotion.

Sandor Szabo
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1950s (sporadic appearances)
Position on the card: Main Event
Wrestling style: Technical
Signature moves: Sleeper Hold, Body Slam, Suplex
Brief description: Sandor Szabo was a Hungarian-American professional wrestler who gained prominence in the 1940s and 1950s. He made sporadic appearances in the Texas wrestling scene, often featured in main event matches due to his popularity and in-ring prowess. Szabo was known for his technical wrestling ability and was a major draw in various territories during his career.

Scott Braddock
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1987–1989 (regular appearances)
Position on the card: Mid-card
Wrestling style: Brawler
Signature moves: Clothesline, Powerslam, DDT
Brief description: Scott Braddock was a professional wrestler who competed in World Class Championship Wrestling during the late 1980s. He was known for his rugged, brawling style and was often featured in mid-card matches. Braddock was part of manager Skandor Akbar's stable, Devastation Inc., and engaged in various feuds with popular babyface wrestlers of the time.

Sheik Braddock
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1988–1989 (regular appearances)
Position on the card: Mid to Upper Card
Wrestling style: Brawler
Signature moves: Piledriver, Clothesline, Suplex
Brief description: Sheik Braddock, born Scott Braddock, was an American professional wrestler who competed in World Class Championship Wrestling during the late 1980s. Managed by Skandor Akbar, he was a member of the heel stable Devastation Inc. Braddock formed a notable tag team with Cactus Jack, and together they won the WCWA World Tag Team Championship on August 4, 1989, defeating Matt Borne and Jeff Jarrett. Their reign was brief, as they lost the titles back to Borne and Jarrett shortly thereafter. Braddock's tenure in WCCW was marked by his alliance with prominent heels and participation in significant feuds. 
WIKIPEDIA, THE FREE ENCYCLOPEDIA

Simpson Brothers
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1987–1989 (regular appearances)
Position on the card: Mid to Upper Card
Wrestling style: Technical and High-Flying
Signature moves: Double Dropkick, Double Hip Toss, Double Back Elbow
Brief description: The Simpson Brothers, Steve and Shaun Simpson, were a South African tag team who gained prominence in World Class Championship Wrestling during the late 1980s. Allied with the Von Erich family, they were fan favorites and captured the WCWA World Tag Team Championship. Their notable feuds included battles against John Tatum and Jack Victory. The brothers were known for their technical prowess and high-flying maneuvers, contributing significantly to the tag team division during their tenure. 

Skandor Akbar
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1970s–1990s (regular appearances)
Position on the card: Manager
Wrestling style: Managerial (Heel)
Signature moves: Not applicable
Brief description: Skandor Akbar, born Jim Wehba, was a prominent manager in WCCW and WCWA from the 1970s through the 1990s. He led the villainous stable "Devastation, Inc.," managing numerous wrestlers, including King Kong Bundy, One Man Gang, and Kamala. Akbar's managerial tactics and charismatic presence made him a central figure in many storylines, significantly impacting the promotions' dynamics.

Skip Young
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1980s (regular appearances)
Position on the card: Mid-card
Wrestling style: Technical and High-Flying
Signature moves: Dropkick, Flying Crossbody, Arm Drag
Brief description: Skip Young, also known as "Sweet Brown Sugar," was a talented wrestler who competed in WCCW during the 1980s. He was known for his technical skills and high-flying maneuvers, engaging in memorable matches with various opponents. Young's athleticism and in-ring charisma made him a favorite among fans during his tenure.

Skull Murphy
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1950s–1960s (sporadic appearances)
Position on the card: Mid to Upper Card
Wrestling style: Brawler
Signature moves: Knee Drop, Piledriver, Neckbreaker
Brief description: Skull Murphy, born John Joseph Murphy, was a Canadian professional wrestler known for his rugged brawling style. He competed in various promotions during the 1950s and 1960s, including sporadic appearances in Texas. Murphy formed a notable tag team with Brute Bernard, capturing multiple championships, including the WWWF United States Tag Team Championship. His intense in-ring persona made him a formidable competitor. 
WIKIPEDIA, THE FREE ENCYCLOPEDIA

Sky Low Low
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1950s–1960s (sporadic appearances)
Position on the card: Special Attraction
Wrestling style: Technical
Signature moves: Headscissors, Arm Drag, Dropkick
Brief description: Sky Low Low, born Marcel Gauthier, was a celebrated midget wrestler who gained fame in the 1950s and 1960s. Standing at 3 feet 7 inches, he was known for his technical wrestling skills and entertaining performances. Sky Low Low made sporadic appearances in various promotions, including those in Texas, often featured in special attraction matches that delighted audiences.

Slave Girl Moolah
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1980s (sporadic appearances)
Position on the card: Manager/Valet
Wrestling style: Managerial
Signature moves: Not applicable
Brief description: "Slave Girl" Moolah, born Lillian Ellison, was better known as The Fabulous Moolah. In the 1980s, she occasionally appeared in WCCW as a manager/valet under the moniker "Slave Girl Moolah," aligning herself with various wrestlers. Her presence added intrigue to storylines, and her legacy as a pioneering female wrestler and manager left a lasting impact on the industry.

Smasher Sloan
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1970s (sporadic appearances)
Position on the card: Mid-card
Wrestling style: Brawler
Signature moves: Body Slam, Elbow Drop, Bear Hug
Brief description: Smasher Sloan was a professional wrestler known for his brawling style and physical presence in the ring. He competed in various promotions during the 1970s, including sporadic appearances in the Texas wrestling scene. Sloan's rugged persona and in-ring toughness made him a memorable competitor during his tenure.

Sonny King
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1970s (sporadic appearances)
Position on the card: Mid to Upper Card
Wrestling style: Brawler
Signature moves: Headbutt
Brief description: Sonny King, born Larry Johnson, was an American professional wrestler who competed in various promotions during the 1970s. He is best known for his time in the World Wide Wrestling Federation (WWWF), where he won the WWWF Tag Team Championship with Chief Jay Strongbow in May 1972. King made sporadic appearances in the Texas wrestling scene, bringing his brawling style and charismatic presence to the ring. He also had stints as a manager later in his career. 
WIKIPEDIA, THE FREE ENCYCLOPEDIA

The Spoiler
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1960s–1980s (regular appearances)
Position on the card: Main Event
Wrestling style: Technical and High-Flying
Signature moves: Clawhold, Flying Crossbody
Brief description: The Spoiler, born Don Jardine, was a Canadian professional wrestler best known for his masked persona. He was a major star in various wrestling promotions, including significant runs in Texas-based territories. Jardine's character, The Spoiler, was known for his agility and technical prowess, often utilizing the Clawhold as a finisher. He had a significant impact on the wrestling scene in Texas, contributing to the popularity and development of the sport in the region.

Sputnik Monroe
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1950s–1960s (regular appearances)
Position on the card: Main Event
Wrestling style: Brawler
Signature moves: Neckbreaker, Piledriver
Brief description: Sputnik Monroe, born Roscoe Monroe Brumbaugh, was a prominent figure in the Texas wrestling scene during the 1950s and 1960s. Known for his charismatic persona and brawling style, Monroe was instrumental in desegregating wrestling audiences in the South, often insisting on integrated seating for his matches. His influence extended beyond the ring, contributing to significant social change within the wrestling community.

Stan Hansen
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Late 1970s–1980s (sporadic appearances)
Position on the card: Main Event
Wrestling style: Brawler
Signature moves: Lariat, Powerbomb
Brief description: Stan Hansen, known for his hard-hitting style and powerful lariat, made sporadic appearances in the Texas wrestling territories during the late 1970s and 1980s. While he achieved significant fame in Japan, Hansen's tenure in Texas included notable matches and feuds that showcased his intense in-ring persona.

Stan Kowalski
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1950s–1960s (sporadic appearances)
Position on the card: Mid to Upper Card
Wrestling style: Powerhouse
Signature moves: Bear Hug, Body Slam
Brief description: Stan Kowalski, born Bert Smith, was a formidable presence in the wrestling world during the 1950s and 1960s. He made sporadic appearances in Texas, often competing in tag team matches. Kowalski's powerful build and aggressive style made him a notable competitor in various territories.

Stan Stasiak
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1960s–1970s (sporadic appearances)
Position on the card: Main Event
Wrestling style: Brawler
Signature moves: Heart Punch
Brief description: Stan Stasiak, born George Stipich, was a Canadian professional wrestler best known for his finishing move, the Heart Punch. He made sporadic appearances in the Texas wrestling scene during the 1960s and 1970s, bringing his hard-hitting style to the ring. Stasiak briefly held the WWWF World Heavyweight Championship in 1973.

Stan Vachon
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1960s (sporadic appearances)
Position on the card: Mid-card
Wrestling style: Brawler
Signature moves: Body Slam, Elbow Drop
Brief description: Stan Vachon, part of the famous Vachon wrestling family, competed in various territories during the 1960s. He made sporadic appearances in Texas, often participating in tag team matches alongside his brothers. Vachon's rugged style and family legacy made him a notable figure in the wrestling world.

Stella Mae French
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1980s (regular appearances)
Position on the card: Mid-card
Wrestling style: Brawler
Signature moves: Clothesline, Suplex
Brief description: Stella Mae French was a female wrestler who competed in WCCW during the 1980s. She was involved in notable feuds, including a rivalry with the Fabulous Freebirds. French's tough persona and in-ring tenacity made her a memorable competitor in the women's division.

Steve Austin
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1989–1990 (regular appearances)
Position on the card: Mid-card
Wrestling style: Technical and Brawler
Signature moves: Stunner, Million Dollar Dream
Brief description: Steve Austin, initially wrestling under his real name Steve Williams, began his professional career in 1989 after training with Chris Adams. He adopted the ring name "Steve Austin" to avoid confusion with the more established "Dr. Death" Steve Williams. In WCCW, Austin was managed by Skandor Akbar and became a member of the heel faction "Devastation, Inc." During this period, he engaged in notable feuds with Chris Von Erich and his former mentor, Chris Adams. Austin's early tenure in WCCW helped him develop the in-ring skills and persona that would later make him a global wrestling icon. 
WIKIPEDIA, THE FREE ENCYCLOPEDIA

Steve Simpson
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1986–1989 (regular appearances)
Position on the card: Mid to Upper Card
Wrestling style: Technical and High-Flying
Signature moves: Dropkick, Flying Crossbody
Brief description: Steve Simpson, hailing from Johannesburg, South Africa, debuted in WCCW in 1986. He quickly aligned himself with the Von Erich family in their ongoing feud against the Fabulous Freebirds. In 1987, Steve formed a tag team with his brother, Shaun Simpson, and together they captured the WCWA World Tag Team Championship. The Simpson brothers were known for their agility and technical prowess, engaging in memorable feuds with teams like John Tatum and Jack Victory. Steve's tenure in WCCW was marked by his athletic performances and contributions to the promotion's tag team division.

Steve Cox
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1987–1989 (regular appearances)
Position on the card: Mid to Upper Card
Wrestling style: Technical
Signature moves: Dropkick, Suplex
Brief description: Steve Cox, a former University of Tulsa football team captain, transitioned into professional wrestling in the late 1980s. In WCCW, he was introduced by Michael P.S. Hayes as his protégé and tag team partner. Together, they engaged in a notable feud with the Samoan Swat Team, capturing the WCWA World Tag Team Championship on September 16, 1988. Although their reign was brief, Cox's partnership with Hayes and his involvement in high-profile matches elevated his status within the promotion. 
WIKIPEDIA, THE FREE ENCYCLOPEDIA

Steve Regal
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1980s (sporadic appearances)
Position on the card: Mid-card
Wrestling style: Technical
Signature moves: Dropkick, Arm Drag
Brief description: Steve Regal, known as "Mr. Electricity," achieved significant success in the American Wrestling Association (AWA) during the mid-1980s, where he held the AWA World Light Heavyweight Championship and the AWA World Tag Team Championship with "Gorgeous" Jimmy Garvin. During this period, Regal made appearances in WCCW, challenging Brian Adias for the Texas Heavyweight Title. His technical wrestling skills and charismatic persona made him a notable competitor in various promotions throughout the 1980s. 
WIKIPEDIA, THE FREE ENCYCLOPEDIA

Steve Doll
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Not applicable
Position on the card: Not applicable
Wrestling style: Not applicable
Signature moves: Not applicable
Brief description: Steve Doll, born Steven Lyle Doll, was an American professional wrestler best known for his tenure in the World Wrestling Federation (WWF) as Steven Dunn, one half of the tag team Well Dunn. He also competed in Pacific Northwest Wrestling and the United States Wrestling Association, where he held multiple championships. However, there are no verified records of his appearances in the specified Texas-based promotions. 
WIKIPEDIA, THE FREE ENCYCLOPEDIA

Steve Stanlee
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1950s–1960s (sporadic appearances)
Position on the card: Mid-card
Wrestling style: Powerhouse
Signature moves: Body Slam, Bear Hug
Brief description: Steve Stanlee, born Paul Oswald Zygowicz, was an American professional wrestler active from the late 1940s through the 1960s. Known for his chiseled physique and showmanship, he competed in various promotions across the United States, including sporadic appearances in Texas-based territories. Often wrestling as a "jobber to the stars," Stanlee contributed to the wrestling scene during his tenure. 

Steve Williams
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1985 (sporadic appearances)
Position on the card: Mid to Upper Card
Wrestling style: Powerhouse
Signature moves: Oklahoma Stampede (Running Powerslam), Lariat
Brief description: "Dr. Death" Steve Williams was an American professional wrestler renowned for his strength and toughness. In 1985, he made sporadic appearances in WCCW, showcasing his powerhouse style. Williams later achieved significant success in promotions like Mid-South Wrestling, WCW, and All Japan Pro Wrestling, becoming a multi-time champion. 
WIKIPEDIA, THE FREE ENCYCLOPEDIA

Steven Casey
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1987–1989 (regular appearances)
Position on the card: Mid-card
Wrestling style: Technical
Signature moves: Dropkick, Suplex
Brief description: Steven Casey, also known as Steve Casey, was an American professional wrestler who competed in WCCW during the late 1980s. He was known for his technical wrestling skills and had notable matches against various competitors in the promotion.

Steven Dane
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1989–1990 (regular appearances)
Position on the card: Mid-card
Wrestling style: Technical
Signature moves: Arm Drag, Dropkick
Brief description: Steven Dane was an American professional wrestler who competed in WCCW during its later years. He was known for his technical abilities and participated in various mid-card matches within the promotion.

Sugar Bear Harris
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1970s (sporadic appearances)
Position on the card: Mid-card
Wrestling style: Powerhouse
Signature moves: Big Splash, Bear Hug
Brief description: James "Sugar Bear" Harris, later known as Kamala, made sporadic appearances in the Texas wrestling scene during the 1970s. He was known for his imposing size and strength, which he utilized effectively in his matches. Harris later gained fame under the ring name Kamala in various promotions.

Sugi Sito
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1950s–1960s (regular appearances)
Position on the card: Mid to Upper Card
Wrestling style: Lucha Libre
Signature moves: Flying Headscissors, Arm Drag
Brief description: Sugi Sito was a Mexican professional wrestler who competed in the Texas territories during the 1950s and 1960s. He was known for bringing the Lucha Libre style to American audiences, showcasing high-flying maneuvers and technical prowess. Sito had notable matches against various competitors and was a prominent figure during his tenure.

Sunshine
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1983–1985 (regular appearances)
Position on the card: Manager
Wrestling style: Managerial
Signature moves: Not applicable
Brief description: Sunshine, born Valerie French, was a prominent valet and manager in WCCW during the mid-1980s. She initially managed "Gorgeous" Jimmy Garvin and later became associated with Chris Adams. Sunshine was involved in several high-profile storylines and feuds, notably with Precious and Missy Hyatt, contributing significantly to the entertainment aspect of the promotion.

Super Destroyer
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1983–1984 (regular appearances)
Position on the card: Tag Team Champions
Wrestling style: Powerhouse
Signature moves: Double Team Maneuvers
Brief description: The Super Destroyers were a masked tag team consisting of Scott and Bill Irwin in WCCW during the early 1980s. They were members of Skandor Akbar's "Devastation, Inc." stable and held the NWA American Tag Team Championship. The Super Destroyers were known for their dominance in the tag team division and had notable feuds with teams like the Von Erichs and the Fabulous Freebirds. 

"Superstar" Billy Graham
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1970s (sporadic appearances)
Position on the card: Main Event
Wrestling style: Powerhouse
Signature moves: Bear Hug, Running Knee Drop
Brief description: Born Eldridge Wayne Coleman, "Superstar" Billy Graham was renowned for his charismatic persona and impressive physique. In the 1970s, he made sporadic appearances in Texas-based promotions, including NWA Big Time Wrestling. Graham's flamboyant style and influential promos left a lasting impact on the wrestling industry. 
WIKIPEDIA, THE FREE ENCYCLOPEDIA

Susan Green
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1970s–1980s (regular appearances)
Position on the card: Mid to Upper Card
Wrestling style: Technical
Signature moves: Dropkick, Arm Drag
Brief description: Susan "Tex" Green began her wrestling career at the age of 15 and was trained by Joe Blanchard and The Fabulous Moolah. Throughout the 1970s and 1980s, she competed in various promotions, including those in Texas. Green was known for her technical prowess and was a prominent figure in women's wrestling during her tenure. 

Swede Hanson
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1950s–1980s (sporadic appearances)
Position on the card: Main Event
Wrestling style: Brawler
Signature moves: Reverse Neckbreaker
Brief description: Swede Hanson, born Robert Fort Hanson, was an American professional wrestler known for his tag team with Rip Hawk as the "Blond Bombers." They held championships in multiple promotions and were prominent heels during their era. Hanson also had a successful singles career and was known for his powerful brawling style. 
WIKIPEDIA, THE FREE ENCYCLOPEDIA

Sweet Daddy Siki
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1960s–1970s (sporadic appearances)
Position on the card: Mid to Upper Card
Wrestling style: Technical and Showman
Signature moves: Neckbreaker, Dropkick
Brief description: Sweet Daddy Siki, born Reginald Siki, was an American-Canadian professional wrestler known for his flamboyant persona and innovative wrestling style. He competed in various territories, including Texas, where he showcased his technical skills and charismatic presence. Siki was a trailblazer for African-American wrestlers and left a lasting impact on the industry.

Sweet Georgia Brown
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1960s (regular appearances)
Position on the card: Mid-card
Wrestling style: Technical
Signature moves: Body Slam, Arm Drag
Brief description: Sweet Georgia Brown, born Susie Mae McCoy, was a pioneering African-American female wrestler. She competed primarily in Texas during the 1960s and was known for her technical wrestling abilities. Despite facing significant racial and gender barriers, she became a popular figure in the regional wrestling scene.

Tank Patton
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1970s–1980s (sporadic appearances)
Position on the card: Mid-card
Wrestling style: Powerhouse
Signature moves: Body Slam, Bear Hug
Brief description: Tank Patton, born Tom Patton, was an American professional wrestler known for his imposing size and strength. He competed in various territories, including Texas, where he was recognized for his powerhouse wrestling style. Patton often portrayed a heel character and was involved in several notable feuds during his career.

Tarzan Tyler
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1960s (regular appearances)
Position on the card: Main Event
Wrestling style: Brawler
Signature moves: Piledriver, Sleeper Hold
Brief description: Tarzan Tyler, born Camille Tourville, was a Canadian professional wrestler who gained prominence in the 1960s. He competed in various territories, including Texas, where he held the NWA World Tag Team Championship with The Alaskan. Tyler was known for his rugged brawling style and was a significant heel during his tenure. 
WIKIPEDIA, THE FREE ENCYCLOPEDIA

Ted DiBiase
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1970s–1980s (sporadic appearances)
Position on the card: Main Event
Wrestling style: Technical
Signature moves: Million Dollar Dream (Cobra Clutch), Figure-Four Leglock
Brief description: Ted DiBiase, known as "The Million Dollar Man," was an American professional wrestler renowned for his technical prowess and charismatic persona. He competed in various promotions, including Mid-South Wrestling and the World Wrestling Federation (WWF). In the Texas territories, DiBiase held multiple championships and was involved in significant feuds, establishing himself as a top-tier talent. 

Terry Funk
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1965–1980s (regular appearances)
Position on the card: Main Event
Wrestling style: Technical and Hardcore
Signature moves: Spinning Toe Hold, Piledriver
Brief description: Terry Funk, born Terrance Dee Funk, was an American professional wrestler renowned for his influential career spanning over five decades. He began wrestling in his father Dory Funk's Western States Sports promotion in Amarillo, Texas, in 1965. Funk gained prominence in the NWA, capturing the NWA World Heavyweight Championship in 1975 by defeating Jack Brisco. Throughout his tenure, he competed in various territories, including significant stints in Texas-based promotions, where he was celebrated for his technical prowess and later for pioneering hardcore wrestling. Funk's feuds with Ric Flair and his participation in brutal matches solidified his legacy as a wrestling icon. 
WIKIPEDIA, THE FREE ENCYCLOPEDIA

Terry Gordy
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1983–1987 (regular appearances)
Position on the card: Main Event
Wrestling style: Powerhouse
Signature moves: Powerbomb, Piledriver
Brief description: Terry Ray Gordy Sr., known as Terry "Bam Bam" Gordy, was an American professional wrestler best known as a founding member of The Fabulous Freebirds. In WCCW, Gordy, alongside Michael "P.S." Hayes and Buddy Roberts, formed the Freebirds, engaging in a legendary feud with the Von Erich family. Gordy's combination of size, strength, and agility made him a standout performer, and his partnership with Hayes and Roberts introduced the innovative "Freebird Rule" in tag team wrestling. Beyond Texas, Gordy achieved success in Japan with All Japan Pro Wrestling as part of The Miracle Violence Connection. 
WIKIPEDIA, THE FREE ENCYCLOPEDIA

Terry Garvin
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1960s–1970s (sporadic appearances)
Position on the card: Mid to Upper Card
Wrestling style: Technical
Signature moves: Sleeper Hold, Figure-Four Leglock
Brief description: Terrence P. Joyal, known professionally as Terry Garvin, was a Canadian professional wrestler who gained prominence in the Southern United States. Often teaming with his kayfabe brother Ron Garvin, the duo captured multiple tag team championships across various NWA territories. Garvin was recognized for his technical wrestling skills and his ability to work both as a singles and tag team competitor. In the 1980s, he transitioned to a behind-the-scenes role, contributing as a booker and road agent. 

Terry Taylor
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1988 (regular appearances)
Position on the card: Main Event
Wrestling style: Technical
Signature moves: Five-Arm (Flying Forearm Smash), Figure-Four Leglock
Brief description: Terry Taylor, born Paul Worden Taylor III, is an American professional wrestler known for his technical prowess and versatility in the ring. In early 1988, Taylor joined World Class Championship Wrestling (WCCW), where he engaged in a notable feud with Chris Adams. During his tenure, he captured the Texas Heavyweight Championship from Matt Borne and defended it against prominent competitors such as Adams and Kevin Von Erich. Taylor also briefly held the WCWA World Tag Team Championship with Iceman King Parsons. His time in WCCW further solidified his reputation as a skilled and adaptable performer. 
WIKIPEDIA, THE FREE ENCYCLOPEDIA

Texas Red
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1987 (sporadic appearances)
Position on the card: Mid-card
Wrestling style: Powerhouse
Signature moves: Big Boot, Chokeslam
Brief description: Texas Red, the ring name used by Mark Calaway early in his career, made his professional wrestling debut in 1987 with World Class Championship Wrestling (WCCW). Managed by Percy Pringle III (who later became known as Paul Bearer), Texas Red faced the formidable Bruiser Brody in his debut match. Although his time in WCCW was brief, Calaway's tenure as Texas Red marked the beginning of a legendary career, as he would later achieve worldwide fame as The Undertaker in the World Wrestling Federation (WWF, now WWE). 

Tommy Rich
Real Name: Thomas Richardson
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1980s (sporadic appearances)
Position on the card: Main Event
Wrestling style: Technical and Brawler
Signature moves: Thesz Press, Sleeper Hold
Brief description: Tommy "Wildfire" Rich gained prominence in the late 1970s and 1980s, particularly in Georgia Championship Wrestling. He briefly held the NWA World Heavyweight Championship in 1981. Rich made sporadic appearances in Texas-based promotions, including WCCW, where he engaged in various feuds and showcased his fiery in-ring style. 
WIKIPEDIA, THE FREE ENCYCLOPEDIA

Thunderbolt Patterson
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1970s (sporadic appearances)
Position on the card: Mid to Upper Card
Wrestling style: Brawler
Signature moves: Headbutt, Elbow Smash
Brief description: Thunderbolt Patterson was known for his charismatic interviews and energetic wrestling style. He competed in various NWA territories, including occasional appearances in Texas. Patterson was a trailblazer for African-American wrestlers and was known for his confrontational promos and in-ring tenacity.

Tiger Conway Sr.
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1950s–1960s (regular appearances)
Position on the card: Mid-card
Wrestling style: Technical
Signature moves: Dropkick, Arm Drag
Brief description: Tiger Conway Sr. was a pioneering African-American wrestler who competed primarily in the Texas territories. He was known for his technical skills and agility, making significant contributions during a time when opportunities for black wrestlers were limited.

Tiger Conway Jr.
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1970s–1980s (regular appearances)
Position on the card: Mid to Upper Card
Wrestling style: High-Flyer
Signature moves: Flying Crossbody, Dropkick
Brief description: Following in his father's footsteps, Tiger Conway Jr. became a prominent figure in Texas wrestling. He was known for his high-flying maneuvers and formed successful tag teams, including a notable partnership with "Mr. Wrestling" Kevin Von Erich.

"Killer" Tim Brooks
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1970s–1980s (regular appearances)
Position on the card: Mid to Upper Card
Wrestling style: Brawler
Signature moves: Elbow Drop, Piledriver
Brief description: "Killer" Tim Brooks was a rugged brawler known for his roughneck style and heel persona. He competed extensively in Texas, engaging in feuds with top stars and capturing regional championships.

Tim Horner
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1980s (sporadic appearances)
Position on the card: Mid-card
Wrestling style: Technical
Signature moves: Rolling Cradle, Dropkick
Brief description: Tim Horner was a technically proficient wrestler who competed in various NWA territories. In Texas, he participated in both singles and tag team competition, known for his clean wrestling style and sportsmanship.

Tim Woods (Mr. Wrestling)
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1960s–1970s (sporadic appearances)
Position on the card: Main Event
Wrestling style: Technical
Signature moves: Sleeper Hold, Abdominal Stretch
Brief description: Tim Woods, known professionally as "Mr. Wrestling," was an accomplished amateur wrestler who transitioned into professional wrestling in the 1960s. He gained prominence in various territories, including Georgia, Florida, and Texas. Woods was renowned for his technical wrestling skills and his distinctive white mask and attire. He played a significant role in maintaining kayfabe, especially following a 1975 plane crash that involved both "good guys" and "bad guys," by returning to the ring shortly after to preserve the illusion of wrestling storylines. 

Tito Carreon
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1960s–1970s (regular appearances)
Position on the card: Mid-card
Wrestling style: Technical
Signature moves: Dropkick, Arm Drag
Brief description: Tito Carreon was an American professional wrestler who competed primarily in the Texas territories during the 1960s and 1970s. He was known for his technical wrestling abilities and was a popular figure among fans. Carreon held the Texas Junior Heavyweight Championship in Southwest Sports and formed successful tag teams, notably with Nick Kozak, with whom he held the Pacific Northwest Tag Team Championship. 

Tito Montez
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1960s–1970s (sporadic appearances)
Position on the card: Mid-card
Wrestling style: Technical
Signature moves: Dropkick, Arm Drag
Brief description: Tito Montez was an American professional wrestler who gained prominence in the 1960s and 1970s, particularly in the Pacific Northwest and Arizona territories. He was known for his technical wrestling skills and was a popular babyface among fans. Montez held several regional championships throughout his career. 

Tojo Yamamoto
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1980s (regular appearances)
Position on the card: Main Event (as a manager)
Wrestling style: Heel Manager
Signature moves: N/A (Manager)
Brief description: Tojo Yamamoto, born Harold Watanabe, was an American professional wrestler and manager known for his work in the southern United States. In the 1980s, he managed wrestlers such as Phil Hickerson (known as P.Y. Chu-Hi) in WCCW, engaging in notable storylines, including a feud with Eric Embry over control of the promotion. Yamamoto was recognized for his ability to draw heat and his contributions as a trainer to future wrestling talents. 

Tom Andrews
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1970s (sporadic appearances)
Position on the card: Mid-card
Wrestling style: Brawler
Signature moves: Body Slam, Elbow Drop
Brief description: Tom Andrews was an American professional wrestler active in the 1970s. He competed in various territories, including the Midwest and South. Andrews was known for his rugged brawling style and participated in numerous regional promotions during his career. 

Tom Jones
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1960s–1980s (regular appearances)
Position on the card: Mid to Upper Card
Wrestling style: Technical
Signature moves: Cobra Clutch, Headbutt, Boston Crab
Brief description: Tom Jones, nicknamed "Mr. Ebony," was an American professional wrestler who debuted in 1964. He was known for his technical prowess and charismatic presence in the ring. Throughout his career, Jones competed in various promotions, including significant stints in Texas-based territories. He formed notable tag teams, such as the Black Bombers with Porkchop Cash, and was respected for his contributions to the sport. Jones also trained several wrestlers, leaving a lasting legacy in professional wrestling. 

Tom Prichard
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1980s (sporadic appearances)
Position on the card: Mid to Upper Card
Wrestling style: Technical
Signature moves: Sleeper Hold, Figure-Four Leglock
Brief description: Tom Prichard is an American professional wrestler and trainer who began his career in 1979. He competed in various territories, including stints in Texas-based promotions. Prichard gained prominence in the Continental Wrestling Association and later in Smoky Mountain Wrestling, where he formed the tag team "The Heavenly Bodies." Beyond his in-ring career, Prichard is renowned for his work as a trainer, having mentored numerous future wrestling stars. 

Toni Rose
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1960s–1970s (sporadic appearances)
Position on the card: Mid-card
Wrestling style: Technical
Signature moves: Body Slam, Arm Drag
Brief description: Toni Rose was an American professional wrestler who trained under The Fabulous Moolah. She held the NWA World Women's Tag Team Championship multiple times, partnering with Donna Christanello and Moolah herself. Rose was known for her technical wrestling skills and competed in various territories, including Texas, during her career. 

Tony Borne
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1950s–1960s (regular appearances)
Position on the card: Main Event
Wrestling style: Brawler
Signature moves: Piledriver, Knee Drop
Brief description: Tony Borne, born Anthony Wayne Osborne, was an American professional wrestler known for his toughness and brawling style. He competed extensively in the Pacific Northwest and Texas territories. In Texas, he held the NWA Brass Knuckles Championship (Texas version) four times and the NWA Texas Tag Team Championship twice. Borne was a prominent figure in the wrestling scene during his active years. 
WIKIPEDIA, THE FREE ENCYCLOPEDIA

Tony Charles
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1982–1983 (as "The Checkmate")
Position on the card: Mid-card
Wrestling style: Technical
Signature moves: European Uppercut, Suplex Variations
Brief description: Tony Charles was a Welsh professional wrestler renowned for his technical prowess. In WCCW, he donned a mask and competed under the ring name "The Checkmate." During his tenure, he captured the WCWA Television Championship. Charles was respected for his in-ring abilities and contributed significantly to the wrestling scene during his career. 
WIKIPEDIA, THE FREE ENCYCLOPEDIA

Tony Atlas
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1986–1988 (regular appearances)
Position on the card: Main Event
Wrestling style: Powerhouse
Signature moves: Press Slam, Headbutt
Brief description: Tony Atlas, born Anthony White, is an American professional wrestler and bodybuilder. In WCCW, he adopted the moniker "The Black Superman" and achieved success by winning the World Class Television Championship and the World Class Texas Tag Team Championship with partner Skip Young. Atlas was known for his impressive physique and strength, making significant contributions to the wrestling industry during his tenure. 

Tommy Rogers
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1984–1988 (regular appearances)
Position on the card: Main Event
Wrestling style: Technical
Signature moves: Tomakaze (a finishing maneuver later adopted by Christian Cage), Dropkick, Rocket Launcher (assisted top rope splash)
Brief description: Tommy Rogers, born Thomas R. Couch, was an American professional wrestler best known as one half of the tag team "The Fantastics" alongside Bobby Fulton. The duo gained prominence in the mid-1980s, particularly in World Class Championship Wrestling (WCCW), where they engaged in a notable feud with The Midnight Express. Rogers was celebrated for his technical prowess and high-flying maneuvers. After his tenure in WCCW, he continued to wrestle in various promotions, including the Universal Wrestling Federation (UWF) and later in Extreme Championship Wrestling (ECW). Rogers retired from in-ring competition in 2007 and passed away on June 1, 2015.

Toni Adams
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1989–1990 (regular appearances)
Position on the card: Manager/Valet
Wrestling style: Managerial/Valet
Signature moves: N/A (Manager)
Brief description: Toni Adams, born Toni Lea Collins, was an American professional wrestling valet and manager. She began her career in World Class Championship Wrestling (WCCW) in 1989, managing her then-husband, Chris Adams. Toni was involved in several high-profile storylines, including a notable feud with Steve Austin and Jeanie Clarke in the United States Wrestling Association (USWA). After her divorce from Chris Adams, she continued to manage other wrestlers in various promotions until her retirement in 1995. Toni Adams passed away on June 24, 2010. 

Tony Anthony
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1980s (sporadic appearances)
Position on the card: Mid to Upper Card
Wrestling style: Brawler
Signature moves: Swinging Neckbreaker, DDT
Brief description: Tony Anthony, also known as "Dirty White Boy," is an American professional wrestler who gained prominence in the 1980s and 1990s. He competed in various promotions, including the United States Wrestling Association (USWA) and Smoky Mountain Wrestling (SMW). In SMW, Anthony held the Heavyweight Championship three times and was known for his rugged brawling style. He also had a stint in the World Wrestling Federation (WWF) as T.L. Hopper, a wrestling plumber. 
WIKIPEDIA, THE FREE ENCYCLOPEDIA

Tony Falk
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1980s (regular appearances)
Position on the card: Mid-card
Wrestling style: Technical
Signature moves: Dropkick, Arm Drag
Brief description: Tony Falk, born Anthony Felker, is an American retired professional wrestler, referee, promoter, and trainer. He is best known for his appearances in the Memphis-based promotion United States Wrestling Association (USWA) in the 1990s. Falk also worked for World Class Championship Wrestling (WCCW), where he served as a referee for Steve Austin's first match. Throughout his career, he held titles such as the USWA Television Championship and the NWA Mid-America Heavyweight Championship. 

Tor Kamata
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1970s (sporadic appearances)
Position on the card: Mid to Upper Card
Wrestling style: Brawler
Signature moves: Headbutt, Nerve Hold
Brief description: Tor Kamata, born McRonald Kamaka, was a Canadian professional wrestler known for his villainous persona and intimidating presence. He competed in various territories, including Texas, during the 1970s. Kamata was recognized for his brawling style and had notable feuds with several top wrestlers of his era. He held multiple championships throughout his career and was a prominent figure in the wrestling scene during his active years.

Professor Toru Tanaka
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1960s–1970s (sporadic appearances)
Position on the card: Main Event
Wrestling style: Martial Arts
Signature moves: Thrust Kick, Nerve Pinch
Brief description: Professor Toru Tanaka, born Charles Kalani Jr., was an American professional wrestler and actor known for his martial arts-based wrestling style and portrayal of a Japanese villain. He competed in various territories, including Texas, during the 1960s and 1970s. Tanaka was often paired with Mr. Fuji as a formidable tag team, and he held multiple championships throughout his career. After retiring from wrestling, he transitioned into acting, appearing in several films and television shows.

Tully Blanchard
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: Early 1980s (sporadic appearances)
Position on the card: Main Event
Wrestling style: Technical
Signature moves: Slingshot Suplex, Piledriver
Brief description: Tully Blanchard, born January 22, 1954, is a retired American professional wrestler best known as an original member of the Four Horsemen. He worked for major wrestling organizations in the United States, including Jim Crockett Promotions and the World Wrestling Federation (WWF). In the early 1980s, Blanchard made sporadic appearances in Texas-based promotions, including WCCW, where he showcased his technical wrestling skills and charismatic persona. He later gained prominence in the National Wrestling Alliance (NWA) and WWF, becoming a key figure in professional wrestling history. 

Velvet McIntyre
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1983 (sporadic appearances)
Position on the card: Mid-card
Wrestling style: High-flying/Technical
Signature moves: Flying Crossbody, Victory Roll
Brief description: Velvet McIntyre, born November 24, 1962, is a retired Canadian-Irish professional wrestler. She began her career in 1980 and wrestled in various North American independent promotions before joining the World Wrestling Federation (WWF). In 1983, McIntyre made sporadic appearances in WCCW, showcasing her high-flying maneuvers and technical prowess. She later held the WWF Women's Championship and the WWF Women's Tag Team Championship, becoming a prominent figure in women's wrestling during the 1980s. 

Tracy Smothers
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1980s (sporadic appearances)
Position on the card: Mid to Upper Card
Wrestling style: Technical/Brawler
Signature moves: Jawjacker (Leaping Reverse STO), Southern Kick (Superkick)
Brief description: Tracy Smothers was an American professional wrestler known for his versatility and longevity in the wrestling industry. He competed in various promotions, including the Continental Wrestling Association and Smoky Mountain Wrestling, where he held multiple championships. In the late 1980s, Smothers made appearances in Texas-based promotions, showcasing his technical skills and southern charisma. He was also part of tag teams like The Wild-Eyed Southern Boys and The Young Pistols. Smothers continued to wrestle into the 2000s, contributing significantly to the wrestling community until his passing in 2020. 

Uncle Elmer
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1980s (sporadic appearances)
Position on the card: Mid-card
Wrestling style: Powerhouse
Signature moves: Big Splash, Bearhug
Brief description: Uncle Elmer, born Stan Frazier, was an American professional wrestler best known for his time in the World Wrestling Federation (WWF) as a member of Hillbilly Jim's family stable. Standing at 6 feet 10 inches and weighing over 450 pounds, he was known for his massive size and country persona. In the 1980s, Frazier made sporadic appearances in Texas-based promotions, bringing his unique character to the region. He gained national attention in the WWF, notably participating in a highly publicized in-ring wedding segment. Frazier retired from wrestling in the late 1980s and passed away in 1992.

The Vachons
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1960s–1970s (sporadic appearances)
Position on the card: Main Event
Wrestling style: Brawlers
Signature moves: Piledriver, Double Team Maneuvers
Brief description: The Vachon family, particularly Maurice "Mad Dog" Vachon and Paul "Butcher" Vachon, were prominent figures in professional wrestling. Known for their rugged and aggressive style, the Vachon brothers competed in various territories, including Texas, during the 1960s and 1970s. They held multiple championships and were renowned for their intense personas and in-ring ferocity. The Vachon legacy continued with Luna Vachon, Maurice's niece, who became a notable figure in women's wrestling.

Verne Gagne
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1950s–1960s (sporadic appearances)
Position on the card: Main Event
Wrestling style: Technical
Signature moves: Sleeper Hold, Dropkick
Brief description: Verne Gagne was an American professional wrestler and promoter, best known for founding and promoting the American Wrestling Association (AWA). He was a 10-time AWA World Heavyweight Champion and is considered one of the greatest technical wrestlers in history. Gagne made sporadic appearances in Texas-based promotions during the 1950s and 1960s, showcasing his exceptional wrestling skills. He trained numerous future stars and was instrumental in shaping professional wrestling in the mid-20th century.

Vicki Williams
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1970s–1980s (regular appearances)
Position on the card: Mid to Upper Card
Wrestling style: Technical
Signature moves: Dropkick, Flying Headscissors
Brief description: Vicki Williams was an American professional wrestler who gained prominence in the 1970s and 1980s. She competed extensively in Texas-based promotions, becoming a fan favorite for her technical prowess and athleticism. Williams held the NWA Women's World Tag Team Championship and was a significant figure in women's wrestling during her career.

Victor Rivera
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1970s (sporadic appearances)
Position on the card: Mid-card
Wrestling style: Technical/Brawler
Signature moves: Body Slam, Elbow Drop
Brief description: Victor Rivera was a Puerto Rican professional wrestler known for his work in various territories during the 1970s. He made sporadic appearances in Texas-based promotions, showcasing a blend of technical and brawling styles. Rivera held several regional championships and was recognized for his contributions to the wrestling industry during his active years.

Viking
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1980s (sporadic appearances)
Position on the card: Mid-card
Wrestling style: Powerhouse
Signature moves: Power Slam, Big Boot
Brief description: Viking was a professional wrestler who competed in various promotions during the 1980s. He made sporadic appearances in Texas-based promotions, where he was known for his imposing physique and powerhouse wrestling style. While not a mainstay in these promotions, Viking contributed to the diverse talent roster of the era.

Vincent Lopez
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1950s–1960s (regular appearances)
Position on the card: Main Event
Wrestling style: Technical
Signature moves: Arm Drag, Dropkick
Brief description: Vincent Lopez was a Mexican-American professional wrestler who gained prominence in the 1950s and 1960s. He was a significant figure in Texas-based promotions, known for his technical wrestling abilities and charisma. Lopez held several regional championships and was a main event attraction during his career.

Vic Steamboat
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1987 (sporadic appearances)
Position on the card: Lower Card
Wrestling style: Technical
Signature moves: Dropkick, Arm Drag
Brief description: Vic Steamboat, born Victor Hersey Blood, is an American retired professional wrestler and the younger brother of Ricky Steamboat. He made his professional debut in 1986 and briefly competed in the World Class Wrestling Association (WCWA) in 1987. During his tenure in WCWA, he participated in events such as the Labor Day Star Wars and Thanksgiving Star Wars, facing opponents like Vince Apollo and Killer Tim Brooks. Following his stint in Texas, Steamboat found greater success in the Northeastern United States, particularly with International Championship Wrestling (ICW) and its successor, International World Class Championship Wrestling (IWCCW), where he held multiple championships. 
WIKIPEDIA, THE FREE ENCYCLOPEDIA

Victor the Wrestling Bear
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1950s–1970s (sporadic appearances)
Position on the card: Special Attraction
Wrestling style: Gimmick/Novelty
Signature moves: Bear Hug
Brief description: Victor the Wrestling Bear was a popular attraction in professional wrestling from the 1950s through the 1970s. Trained to perform in the ring, Victor faced numerous human opponents in exhibitions that were both entertaining and showcased the bear's training. These matches were often featured as special attractions in various promotions, including those in Texas. While not a traditional wrestler, Victor's appearances were a notable part of wrestling history during this era. 
SPORTS AND WRESTLING

Violet Viann
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1940s (regular appearances)
Position on the card: Mid to Upper Card
Wrestling style: Technical
Signature moves: Body Slam, Headlock
Brief description: Violet Viann was a female professional wrestler active during the 1940s. She competed in various promotions, including those in Texas, where she faced opponents such as Nell Stewart. Viann was known for her technical wrestling abilities and was a prominent figure in women's wrestling during her active years.

Von Brauners
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1960s (sporadic appearances)
Position on the card: Main Event
Wrestling style: Tag Team
Signature moves: Double Team Maneuvers
Brief description: The Von Brauners were a professional wrestling tag team consisting of Karl Von Brauner (Doug Donnan) and Kurt Von Brauner (Jimmy Brawner). Portraying villainous German characters, they were known for their ruthless tactics and were managed by Saul Weingeroff. The team held multiple championships across various territories during the 1960s.

Von Erichs
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1950s–1980s (regular appearances)
Position on the card: Main Event
Wrestling style: Technical/Powerhouse
Signature moves: Iron Claw, Dropkick, Discus Punch
Brief description: The Von Erich family, led by patriarch Fritz Von Erich, became synonymous with Texas wrestling. Fritz established his legacy in the 1950s and later built WCCW around his sons—Kevin, David, Kerry, Mike, and Chris. They engaged in legendary feuds, particularly with The Fabulous Freebirds, and held multiple championships, making them one of the most influential families in professional wrestling history.

Wahoo McDaniel
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1960s–1980s (sporadic appearances)
Position on the card: Main Event
Wrestling style: Brawler
Signature moves: Tomahawk Chop, Sleeper Hold
Brief description: Wahoo McDaniel was a Native American professional wrestler and former professional football player. He competed across numerous territories, including Texas, where he had classic matches with Johnny Valentine, Ric Flair, and Harley Race. Known for his stiff chops and legitimate toughness, McDaniel was a top draw throughout the 1970s and 1980s.

Waldo Von Erich
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1960s–1970s (regular appearances)
Position on the card: Upper Card
Wrestling style: Powerhouse
Signature moves: Iron Claw, Piledriver
Brief description: Waldo Von Erich, billed as the "brother" of Fritz Von Erich, was a top heel in the Texas territories. He competed in WCCW and other NWA promotions, often using the Iron Claw as his signature move. Waldo held several championships and was known for his brutal, methodical wrestling style.

Wendi Richter
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1980s (regular appearances)
Position on the card: Main Event (Women’s Division)
Wrestling style: Powerhouse/Technical
Signature moves: Powerbomb, Boston Crab
Brief description: Wendi Richter was one of the biggest stars in women’s wrestling during the 1980s. She competed in WCCW and later became famous in the WWF as part of the "Rock ‘n’ Wrestling Connection" alongside Cyndi Lauper. Richter won multiple championships and was known for her strength and in-ring ability.

Whipper Billy Watson
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1940s–1950s (sporadic appearances)
Position on the card: Main Event
Wrestling style: Technical
Signature moves: Boston Crab, Dropkick
Brief description: Whipper Billy Watson was a Canadian wrestling legend who briefly competed in Texas during his NWA World Heavyweight Championship reigns. He was known for his clean, technical wrestling style and was one of the top babyfaces of his era.

Wilbur Snyder
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1950s–1960s (sporadic appearances)
Position on the card: Main Event
Wrestling style: Technical
Signature moves: Abdominal Stretch, Dropkick
Brief description: Wilbur Snyder was an American professional wrestler renowned for his technical prowess and sportsmanship. He competed across various territories, including Texas, during the 1950s and 1960s. Snyder was instrumental in popularizing the abdominal stretch and was a major draw in the Midwest, particularly in the Chicago area. He held multiple championships throughout his career and was respected for his in-ring abilities and demeanor.

Wild Samoans (Afa and Sika Anoa'i)
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1980s (sporadic appearances)
Position on the card: Main Event (Tag Team Division)
Wrestling style: Brawlers
Signature moves: Samoan Drop, Headbutt
Brief description: The Wild Samoans, consisting of brothers Afa and Sika Anoa'i, were a dominant tag team known for their ferocity and unorthodox style. They competed in various promotions, including brief stints in Texas-based territories during the 1980s. The duo held multiple tag team championships and were later inducted into the WWE Hall of Fame.

Winona Littleheart
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1970s–1980s (regular appearances)
Position on the card: Mid-card (Women's Division)
Wrestling style: Technical
Signature moves: Flying Headscissors, Arm Drag
Brief description: Winona Littleheart, also known as Winona Little Heart, was a Native American professional wrestler who gained prominence in the 1970s and 1980s. She competed in various territories, including Texas, and was known for her technical skills and agility. Littleheart held the NWA Women's World Tag Team Championship with partner Joyce Grable and was a popular figure in women's wrestling during her career.

Wladek Kowalski (Killer Kowalski)
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1950s–1960s (sporadic appearances)
Position on the card: Main Event
Wrestling style: Technical/Brawler
Signature moves: Clawhold, Knee Drop
Brief description: Wladek "Killer" Kowalski was a Canadian professional wrestler known for his imposing presence and ruthless in-ring style. He competed globally, including appearances in Texas-based promotions during the 1950s and 1960s. Kowalski was infamous for his "killer" persona and had notable feuds with top wrestlers of his era. After retiring, he became a respected trainer, mentoring future stars like Triple H and Chyna.

Yoshiaki Yatsu
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1980s (sporadic appearances)
Position on the card: Upper Card
Wrestling style: Technical/Powerhouse
Signature moves: German Suplex, Lariat
Brief description: Yoshiaki Yatsu is a Japanese professional wrestler and former amateur wrestler who competed in the 1976 Summer Olympics. In the 1980s, he made appearances in U.S. promotions, including Texas-based territories, showcasing his blend of technical skill and power. Yatsu found significant success in Japan, holding multiple championships and engaging in high-profile matches.

Youngbloods
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1980s–1990s
Position on the card: Mid to Upper Card
Wrestling style: Tag Team
Signature moves: Double Tomahawk Chop, Double Dropkick
Brief description: The Youngbloods, consisting of brothers Mark and Chris Romero (wrestling under the surname Youngblood), were a Native American tag team known for their high-energy performances and agility. They competed in various promotions, including WCCW, where they engaged in notable feuds and showcased their tag team prowess.

Yvon Robert
Time in Southwest Sports-NWA Big Time Wrestling-World Class Championship Wrestling-World Class Wrestling Association: 1930s–1950s (sporadic appearances)
Position on the card: Main Event
Wrestling style: Technical
Signature moves: Body Slam, Boston Crab
Brief description: Yvon Robert was a Canadian professional wrestler celebrated for his technical skills and significant impact on the sport in Canada. He held multiple championships, including the World Heavyweight Wrestling Championship, and was a major draw in the Montreal wrestling scene. Robert made appearances in various territories, including Texas, during his career.


